1000
592, This do ye; lade your beasts, and go, get you unto the land of Canaan; 
And take your father and your households, and come unto me: and I will give you the good of the land of Egypt, and ye shall eat the fat of the land. 
Now thou art commanded, this do ye; take you wagons out of the land of Egypt for your little ones, and for your wives, and bring your father, and come. 
Also regard not your stuff; for the good of all the land of Egypt is your's. 
And the children of Israel did so: and Joseph gave them wagons, according to the commandment of Pharaoh, and gave them provision for the w
484,y words come to pass. How shall we order the child, and how shall we do unto him? 
And the angel of the LORD said unto Manoah, Of all that I said unto the woman let her beware. 
She may not eat of any thing that cometh of the vine, neither let her drink wine or strong drink, nor eat any unclean thing: all that I commanded her let her observe. 
And Manoah said unto the angel of the LORD, I pray thee, let us detain thee, until we shall have made ready a kid for thee. 
And the angel
557,th him, seeking of him a sign from heaven, tempting him. 
And he sighed deeply in his spirit, and saith, Why doth this generation seek after a sign? verily I say unto you, There shall no sign be given unto this generation. 
And he left them, and entering into the ship again departed to the other side. 
Now the disciples had forgotten to take bread, neither had they in the ship with them more than one loaf. 
And he charged them, saying, Take heed, beware of the leaven of the Pharisees, and of the leaven of Herod. 
And they reasoned among themselves, sa
506,a league with you? 
And they said unto Joshua, We are thy servants. And Joshua said unto them, Who are ye? and from whence come ye? 
And they said unto him, From a very far country thy servants are come because of the name of the LORD thy God: for we have heard the fame of him, and all that he did in Egypt, 
And all that he did to the two kings of the Amorites, that were beyond Jordan, to Sihon king of Heshbon, and to Og king of Bashan, which was at Ashtaroth. 
Wherefore our elders and all the inhabit
647,miah, and Jahaziel, and Johanan, and Josabad the Gederathite, 
Eluzai, and Jerimoth, and Bealiah, and Shemariah, and Shephatiah the Haruphite, 
Elkanah, and Jesiah, and Azareel, and Joezer, and Jashobeam, the Korhites, 
And Joelah, and Zebadiah, the sons of Jeroham of Gedor. 
And of the Gadites there separated themselves unto David into the hold to the wilderness men of might, and men of war fit for the battle, that could handle shield and buckler, whose faces were like the faces of lions, and were as swift as the roes upon the mountains; 
Ezer the first, Obadiah the second, Eliab the third, 
Mishmannah the fourth, Jeremiah the fifth, 
Att
586,So David went on his way, and Saul returned to his place. 
And David said in his heart, I shall now perish one day by the hand of Saul: there is nothing better for me than that I should speedily escape into the land of the Philistines; and Saul shall despair of me, to seek me any more in any coast of Israel: so shall I escape out of his hand. 
And David arose, and he passed over with the six hundred men that were with him unto Achish, the son of Maoch, king of Gath. 
And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man with his household, even David with his two wives, 
718,The proverbs of Solomon the son of David, king of Israel; 
To know wisdom and instruction; to perceive the words of understanding; 
To receive the instruction of wisdom, justice, and judgment, and equity; 
To give subtilty to the simple, to the young man knowledge and discretion. 
A wise man will hear, and will increase learning; and a man of understanding shall attain unto wise counsels: 
To understand a proverb, and the interpretation; the words of the wise, and their dark sayings. 
The fear of the LORD is the beginning of knowledge: but fools despise wisdom and instruction. 
My son, hear the instruction of thy father, and forsake not the law of thy mother: 
For they shall be an ornament of grace unto thy h
523,eared God above many. 
And I said unto them, Let not the gates of Jerusalem be opened until the sun be hot; and while they stand by, let them shut the doors, and bar them: and appoint watches of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, every one in his watch, and every one to be over against his house. 
Now the city was large and great: but the people were few therein, and the houses were not builded. 
And my God put into mine heart to gather together the nobles, and the rulers, and the people, that they might be reckoned by gen
715, and they that are mad against me are sworn against me. 
For I have eaten ashes like bread, and mingled my drink with weeping. 
Because of thine indignation and thy wrath: for thou hast lifted me up, and cast me down. 
My days are like a shadow that declineth; and I am withered like grass. 
But thou, O LORD, shall endure for ever; and thy remembrance unto all generations. 
Thou shalt arise, and have mercy upon Zion: for the time to favour her, yea, the set time, is come. 
For thy servants take pleasure in her stones, and favour the dust thereof. 
So the heathen shall fear the name of the LORD, and all the kings of the earth thy glory. 
When the LORD shall build up Zion, he shall appear in his glory. 
He wi
707,t committeth fornication sinneth against his own body. 
What? know ye not that your body is the temple of the Holy Ghost which is in you, which ye have of God, and ye are not your own? 
For ye are bought with a price: therefore glorify God in your body, and in your spirit, which are God's. 
Now concerning the things whereof ye wrote unto me: It is good for a man not to touch a woman. 
Nevertheless, to avoid fornication, let every man have his own wife, and let every woman have her own husband. 
Let the husband render unto the wife due benevolence: and likewise also the wife unto the husband. 
The wife hath not power of her own body, but the husband: and likewise also the husband hath not power of h
496,of the earth. Selah. 
And at evening let them return; and let them make a noise like a dog, and go round about the city. 
Let them wander up and down for meat, and grudge if they be not satisfied. 
But I will sing of thy power; yea, I will sing aloud of thy mercy in the morning: for thou hast been my defence and refuge in the day of my trouble. 
Unto thee, O my strength, will I sing: for God is my defence, and the God of my mercy. 
O God, thou hast cast us off, thou hast scattered us, thou h
539,o her streets; and the wounded shall be judged in the midst of her by the sword upon her on every side; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And there shall be no more a pricking brier unto the house of Israel, nor any grieving thorn of all that are round about them, that despised them; and they shall know that I am the Lord GOD. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; When I shall have gathered the house of Israel from the people among whom they are scattered, and shall be sanctified in them in the sight of the heathen, then shall they dwell 
542,est he fall into reproach and the snare of the devil. 
Likewise must the deacons be grave, not doubletongued, not given to much wine, not greedy of filthy lucre; 
Holding the mystery of the faith in a pure conscience. 
And let these also first be proved; then let them use the office of a deacon, being found blameless. 
Even so must their wives be grave, not slanderers, sober, faithful in all things. 
Let the deacons be the husbands of one wife, ruling their children and their own houses well. 
For they that have used the office of a dea
681,us they will be upon you. 
Therefore set I in the lower places behind the wall, and on the higher places, I even set the people after their families with their swords, their spears, and their bows. 
And I looked, and rose up, and said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of the people, Be not ye afraid of them: remember the LORD, which is great and terrible, and fight for your brethren, your sons, and your daughters, your wives, and your houses. 
And it came to pass, when our enemies heard that it was known unto us, and God had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned all of us to the wall, every one unto his work. 
And it came to pass from that tim
682,amented; neither shall they be buried; but they shall be as dung upon the face of the earth: and they shall be consumed by the sword, and by famine; and their carcases shall be meat for the fowls of heaven, and for the beasts of the earth. 
For thus saith the LORD, Enter not into the house of mourning, neither go to lament nor bemoan them: for I have taken away my peace from this people, saith the LORD, even lovingkindness and mercies. 
Both the great and the small shall die in this land: they shall not be buried, neither shall men lament for them, nor cut themselves, nor make themselves bald for them: 
Neither shall men tear themselves for them in mourning, to comfort them
720,t forasmuch as he had not to pay, his lord commanded him to be sold, and his wife, and children, and all that he had, and payment to be made. 
The servant therefore fell down, and worshipped him, saying, Lord, have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
Then the lord of that servant was moved with compassion, and loosed him, and forgave him the debt. 
But the same servant went out, and found one of his fellowservants, which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on him, and took him by the throat, saying, Pay me that thou owest. 
And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him, saying, Have patience with me, and I will pay thee all. 
And he would not: but went and cast him into prison, 
518,is escaped, which remaineth unto you from the hail, and shall eat every tree which groweth for you out of the field: 
And they shall fill thy houses, and the houses of all thy servants, and the houses of all the Egyptians; which neither thy fathers, nor thy fathers' fathers have seen, since the day that they were upon the earth unto this day. And he turned himself, and went out from Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh's servants said unto him, How long shall this man be a snare unto us? let the men go, that they may serve the 
602,way by night. 
And he commanded them, saying, Behold, ye shall lie in wait against the city, even behind the city: go not very far from the city, but be ye all ready: 
And I, and all the people that are with me, will approach unto the city: and it shall come to pass, when they come out against us, as at the first, that we will flee before them, 
(For they will come out after us) till we have drawn them from the city; for they will say, They flee before us, as at the first: therefore we will flee before them. 
Then ye shall rise up from the ambush, and seize upon the city: for the LORD your God w
534, secret places: a fire not blown shall consume him; it shall go ill with him that is left in his tabernacle. 
The heaven shall reveal his iniquity; and the earth shall rise up against him. 
The increase of his house shall depart, and his goods shall flow away in the day of his wrath. 
This is the portion of a wicked man from God, and the heritage appointed unto him by God. 
But Job answered and said, 
Hear diligently my speech, and let this be your consolations. 
Suffer me that I may speak; and after that I have spoken, mock on.
569, yet as he ought to know. 
But if any man love God, the same is known of him. 
As concerning therefore the eating of those things that are offered in sacrifice unto idols, we know that an idol is nothing in the world, and that there is none other God but one. 
For though there be that are called gods, whether in heaven or in earth, (as there be gods many, and lords many,) 
But to us there is but one God, the Father, of whom are all things, and we in him; and one Lord Jesus Christ, by whom are all things, and we by him. 
Howbeit there is not in every man that know
688,harged us, to drink no wine all our days, we, our wives, our sons, nor our daughters; 
Nor to build houses for us to dwell in: neither have we vineyard, nor field, nor seed: 
But we have dwelt in tents, and have obeyed, and done according to all that Jonadab our father commanded us. 
But it came to pass, when Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon came up into the land, that we said, Come, and let us go to Jerusalem for fear of the army of the Chaldeans, and for fear of the army of the Syrians: so we dwell at Jerusalem. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto Jeremiah, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Go and tell the men of Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, Wi
600,they shall take to themselves their curtains, and all their vessels, and their camels; and they shall cry unto them, Fear is on every side. 
Flee, get you far off, dwell deep, O ye inhabitants of Hazor, saith the LORD; for Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon hath taken counsel against you, and hath conceived a purpose against you. 
Arise, get you up unto the wealthy nation, that dwelleth without care, saith the LORD, which have neither gates nor bars, which dwell alone. 
And their camels shall be a booty, and the multitude of their cattle a spoil: and I will scatter into all winds them that are in 
655,herd and of thy flock thou shalt sanctify unto the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work with the firstling of thy bullock, nor shear the firstling of thy sheep. 
Thou shalt eat it before the LORD thy God year by year in the place which the LORD shall choose, thou and thy household. 
And if there be any blemish therein, as if it be lame, or blind, or have any ill blemish, thou shalt not sacrifice it unto the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt eat it within thy gates: the unclean and the clean person shall eat it alike, as the roebuck, and as the hart. 
Only thou shalt not eat the blood thereof; thou shalt pour it upon the ground as water. 
Observe the month 
705,d, or brokenhanded, 
Or crookbackt, or a dwarf, or that hath a blemish in his eye, or be scurvy, or scabbed, or hath his stones broken; 
No man that hath a blemish of the seed of Aaron the priest shall come nigh to offer the offerings of the LORD made by fire: he hath a blemish; he shall not come nigh to offer the bread of his God. 
He shall eat the bread of his God, both of the most holy, and of the holy. 
Only he shall not go in unto the vail, nor come nigh unto the altar, because he hath a blemish; that he profane not my sanctuaries: for I the LORD do sanctify them. 
And Moses told it unto Aaron, and to his sons, and unto all the children of Israel. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Spe
631,nown my Father also: and from henceforth ye know him, and have seen him. 
Philip saith unto him, Lord, shew us the Father, and it sufficeth us. 
Jesus saith unto him, Have I been so long time with you, and yet hast thou not known me, Philip? he that hath seen me hath seen the Father; and how sayest thou then, Shew us the Father? 
Believest thou not that I am in the Father, and the Father in me? the words that I speak unto you I speak not of myself: but the Father that dwelleth in me, he doeth the works. 
Believe me that I am in the Father, and the Father in me: or else believe me for the very works' sake. 
Verily, verily, I
515,emesh with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Benjamin; Geba with her suburbs, and Alemeth with her suburbs, and Anathoth with her suburbs. All their cities throughout their families were thirteen cities. 
And unto the sons of Kohath, which were left of the family of that tribe, were cities given out of the half tribe, namely, out of the half tribe of Manasseh, by lot, ten cities. 
And to the sons of Gershom throughout their families out of the tribe of Issachar, and out of the tribe of Asher, and out of th
601,ilhi. 
And he walked in all the ways of Asa his father; he turned not aside from it, doing that which was right in the eyes of the LORD: nevertheless the high places were not taken away; for the people offered and burnt incense yet in the high places. 
And Jehoshaphat made peace with the king of Israel. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jehoshaphat, and his might that he shewed, and how he warred, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? 
And the remnant of the sodomites, which remained in the days of his father Asa, he took out of the land. 
There was then no king i
518,heads of them were two hundred; and all their brethren were at their commandment. 
Of Zebulun, such as went forth to battle, expert in war, with all instruments of war, fifty thousand, which could keep rank: they were not of double heart. 
And of Naphtali a thousand captains, and with them with shield and spear thirty and seven thousand. 
And of the Danites expert in war twenty and eight thousand and six hundred. 
And of Asher, such as went forth to battle, expert in war, forty thousand. 
And on the other side of
575,forth her hands, and there is none to comfort her: the LORD hath commanded concerning Jacob, that his adversaries should be round about him: Jerusalem is as a menstruous woman among them. 
The LORD is righteous; for I have rebelled against his commandment: hear, I pray you, all people, and behold my sorrow: my virgins and my young men are gone into captivity. 
I called for my lovers, but they deceived me: my priests and mine elders gave up the ghost in the city, while they sought their meat to relieve their souls. 
Behold, O LORD; for I am in distress: my bowels are tr
578,h five and twenty thousand in length: and the sanctuary of the LORD shall be in the midst thereof. 
It shall be for the priests that are sanctified of the sons of Zadok; which have kept my charge, which went not astray when the children of Israel went astray, as the Levites went astray. 
And this oblation of the land that is offered shall be unto them a thing most holy by the border of the Levites. 
And over against the border of the priests the Levites shall have five and twenty thousand in length, and ten thousand in breadth: all the length shall be five and twenty thou
602,l take a virgin of his own people to wife. 
Neither shall he profane his seed among his people: for I the LORD do sanctify him. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto Aaron, saying, Whosoever he be of thy seed in their generations that hath any blemish, let him not approach to offer the bread of his God. 
For whatsoever man he be that hath a blemish, he shall not approach: a blind man, or a lame, or he that hath a flat nose, or any thing superfluous, 
Or a man that is brokenfooted, or brokenhanded, 
Or crookbackt, or a dwarf, or that hath a blemish in his eye, or be scurvy, or scabb
595,with thy sins, thou hast wearied me with thine iniquities. 
I, even I, am he that blotteth out thy transgressions for mine own sake, and will not remember thy sins. 
Put me in remembrance: let us plead together: declare thou, that thou mayest be justified. 
Thy first father hath sinned, and thy teachers have transgressed against me. 
Therefore I have profaned the princes of the sanctuary, and have given Jacob to the curse, and Israel to reproaches. 
Yet now hear, O Jacob my servant; and Israel, whom I have chosen: 
Thus saith the LORD that made thee, and formed thee from the womb, which w
693,y have no cloak for their sin. 
He that hateth me hateth my Father also. 
If I had not done among them the works which none other man did, they had not had sin: but now have they both seen and hated both me and my Father. 
But this cometh to pass, that the word might be fulfilled that is written in their law, They hated me without a cause. 
But when the Comforter is come, whom I will send unto you from the Father, even the Spirit of truth, which proceedeth from the Father, he shall testify of me: 
And ye also shall bear witness, because ye have been with me from the beginning. 
These things have I spoken unto you, that ye should not be offended. 
They shall put you out of the synagogu
499,and. 
I will also cause all her mirth to cease, her feast days, her new moons, and her sabbaths, and all her solemn feasts. 
And I will destroy her vines and her fig trees, whereof she hath said, These are my rewards that my lovers have given me: and I will make them a forest, and the beasts of the field shall eat them. 
And I will visit upon her the days of Baalim, wherein she burned incense to them, and she decked herself with her earrings and her jewels, and she went after her lovers, and fo
611,come to pass in the day that the LORD shall give thee rest from thy sorrow, and from thy fear, and from the hard bondage wherein thou wast made to serve, 
That thou shalt take up this proverb against the king of Babylon, and say, How hath the oppressor ceased! the golden city ceased! 
The LORD hath broken the staff of the wicked, and the sceptre of the rulers. 
He who smote the people in wrath with a continual stroke, he that ruled the nations in anger, is persecuted, and none hindereth. 
The whole earth is at rest, and is quiet: they break forth into singing. 
Yea, the fir trees rejoice at thee, and the
714,a great multitude about them, and the scribes questioning with them. 
And straightway all the people, when they beheld him, were greatly amazed, and running to him saluted him. 
And he asked the scribes, What question ye with them? 
And one of the multitude answered and said, Master, I have brought unto thee my son, which hath a dumb spirit; 
And wheresoever he taketh him, he teareth him: and he foameth, and gnasheth with his teeth, and pineth away: and I spake to thy disciples that they should cast him out; and they could not. 
He answereth him, and saith, O faithless generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me. 
And they brought him unto him: and when he saw 
543, lieth in wait as for a prey, and increaseth the transgressors among men. 
Who hath woe? who hath sorrow? who hath contentions? who hath babbling? who hath wounds without cause? who hath redness of eyes? 
They that tarry long at the wine; they that go to seek mixed wine. 
Look not thou upon the wine when it is red, when it giveth his colour in the cup, when it moveth itself aright. 
At the last it biteth like a serpent, and stingeth like an adder. 
Thine eyes shall behold strange women, and thine heart shall utter perverse things. 
Yea, 
528,rry thee away into captivity: he will visit thine iniquity, O daughter of Edom; he will discover thy sins. 
Remember, O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our reproach. 
Our inheritance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens. 
We are orphans and fatherless, our mothers are as widows. 
We have drunken our water for money; our wood is sold unto us. 
Our necks are under persecution: we labour, and have no rest. 
We have given the hand to the Egyptians, and to the Assyrians, to be satisfied with bread. 
Our
515,And they shall scourge him, and put him to death: and the third day he shall rise again. 
And they understood none of these things: and this saying was hid from them, neither knew they the things which were spoken. 
And it came to pass, that as he was come nigh unto Jericho, a certain blind man sat by the way side begging: 
And hearing the multitude pass by, he asked what it meant. 
And they told him, that Jesus of Nazareth passeth by. 
And he cried, saying, Jesus, thou son of David, have mercy on me. 
And the
647,off. 
When Israel was a child, then I loved him, and called my son out of Egypt. 
As they called them, so they went from them: they sacrificed unto Baalim, and burned incense to graven images. 
I taught Ephraim also to go, taking them by their arms; but they knew not that I healed them. 
I drew them with cords of a man, with bands of love: and I was to them as they that take off the yoke on their jaws, and I laid meat unto them. 
He shall not return into the land of Egypt, and the Assyrian shall be his king, because they refused to return. 
And the sword shall abide on his cities, and shall consume his branches, and devour them, because of
595,Aaron and to his sons from among the children of Israel, to do the service of the children of Israel in the tabernacle of the congregation, and to make an atonement for the children of Israel: that there be no plague among the children of Israel, when the children of Israel come nigh unto the sanctuary. 
And Moses, and Aaron, and all the congregation of the children of Israel, did to the Levites according unto all that the LORD commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did the children of Israel unto them. 
And the Levites were purified, and they washed their clothes; and Aaron offered t
707, plainly read before me. 
And I commanded, and search hath been made, and it is found that this city of old time hath made insurrection against kings, and that rebellion and sedition have been made therein. 
There have been mighty kings also over Jerusalem, which have ruled over all countries beyond the river; and toll, tribute, and custom, was paid unto them. 
Give ye now commandment to cause these men to cease, and that this city be not builded, until another commandment shall be given from me. 
Take heed now that ye fail not to do this: why should damage grow to the hurt of the kings? 
Now when the copy of king Artaxerxes' letter was read before Rehum, and Shimshai the scribe, and their companio
633,ever therefore shall be ashamed of me and of my words in this adulterous and sinful generation; of him also shall the Son of man be ashamed, when he cometh in the glory of his Father with the holy angels. 
And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, That there be some of them that stand here, which shall not taste of death, till they have seen the kingdom of God come with power. 
And after six days Jesus taketh with him Peter, and James, and John, and leadeth them up into an high mountain apart by themselves: and he was transfigured before them. 
And his raiment became shining, exceeding white as snow; so as no fuller on ea
643,iel the son of Ocran. 
Of Gad; Eliasaph the son of Deuel. 
Of Naphtali; Ahira the son of Enan. 
These were the renowned of the congregation, princes of the tribes of their fathers, heads of thousands in Israel. 
And Moses and Aaron took these men which are expressed by their names: 
And they assembled all the congregation together on the first day of the second month, and they declared their pedigrees after their families, by the house of their fathers, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old and upward, by their polls. 
As the LORD commanded Moses, so he numbered them in the wilderness of Sinai. 
And the children o
488,law of Moses, that ye turn not aside therefrom to the right hand or to the left; 
That ye come not among these nations, these that remain among you; neither make mention of the name of their gods, nor cause to swear by them, neither serve them, nor bow yourselves unto them: 
But cleave unto the LORD your God, as ye have done unto this day. 
For the LORD hath driven out from before you great nations and strong: but as for you, no man hath been able to stand before you unto this day. 

657,srael from Egypt: these are that Moses and Aaron. 
And it came to pass on the day when the LORD spake unto Moses in the land of Egypt, 
That the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, I am the LORD: speak thou unto Pharaoh king of Egypt all that I say unto thee. 
And Moses said before the LORD, Behold, I am of uncircumcised lips, and how shall Pharaoh hearken unto me? 
And the LORD said unto Moses, See, I have made thee a god to Pharaoh: and Aaron thy brother shall be thy prophet. 
Thou shalt speak all that I command thee: and Aaron thy brother shall speak unto Pharaoh, that he send the children of Israel out of his land. 
And I will harden Pharaoh's heart,
582,ave power to shut heaven, that it rain not in the days of their prophecy: and have power over waters to turn them to blood, and to smite the earth with all plagues, as often as they will. 
And when they shall have finished their testimony, the beast that ascendeth out of the bottomless pit shall make war against them, and shall overcome them, and kill them. 
And their dead bodies shall lie in the street of the great city, which spiritually is called Sodom and Egypt, where also our Lord was crucified. 
And they of the people and kindreds and tongues and nations shall see their
514,d Jesus unto them plainly, Lazarus is dead. 
And I am glad for your sakes that I was not there, to the intent ye may believe; nevertheless let us go unto him. 
Then said Thomas, which is called Didymus, unto his fellowdisciples, Let us also go, that we may die with him. 
Then when Jesus came, he found that he had lain in the grave four days already. 
Now Bethany was nigh unto Jerusalem, about fifteen furlongs off: 
And many of the Jews came to Martha and Mary, to comfort them concerning their brother. 
Then M
641,om the rising of the sun even unto the going down of the same my name shall be great among the Gentiles; and in every place incense shall be offered unto my name, and a pure offering: for my name shall be great among the heathen, saith the LORD of hosts. 
But ye have profaned it, in that ye say, The table of the LORD is polluted; and the fruit thereof, even his meat, is contemptible. 
Ye said also, Behold, what a weariness is it! and ye have snuffed at it, saith the LORD of hosts; and ye brought that which was torn, and the lame, and the sick; thus ye brought an offering: should I accept this of your hand? saith the LORD. 
But cursed
567,hill. 
And the Amorites, which dwelt in that mountain, came out against you, and chased you, as bees do, and destroyed you in Seir, even unto Hormah. 
And ye returned and wept before the LORD; but the LORD would not hearken to your voice, nor give ear unto you. 
So ye abode in Kadesh many days, according unto the days that ye abode there. 
Then we turned, and took our journey into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea, as the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount Seir many days. 
And the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Ye have compassed this mountain long 
515,hich hath sent to reproach the living God. 
Of a truth, LORD, the kings of Assyria have laid waste all the nations, and their countries, 
And have cast their gods into the fire: for they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and stone: therefore they have destroyed them. 
Now therefore, O LORD our God, save us from his hand, that all the kingdoms of the earth may know that thou art the LORD, even thou only. 
Then Isaiah the son of Amoz sent unto Hezekiah, saying, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Wh
615,t from God, whose name was John. 
The same came for a witness, to bear witness of the Light, that all men through him might believe. 
He was not that Light, but was sent to bear witness of that Light. 
That was the true Light, which lighteth every man that cometh into the world. 
He was in the world, and the world was made by him, and the world knew him not. 
He came unto his own, and his own received him not. 
But as many as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even to them that believe on his name: 
Which were born, not of blood, nor of the will of the flesh, nor of the will of ma
673, of the field multiply against thee. 
By little and little I will drive them out from before thee, until thou be increased, and inherit the land. 
And I will set thy bounds from the Red sea even unto the sea of the Philistines, and from the desert unto the river: for I will deliver the inhabitants of the land into your hand; and thou shalt drive them out before thee. 
Thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor with their gods. 
They shall not dwell in thy land, lest they make thee sin against me: for if thou serve their gods, it will surely be a snare unto thee. 
And he said unto Moses, Come up unto the LORD, thou, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of the el
689, Go up and possess the land which I have given you; then ye rebelled against the commandment of the LORD your God, and ye believed him not, nor hearkened to his voice. 
Ye have been rebellious against the LORD from the day that I knew you. 
Thus I fell down before the LORD forty days and forty nights, as I fell down at the first; because the LORD had said he would destroy you. 
I prayed therefore unto the LORD, and said, O Lord GOD, destroy not thy people and thine inheritance, which thou hast redeemed through thy greatness, which thou hast brought forth out of Egypt with a mighty hand. 
Remember thy servants, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob; look not unto the stubbornness of this peopl
696,eremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah: and Baruch wrote from the mouth of Jeremiah all the words of the LORD, which he had spoken unto him, upon a roll of a book. 
And Jeremiah commanded Baruch, saying, I am shut up; I cannot go into the house of the LORD: 
Therefore go thou, and read in the roll, which thou hast written from my mouth, the words of the LORD in the ears of the people in the LORD's house upon the fasting day: and also thou shalt read them in the ears of all Judah that come out of their cities. 
It may be they will present their supplication before the LORD, and will return every one from his evil way: for great is the anger and the fury that the LORD hath pronounced agai
639,hou art mindful of him? or the son of man that thou visitest him? 
Thou madest him a little lower than the angels; thou crownedst him with glory and honour, and didst set him over the works of thy hands: 
Thou hast put all things in subjection under his feet. For in that he put all in subjection under him, he left nothing that is not put under him. But now we see not yet all things put under him. 
But we see Jesus, who was made a little lower than the angels for the suffering of death, crowned with glory and honour; that he by the grace of God should taste death for every man. 
For it became him, for whom are all things, and by who
675,y mountain and island were moved out of their places. 
And the kings of the earth, and the great men, and the rich men, and the chief captains, and the mighty men, and every bondman, and every free man, hid themselves in the dens and in the rocks of the mountains; 
And said to the mountains and rocks, Fall on us, and hide us from the face of him that sitteth on the throne, and from the wrath of the Lamb: 
For the great day of his wrath is come; and who shall be able to stand? 
And after these things I saw four angels standing on the four corners of the earth, holding the four winds of the earth, that the wind should not blow on the earth, nor on the sea, nor on any t
664,s unto him: neither can he know them, because they are spiritually discerned. 
But he that is spiritual judgeth all things, yet he himself is judged of no man. 
For who hath known the mind of the Lord, that he may instruct him? but we have the mind of Christ. 
And I, brethren, could not speak unto you as unto spiritual, but as unto carnal, even as unto babes in Christ. 
I have fed you with milk, and not with meat: for hitherto ye were not able to bear it, neither yet now are ye able. 
For ye are yet carnal: for whereas there is among you envying, and strife, and divisions, are ye not carnal, and walk as men? 
For while one saith, I am of Paul; and another,
635,but he that shall endure unto the end, the same shall be saved. 
But when ye shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of by Daniel the prophet, standing where it ought not, (let him that readeth understand,) then let them that be in Judaea flee to the mountains: 
And let him that is on the housetop not go down into the house, neither enter therein, to take any thing out of his house: 
And let him that is in the field not turn back again for to take up his garment. 
But woe to them that are with child, and to them that give suck in those days! 
And pray ye that your flight be not in the winter. 
For in those days shall be
708,of kings, to open before him the two leaved gates; and the gates shall not be shut; 
I will go before thee, and make the crooked places straight: I will break in pieces the gates of brass, and cut in sunder the bars of iron: 
And I will give thee the treasures of darkness, and hidden riches of secret places, that thou mayest know that I, the LORD, which call thee by thy name, am the God of Israel. 
For Jacob my servant's sake, and Israel mine elect, I have even called thee by thy name: I have surnamed thee, though thou hast not known me. 
I am the LORD, and there is none else, there is no God beside me: I girded thee, though thou hast not known me: 
That they may know from the rising of the sun, and
592,peth it in till afterwards. 
If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked. 
The poor and the deceitful man meet together: the LORD lighteneth both their eyes. 
The king that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be established for ever. 
The rod and reproof give wisdom: but a child left to himself bringeth his mother to shame. 
When the wicked are multiplied, transgression increaseth: but the righteous shall see their fall. 
Correct thy son, and he shall give thee rest; yea, he shall give delight unto thy soul. 
Where there is no vision, the people perish: but he tha
518,e power of the lions. 
So this Daniel prospered in the reign of Darius, and in the reign of Cyrus the Persian. 
In the first year of Belshazzar king of Babylon Daniel had a dream and visions of his head upon his bed: then he wrote the dream, and told the sum of the matters. 
Daniel spake and said, I saw in my vision by night, and, behold, the four winds of the heaven strove upon the great sea. 
And four great beasts came up from the sea, diverse one from another. 
The first was like a lion, and had eagle's wings:
568,ith you, that I may thrust out all your right eyes, and lay it for a reproach upon all Israel. 
And the elders of Jabesh said unto him, Give us seven days' respite, that we may send messengers unto all the coasts of Israel: and then, if there be no man to save us, we will come out to thee. 
Then came the messengers to Gibeah of Saul, and told the tidings in the ears of the people: and all the people lifted up their voices, and wept. 
And, behold, Saul came after the herd out of the field; and Saul said, What aileth the people that they weep? And they told him th
641,th our old, with our sons and with our daughters, with our flocks and with our herds will we go; for we must hold a feast unto the LORD. 
And he said unto them, Let the LORD be so with you, as I will let you go, and your little ones: look to it; for evil is before you. 
Not so: go now ye that are men, and serve the LORD; for that ye did desire. And they were driven out from Pharaoh's presence. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Stretch out thine hand over the land of Egypt for the locusts, that they may come up upon the land of Egypt, and eat every herb of the land, even all that the hail hath left. 
And Moses stretched forth his rod ove
719, be rooted out of it. 
My son, forget not my law; but let thine heart keep my commandments: 
For length of days, and long life, and peace, shall they add to thee. 
Let not mercy and truth forsake thee: bind them about thy neck; write them upon the table of thine heart: 
So shalt thou find favour and good understanding in the sight of God and man. 
Trust in the LORD with all thine heart; and lean not unto thine own understanding. 
In all thy ways acknowledge him, and he shall direct thy paths. 
Be not wise in thine own eyes: fear the LORD, and depart from evil. 
It shall be health to thy navel, and marrow to thy bones. 
Honour the LORD with thy substance, and with the firstfruits of all thine increase: 
So shal
525,t and desolation, with the cup of thy sister Samaria. 
Thou shalt even drink it and suck it out, and thou shalt break the sherds thereof, and pluck off thine own breasts: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast forgotten me, and cast me behind thy back, therefore bear thou also thy lewdness and thy whoredoms. 
The LORD said moreover unto me; Son of man, wilt thou judge Aholah and Aholibah? yea, declare unto them their abominations; 
That they have committed adulter
680,her, and filled twelve baskets with the fragments of the five barley loaves, which remained over and above unto them that had eaten. 
Then those men, when they had seen the miracle that Jesus did, said, This is of a truth that prophet that should come into the world. 
When Jesus therefore perceived that they would come and take him by force, to make him a king, he departed again into a mountain himself alone. 
And when even was now come, his disciples went down unto the sea, 
And entered into a ship, and went over the sea toward Capernaum. And it was now dark, and Jesus was not come to them. 
And the sea arose by reason of a great wind that blew. 
So when they had rowed a
597,give ear unto the law of our God, ye people of Gomorrah. 
To what purpose is the multitude of your sacrifices unto me? saith the LORD: I am full of the burnt offerings of rams, and the fat of fed beasts; and I delight not in the blood of bullocks, or of lambs, or of he goats. 
When ye come to appear before me, who hath required this at your hand, to tread my courts? 
Bring no more vain oblations; incense is an abomination unto me; the new moons and sabbaths, the calling of assemblies, I cannot away with; it is iniquity, even the solemn meeting. 
Your new moons and your appointed feasts my s
602,ey sent and called him. So Jeroboam and all Israel came and spake to Rehoboam, saying, 
Thy father made our yoke grievous: now therefore ease thou somewhat the grievous servitude of thy father, and his heavy yoke that he put upon us, and we will serve thee. 
And he said unto them, Come again unto me after three days. And the people departed. 
And king Rehoboam took counsel with the old men that had stood before Solomon his father while he yet lived, saying, What counsel give ye me to return answer to this people? 
And they spake unto him, saying, If thou be kind to this people, and please them, 
718,y God shall keep unto thee the covenant and the mercy which he sware unto thy fathers: 
And he will love thee, and bless thee, and multiply thee: he will also bless the fruit of thy womb, and the fruit of thy land, thy corn, and thy wine, and thine oil, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks of thy sheep, in the land which he sware unto thy fathers to give thee. 
Thou shalt be blessed above all people: there shall not be male or female barren among you, or among your cattle. 
And the LORD will take away from thee all sickness, and will put none of the evil diseases of Egypt, which thou knowest, upon thee; but will lay them upon all them that hate thee. 
And thou shalt consume all the people which the LORD t
558,ot my lord, I pray thee, regard this man of Belial, even Nabal: for as his name is, so is he; Nabal is his name, and folly is with him: but I thine handmaid saw not the young men of my lord, whom thou didst send. 
Now therefore, my lord, as the LORD liveth, and as thy soul liveth, seeing the LORD hath withholden thee from coming to shed blood, and from avenging thyself with thine own hand, now let thine enemies, and they that seek evil to my lord, be as Nabal. 
And now this blessing which thine handmaid hath brought unto my lord, let it even be given u
653, to the pleadings of my lips. 
Will ye speak wickedly for God? and talk deceitfully for him? 
Will ye accept his person? will ye contend for God? 
Is it good that he should search you out? or as one man mocketh another, do ye so mock him? 
He will surely reprove you, if ye do secretly accept persons. 
Shall not his excellency make you afraid? and his dread fall upon you? 
Your remembrances are like unto ashes, your bodies to bodies of clay. 
Hold your peace, let me alone, that I may speak, and let come on me what will. 
Wherefore do I take my flesh in my teeth, and put my life in mine hand? 
Though he slay me, yet will I trust in him: but I will
526,n that thing; 
Saying, The Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be slain, and be raised the third day. 
And he said to them all, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross daily, and follow me. 
For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: but whosoever will lose his life for my sake, the same shall save it. 
For what is a man advantaged, if he gain the whole world, and lose himself, or be cast away? 
For whosoever shall be
493,ning, and went forth into the wilderness of Tekoa: and as they went forth, Jehoshaphat stood and said, Hear me, O Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem; Believe in the LORD your God, so shall ye be established; believe his prophets, so shall ye prosper. 
And when he had consulted with the people, he appointed singers unto the LORD, and that should praise the beauty of holiness, as they went out before the army, and to say, Praise the LORD; for his mercy endureth for ever. 
And when they 
574,lders of Israel, and said unto them, Draw out and take you a lamb according to your families, and kill the passover. 
And ye shall take a bunch of hyssop, and dip it in the blood that is in the bason, and strike the lintel and the two side posts with the blood that is in the bason; and none of you shall go out at the door of his house until the morning. 
For the LORD will pass through to smite the Egyptians; and when he seeth the blood upon the lintel, and on the two side posts, the LORD will pass over the door, and will not suffer the destroyer to come in unto your h
716, went over Jordan in the first month, when it had overflown all his banks; and they put to flight all them of the valleys, both toward the east, and toward the west. 
And there came of the children of Benjamin and Judah to the hold unto David. 
And David went out to meet them, and answered and said unto them, If ye be come peaceably unto me to help me, mine heart shall be knit unto you: but if ye be come to betray me to mine enemies, seeing there is no wrong in mine hands, the God of our fathers look thereon, and rebuke it. 
Then the spirit came upon Amasai, who was chief of the captains, and he said, Thine are we, David, and on thy side, thou son of Jesse: peace, peace be unto thee, and peace be to thine h
517,urn their sons and their daughters in the fire; which I commanded them not, neither came it into my heart. 
Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall no more be called Tophet, nor the valley of the son of Hinnom, but the valley of slaughter: for they shall bury in Tophet, till there be no place. 
And the carcases of this people shall be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for the beasts of the earth; and none shall fray them away. 
Then will I cause to cease from the cities of Judah, and 
660,give, if ye have ought against any: that your Father also which is in heaven may forgive you your trespasses. 
But if ye do not forgive, neither will your Father which is in heaven forgive your trespasses. 
And they come again to Jerusalem: and as he was walking in the temple, there come to him the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders, 
And say unto him, By what authority doest thou these things? and who gave thee this authority to do these things? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, I will also ask of you one question, and answer me, and I will tell you by what authority I do these things. 
The baptism of John, was it from heaven, or of 
699,Accad, and Calneh, in the land of Shinar. 
Out of that land went forth Asshur, and builded Nineveh, and the city Rehoboth, and Calah, 
And Resen between Nineveh and Calah: the same is a great city. 
And Mizraim begat Ludim, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim, 
And Pathrusim, and Casluhim, (out of whom came Philistim,) and Caphtorim. 
And Canaan begat Sidon his first born, and Heth, 
And the Jebusite, and the Amorite, and the Girgasite, 
And the Hivite, and the Arkite, and the Sinite, 
And the Arvadite, and the Zemarite, and the Hamathite: and afterward were the families of the Canaanites spread abroad. 
And the border of the Canaanites was from Sidon, as thou comest to Gerar, unto Gaza;
485,o this. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning the king of Assyria, He shall not come into this city, nor shoot an arrow there, nor come before it with shields, nor cast a bank against it. 
By the way that he came, by the same shall he return, and shall not come into this city, saith the LORD. 
For I will defend this city to save it for mine own sake, and for my servant David's sake. 
Then the angel of the LORD went forth, and smote in the camp of the Assyrians a hundred and fo
573,e in the vines; the labour of the olive shall fail, and the fields shall yield no meat; the flock shall be cut off from the fold, and there shall be no herd in the stalls: 
Yet I will rejoice in the LORD, I will joy in the God of my salvation. 
The LORD God is my strength, and he will make my feet like hinds' feet, and he will make me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief singer on my stringed instruments. 
The word of the LORD which came unto Zephaniah the son of Cushi, the son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the son of Hizkiah, in the days of Josiah the son 
588,those things which are before, 
I press toward the mark for the prize of the high calling of God in Christ Jesus. 
Let us therefore, as many as be perfect, be thus minded: and if in any thing ye be otherwise minded, God shall reveal even this unto you. 
Nevertheless, whereto we have already attained, let us walk by the same rule, let us mind the same thing. 
Brethren, be followers together of me, and mark them which walk so as ye have us for an ensample. 
(For many walk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that they are the enemies of the cross of Christ: 
710, them; and the upright shall have dominion over them in the morning; and their beauty shall consume in the grave from their dwelling. 
But God will redeem my soul from the power of the grave: for he shall receive me. Selah. 
Be not thou afraid when one is made rich, when the glory of his house is increased; 
For when he dieth he shall carry nothing away: his glory shall not descend after him. 
Though while he lived he blessed his soul: and men will praise thee, when thou doest well to thyself. 
He shall go to the generation of his fathers; they shall never see light. 
Man that is in honour, and understandeth not, is like the beasts that perish. 
The mighty God, even the LORD, hath spoken, and called t
542,regarded; 
But ye have set at nought all my counsel, and would none of my reproof: 
I also will laugh at your calamity; I will mock when your fear cometh; 
When your fear cometh as desolation, and your destruction cometh as a whirlwind; when distress and anguish cometh upon you. 
Then shall they call upon me, but I will not answer; they shall seek me early, but they shall not find me: 
For that they hated knowledge, and did not choose the fear of the LORD: 
They would none of my counsel: they despised all my reproof. 
Therefore shall th
534,usalem, and their rulers, because they knew him not, nor yet the voices of the prophets which are read every sabbath day, they have fulfilled them in condemning him. 
And though they found no cause of death in him, yet desired they Pilate that he should be slain. 
And when they had fulfilled all that was written of him, they took him down from the tree, and laid him in a sepulchre. 
But God raised him from the dead: 
And he was seen many days of them which came up with him from Galilee to Jerusalem, who are his witnesses unto th
561,eyes are in his head; but the fool walketh in darkness: and I myself perceived also that one event happeneth to them all. 
Then said I in my heart, As it happeneth to the fool, so it happeneth even to me; and why was I then more wise? Then I said in my heart, that this also is vanity. 
For there is no remembrance of the wise more than of the fool for ever; seeing that which now is in the days to come shall all be forgotten. And how dieth the wise man? as the fool. 
Therefore I hated life; because the work that is wrought under the sun is grievous unto me:
567,ast, a people great, and many, and tall, as the Anakims; 
Which also were accounted giants, as the Anakims; but the Moabites called them Emims. 
The Horims also dwelt in Seir beforetime; but the children of Esau succeeded them, when they had destroyed them from before them, and dwelt in their stead; as Israel did unto the land of his possession, which the LORD gave unto them. 
Now rise up, said I, and get you over the brook Zered. And we went over the brook Zered. 
And the space in which we came from Kadeshbarnea, until we were come over the brook Zered, was th
631,l the vessels thereof, and all that serveth thereto, 
And the pillars of the court round about, and their sockets, and their pins, and their cords. 
But those that encamp before the tabernacle toward the east, even before the tabernacle of the congregation eastward, shall be Moses, and Aaron and his sons, keeping the charge of the sanctuary for the charge of the children of Israel; and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
All that were numbered of the Levites, which Moses and Aaron numbered at the commandment of the LORD, throughout their families, all the males from a month old and upward, were twenty and 
594,in thee shall all families of the earth be blessed. 
So Abram departed, as the LORD had spoken unto him; and Lot went with him: and Abram was seventy and five years old when he departed out of Haran. 
And Abram took Sarai his wife, and Lot his brother's son, and all their substance that they had gathered, and the souls that they had gotten in Haran; and they went forth to go into the land of Canaan; and into the land of Canaan they came. 
And Abram passed through the land unto the place of Sichem, unto the plain of Moreh. And the Canaanite was then in the land. 
And the LORD appeared unt
686, graved cherubims, lions, and palm trees, according to the proportion of every one, and additions round about. 
After this manner he made the ten bases: all of them had one casting, one measure, and one size. 
Then made he ten lavers of brass: one laver contained forty baths: and every laver was four cubits: and upon every one of the ten bases one laver. 
And he put five bases on the right side of the house, and five on the left side of the house: and he set the sea on the right side of the house eastward over against the south. 
And Hiram made the lavers, and the shovels, and the basons. So Hiram made an end of doing all the work that he made king Solomon for the house of the 
516,d if that servant say in his heart, My lord delayeth his coming; and shall begin to beat the menservants and maidens, and to eat and drink, and to be drunken; 
The lord of that servant will come in a day when he looketh not for him, and at an hour when he is not aware, and will cut him in sunder, and will appoint him his portion with the unbelievers. 
And that servant, which knew his lord's will, and prepared not himself, neither did according to his will, shall be beaten with many stripes. 
But he that knew no
654, Micaiah said, Behold, thou shalt see in that day, when thou shalt go into an inner chamber to hide thyself. 
And the king of Israel said, Take Micaiah, and carry him back unto Amon the governor of the city, and to Joash the king's son; 
And say, Thus saith the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed him with bread of affliction and with water of affliction, until I come in peace. 
And Micaiah said, If thou return at all in peace, the LORD hath not spoken by me. And he said, Hearken, O people, every one of you. 
So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up to Ramothgilead. 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, I 
587,mong which thou art shall see the work of the LORD: for it is a terrible thing that I will do with thee. 
Observe thou that which I command thee this day: behold, I drive out before thee the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite. 
Take heed to thyself, lest thou make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land whither thou goest, lest it be for a snare in the midst of thee: 
But ye shall destroy their altars, break their images, and cut down their groves: 
For thou shalt worship no other god: for the LORD, whose name is Je
678,arite, Eliphal the son of Ur, 
Hepher the Mecherathite, Ahijah the Pelonite, 
Hezro the Carmelite, Naarai the son of Ezbai, 
Joel the brother of Nathan, Mibhar the son of Haggeri, 
Zelek the Ammonite, Naharai the Berothite, the armourbearer of Joab the son of Zeruiah, 
Ira the Ithrite, Gareb the Ithrite, 
Uriah the Hittite, Zabad the son of Ahlai, 
Adina the son of Shiza the Reubenite, a captain of the Reubenites, and thirty with him, 
Hanan the son of Maachah, and Joshaphat the Mithnite, 
Uzzia the Ashterathite, Shama and Jehiel the sons of Hothan the Aroerite, 
Jediael the son of Shimri, and Joha his brother, the Tizite, 
Eliel the Mahavite, and Jeribai, and Joshaviah
551,, son of man, prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD concerning the Ammonites, and concerning their reproach; even say thou, The sword, the sword is drawn: for the slaughter it is furbished, to consume because of the glittering: 
Whiles they see vanity unto thee, whiles they divine a lie unto thee, to bring thee upon the necks of them that are slain, of the wicked, whose day is come, when their iniquity shall have an end. 
Shall I cause it to return into his sheath? I will judge thee in the place where thou wast created, in the land of thy na
640, whom the world is crucified unto me, and I unto the world. 
For in Christ Jesus neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor uncircumcision, but a new creature. 
And as many as walk according to this rule, peace be on them, and mercy, and upon the Israel of God. 
From henceforth let no man trouble me: for I bear in my body the marks of the Lord Jesus. 
Brethren, the grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, to the saints which are at Ephesus, and to the faithful in Christ Jesus: 
Grace be to you, and peace, from God our Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ. 
Bl
606, his hands to vex certain of the church. 
And he killed James the brother of John with the sword. 
And because he saw it pleased the Jews, he proceeded further to take Peter also. (Then were the days of unleavened bread.) 
And when he had apprehended him, he put him in prison, and delivered him to four quaternions of soldiers to keep him; intending after Easter to bring him forth to the people. 
Peter therefore was kept in prison: but prayer was made without ceasing of the church unto God for him. 
And when Herod would have brought him forth, the same night Peter was sleeping between two soldiers, b
681, him, he will be found of thee; but if thou forsake him, he will cast thee off for ever. 
Take heed now; for the LORD hath chosen thee to build an house for the sanctuary: be strong, and do it. 
Then David gave to Solomon his son the pattern of the porch, and of the houses thereof, and of the treasuries thereof, and of the upper chambers thereof, and of the inner parlours thereof, and of the place of the mercy seat, 
And the pattern of all that he had by the spirit, of the courts of the house of the LORD, and of all the chambers round about, of the treasuries of the house of God, and of the treasuries of the dedicated things: 
Also for the courses of the priests and the Le
604, the LORD said unto Moses, Stretch forth thine hand toward heaven, that there may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and upon beast, and upon every herb of the field, throughout the land of Egypt. 
And Moses stretched forth his rod toward heaven: and the LORD sent thunder and hail, and the fire ran along upon the ground; and the LORD rained hail upon the land of Egypt. 
So there was hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous, such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation. 
And the hail smote throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in the f
693,srael shall blossom and bud, and fill the face of the world with fruit. 
Hath he smitten him, as he smote those that smote him? or is he slain according to the slaughter of them that are slain by him? 
In measure, when it shooteth forth, thou wilt debate with it: he stayeth his rough wind in the day of the east wind. 
By this therefore shall the iniquity of Jacob be purged; and this is all the fruit to take away his sin; when he maketh all the stones of the altar as chalkstones that are beaten in sunder, the groves and images shall not stand up. 
Yet the defenced city shall be desolate, and the habitation forsaken, and left like a wilderness: there shall the calf feed, and there shall
674,a neighbour of thine, that is better than thou. 
And also the Strength of Israel will not lie nor repent: for he is not a man, that he should repent. 
Then he said, I have sinned: yet honour me now, I pray thee, before the elders of my people, and before Israel, and turn again with me, that I may worship the LORD thy God. 
So Samuel turned again after Saul; and Saul worshipped the LORD. 
Then said Samuel, Bring ye hither to me Agag the king of the Amalekites. And Agag came unto him delicately. And Agag said, Surely the bitterness of death is past. 
And Samuel said, As the sword hath made women childless, so shall thy mother be childless among women. And Samuel hewed
535,he was gone out into the porch, another maid saw him, and said unto them that were there, This fellow was also with Jesus of Nazareth. 
And again he denied with an oath, I do not know the man. 
And after a while came unto him they that stood by, and said to Peter, Surely thou also art one of them; for thy speech bewrayeth thee. 
Then began he to curse and to swear, saying, I know not the man. And immediately the cock crew. 
And Peter remembered the word of Jesus, which said unto him, Before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thric
532,t runneth to Ahava; and there abode we in tents three days: and I viewed the people, and the priests, and found there none of the sons of Levi. 
Then sent I for Eliezer, for Ariel, for Shemaiah, and for Elnathan, and for Jarib, and for Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for Zechariah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for Elnathan, men of understanding. 
And I sent them with commandment unto Iddo the chief at the place Casiphia, and I told them what they should say unto Iddo, and to his brethren the Nethinims, at 
526,the Holy Ghost, it shall not be forgiven him, neither in this world, neither in the world to come. 
Either make the tree good, and his fruit good; or else make the tree corrupt, and his fruit corrupt: for the tree is known by his fruit. 
O generation of vipers, how can ye, being evil, speak good things? for out of the abundance of the heart the mouth speaketh. 
A good man out of the good treasure of the heart bringeth forth good things: and an evil man out of the evil treasure bringeth forth evil things. 
But I say unto 
481,ore you: for they committed all these things, and therefore I abhorred them. 
But I have said unto you, Ye shall inherit their land, and I will give it unto you to possess it, a land that floweth with milk and honey: I am the LORD your God, which have separated you from other people. 
Ye shall therefore put difference between clean beasts and unclean, and between unclean fowls and clean: and ye shall not make your souls abominable by beast, or by fowl, or by any manner of livi
486,nd of giants. 
Jair the son of Manasseh took all the country of Argob unto the coasts of Geshuri and Maachathi; and called them after his own name, Bashanhavothjair, unto this day. 
And I gave Gilead unto Machir. 
And unto the Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead even unto the river Arnon half the valley, and the border even unto the river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 
The plain also, and Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth even unt
566,eprous man, he is unclean: the priest shall pronounce him utterly unclean; his plague is in his head. 
And the leper in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be rent, and his head bare, and he shall put a covering upon his upper lip, and shall cry, Unclean, unclean. 
All the days wherein the plague shall be in him he shall be defiled; he is unclean: he shall dwell alone; without the camp shall his habitation be. 
The garment also that the plague of leprosy is in, whether it be a woollen garment, or a linen garment; 
Whether it be in the warp, or woof; of linen
591,ed the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude. 
And before this, Eliashib the priest, having the oversight of the chamber of the house of our God, was allied unto Tobiah: 
And he had prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the meat offerings, the frankincense, and the vessels, and the tithes of the corn, the new wine, and the oil, which was commanded to be given to the Levites, and the singers, and the porters; and the offerings of the priests. 
But in all this time was not I
518, thou shalt rule over him. 
And Cain talked with Abel his brother: and it came to pass, when they were in the field, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him. 
And the LORD said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he said, I know not: Am I my brother's keeper? 
And he said, What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood crieth unto me from the ground. 
And now art thou cursed from the earth, which hath opened her mouth to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand; 
When thou tillest t
503,and compacted by that which every joint supplieth, according to the effectual working in the measure of every part, maketh increase of the body unto the edifying of itself in love. 
This I say therefore, and testify in the Lord, that ye henceforth walk not as other Gentiles walk, in the vanity of their mind, 
Having the understanding darkened, being alienated from the life of God through the ignorance that is in them, because of the blindness of their heart: 
Who being past feeling have given thems
497,cattle from our youth even until now, both we, and also our fathers: that ye may dwell in the land of Goshen; for every shepherd is an abomination unto the Egyptians. 
Then Joseph came and told Pharaoh, and said, My father and my brethren, and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have, are come out of the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land of Goshen. 
And he took some of his brethren, even five men, and presented them unto Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh said unto his brethre
625,eath; their blood shall be upon them. 
And if a man take a wife and her mother, it is wickedness: they shall be burnt with fire, both he and they; that there be no wickedness among you. 
And if a man lie with a beast, he shall surely be put to death: and ye shall slay the beast. 
And if a woman approach unto any beast, and lie down thereto, thou shalt kill the woman, and the beast: they shall surely be put to death; their blood shall be upon them. 
And if a man shall take his sister, his father's daughter, or his mother's daughter, and see her nakedness, and she see his nakedness; it is a wicked thing; and they shall 
562, hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be impossible unto you. 
Howbeit this kind goeth not out but by prayer and fasting. 
And while they abode in Galilee, Jesus said unto them, The Son of man shall be betrayed into the hands of men: 
And they shall kill him, and the third day he shall be raised again. And they were exceeding sorry. 
And when they were come to Capernaum, they that received tribute money came to Peter, and said, Doth not your master pay tribute? 
He saith, Yes. And when he was come into the house, Jesus prevented hi
611,Father, Jesus Christ the righteous: 
And he is the propitiation for our sins: and not for our's only, but also for the sins of the whole world. 
And hereby we do know that we know him, if we keep his commandments. 
He that saith, I know him, and keepeth not his commandments, is a liar, and the truth is not in him. 
But whoso keepeth his word, in him verily is the love of God perfected: hereby know we that we are in him. 
He that saith he abideth in him ought himself also so to walk, even as he walked. 
Brethren, I write no new commandment unto you, but an old commandment which ye had from the beginning. 
593,reof much, and in it was meat for all; under which the beasts of the field dwelt, and upon whose branches the fowls of the heaven had their habitation: 
It is thou, O king, that art grown and become strong: for thy greatness is grown, and reacheth unto heaven, and thy dominion to the end of the earth. 
And whereas the king saw a watcher and an holy one coming down from heaven, and saying, Hew the tree down, and destroy it; yet leave the stump of the roots thereof in the earth, even with a band of iron and brass, in the tender grass of the field; and let it be wet with the dew of heaven,
608, hast thou seen the doors of the shadow of death? 
Hast thou perceived the breadth of the earth? declare if thou knowest it all. 
Where is the way where light dwelleth? and as for darkness, where is the place thereof, 
That thou shouldest take it to the bound thereof, and that thou shouldest know the paths to the house thereof? 
Knowest thou it, because thou wast then born? or because the number of thy days is great? 
Hast thou entered into the treasures of the snow? or hast thou seen the treasures of the hail, 
Which I have reserved against the time of trouble, against the day of battle and war? 
By 
509,noweth us not, because it knew him not. 
Beloved, now are we the sons of God, and it doth not yet appear what we shall be: but we know that, when he shall appear, we shall be like him; for we shall see him as he is. 
And every man that hath this hope in him purifieth himself, even as he is pure. 
Whosoever committeth sin transgresseth also the law: for sin is the transgression of the law. 
And ye know that he was manifested to take away our sins; and in him is no sin. 
Whosoever abideth in him sinneth no
701,black. 
But let your communication be, Yea, yea; Nay, nay: for whatsoever is more than these cometh of evil. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a tooth for a tooth: 
But I say unto you, That ye resist not evil: but whosoever shall smite thee on thy right cheek, turn to him the other also. 
And if any man will sue thee at the law, and take away thy coat, let him have thy cloak also. 
And whosoever shall compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain. 
Give to him that asketh thee, and from him that would borrow of thee turn not thou away. 
Ye have heard that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy neighbour, and hate thine enemy. 
But I say unto you, Love your enemies, b
501,shall make the rain of thy land powder and dust: from heaven shall it come down upon thee, until thou be destroyed. 
The LORD shall cause thee to be smitten before thine enemies: thou shalt go out one way against them, and flee seven ways before them: and shalt be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth. 
And thy carcase shall be meat unto all fowls of the air, and unto the beasts of the earth, and no man shall fray them away. 
The LORD will smite thee with the botch of Egypt, and with the eme
712,build it: except the LORD keep the city, the watchman waketh but in vain. 
It is vain for you to rise up early, to sit up late, to eat the bread of sorrows: for so he giveth his beloved sleep. 
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the womb is his reward. 
As arrows are in the hand of a mighty man; so are children of the youth. 
Happy is the man that hath his quiver full of them: they shall not be ashamed, but they shall speak with the enemies in the gate. 
Blessed is every one that feareth the LORD; that walketh in his ways. 
For thou shalt eat the labour of thine hands: happy shalt thou be, and it shall be well with thee. 
Thy wife shall be as a fruitful vine by the sides of thine
631,d Heman, and Chalcol, and Darda, the sons of Mahol: and his fame was in all nations round about. 
And he spake three thousand proverbs: and his songs were a thousand and five. 
And he spake of trees, from the cedar tree that is in Lebanon even unto the hyssop that springeth out of the wall: he spake also of beasts, and of fowl, and of creeping things, and of fishes. 
And there came of all people to hear the wisdom of Solomon, from all kings of the earth, which had heard of his wisdom. 
And Hiram king of Tyre sent his servants unto Solomon; for he had heard that they had anointed him king in the room of his father: for Hiram
654,ing, Ye shall not serve the king of Babylon: 
For they prophesy a lie unto you, to remove you far from your land; and that I should drive you out, and ye should perish. 
But the nations that bring their neck under the yoke of the king of Babylon, and serve him, those will I let remain still in their own land, saith the LORD; and they shall till it, and dwell therein. 
I spake also to Zedekiah king of Judah according to all these words, saying, Bring your necks under the yoke of the king of Babylon, and serve him and his people, and live. 
Why will ye die, thou and thy people, by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence, as the LORD hath sp
531,r husband also, and he praiseth her. 
Many daughters have done virtuously, but thou excellest them all. 
Favour is deceitful, and beauty is vain: but a woman that feareth the LORD, she shall be praised. 
Give her of the fruit of her hands; and let her own works praise her in the gates. 
The words of the Preacher, the son of David, king in Jerusalem. 
Vanity of vanities, saith the Preacher, vanity of vanities; all is vanity. 
What profit hath a man of all his labour which he taketh under the sun? 
One generation passeth away, 
655,ring the meat into the chamber, that I may eat of thine hand. And Tamar took the cakes which she had made, and brought them into the chamber to Amnon her brother. 
And when she had brought them unto him to eat, he took hold of her, and said unto her, Come lie with me, my sister. 
And she answered him, Nay, my brother, do not force me; for no such thing ought to be done in Israel: do not thou this folly. 
And I, whither shall I cause my shame to go? and as for thee, thou shalt be as one of the fools in Israel. Now therefore, I pray thee, speak unto the king; for he will not withhold me from thee. 
Howbeit he would not hearken unto her voice: but, b
578,ses: but one witness shall not testify against any person to cause him to die. 
Moreover ye shall take no satisfaction for the life of a murderer, which is guilty of death: but he shall be surely put to death. 
And ye shall take no satisfaction for him that is fled to the city of his refuge, that he should come again to dwell in the land, until the death of the priest. 
So ye shall not pollute the land wherein ye are: for blood it defileth the land: and the land cannot be cleansed of the blood that is shed therein, but by the blood of him that shed it. 
Defile not therefo
551,her suburbs, 
Kedemoth with her suburbs, and Mephaath with her suburbs; four cities. 
And out of the tribe of Gad, Ramoth in Gilead with her suburbs, to be a city of refuge for the slayer; and Mahanaim with her suburbs, 
Heshbon with her suburbs, Jazer with her suburbs; four cities in all. 
So all the cities for the children of Merari by their families, which were remaining of the families of the Levites, were by their lot twelve cities. 
All the cities of the Levites within the possession of the children of Israel were forty and eight cities wi
492,r thy speech bewrayeth thee. 
Then began he to curse and to swear, saying, I know not the man. And immediately the cock crew. 
And Peter remembered the word of Jesus, which said unto him, Before the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice. And he went out, and wept bitterly. 
When the morning was come, all the chief priests and elders of the people took counsel against Jesus to put him to death: 
And when they had bound him, they led him away, and delivered him to Pontius Pilate the governo
498,ye perish; because ye would not be obedient unto the voice of the LORD your God. 
Hear, O Israel: Thou art to pass over Jordan this day, to go in to possess nations greater and mightier than thyself, cities great and fenced up to heaven, 
A people great and tall, the children of the Anakims, whom thou knowest, and of whom thou hast heard say, Who can stand before the children of Anak! 
Understand therefore this day, that the LORD thy God is he which goeth over before thee; as a consuming fire 
546, thou shalt not curse the people: for they are blessed. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and said unto the princes of Balak, Get you into your land: for the LORD refuseth to give me leave to go with you. 
And the princes of Moab rose up, and they went unto Balak, and said, Balaam refuseth to come with us. 
And Balak sent yet again princes, more, and more honourable than they. 
And they came to Balaam, and said to him, Thus saith Balak the son of Zippor, Let nothing, I pray thee, hinder thee from coming unto me: 
For I will promote thee u
524,the holy things of the LORD; then he shall bring for his trespass unto the LORD a ram without blemish out of the flocks, with thy estimation by shekels of silver, after the shekel of the sanctuary, for a trespass offering. 
And he shall make amends for the harm that he hath done in the holy thing, and shall add the fifth part thereto, and give it unto the priest: and the priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of the trespass offering, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if a soul sin, and commit any of thes
718,od in heaven that revealeth secrets, and maketh known to the king Nebuchadnezzar what shall be in the latter days. Thy dream, and the visions of thy head upon thy bed, are these; 
As for thee, O king, thy thoughts came into thy mind upon thy bed, what should come to pass hereafter: and he that revealeth secrets maketh known to thee what shall come to pass. 
But as for me, this secret is not revealed to me for any wisdom that I have more than any living, but for their sakes that shall make known the interpretation to the king, and that thou mightest know the thoughts of thy heart. 
Thou, O king, sawest, and behold a great image. This great image, whose brightness was excellent, stood before thee; and the form 
486, just bringeth forth wisdom: but the froward tongue shall be cut out. 
The lips of the righteous know what is acceptable: but the mouth of the wicked speaketh frowardness. 
A false balance is abomination to the LORD: but a just weight is his delight. 
When pride cometh, then cometh shame: but with the lowly is wisdom. 
The integrity of the upright shall guide them: but the perverseness of transgressors shall destroy them. 
Riches profit not in the day of wrath: but righteousness de
708,ob. Selah. 
Behold, O God our shield, and look upon the face of thine anointed. 
For a day in thy courts is better than a thousand. I had rather be a doorkeeper in the house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of wickedness. 
For the LORD God is a sun and shield: the LORD will give grace and glory: no good thing will he withhold from them that walk uprightly. 
O LORD of hosts, blessed is the man that trusteth in thee. 
Lord, thou hast been favourable unto thy land: thou hast brought back the captivity of Jacob. 
Thou hast forgiven the iniquity of thy people, thou hast covered all their sin. Selah. 
Thou hast taken away all thy wrath: thou hast turned thyself from the fierceness of thine anger. 
Tu
572, might buy corn, because of the dearth. 
There were also that said, We have borrowed money for the king's tribute, and that upon our lands and vineyards. 
Yet now our flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as their children: and, lo, we bring into bondage our sons and our daughters to be servants, and some of our daughters are brought unto bondage already: neither is it in our power to redeem them; for other men have our lands and vineyards. 
And I was very angry when I heard their cry and these words. 
Then I consulted with myself, and I rebuked the no
718,d the firstlings of thy herds and of thy flocks; that thou mayest learn to fear the LORD thy God always. 
And if the way be too long for thee, so that thou art not able to carry it; or if the place be too far from thee, which the LORD thy God shall choose to set his name there, when the LORD thy God hath blessed thee: 
Then shalt thou turn it into money, and bind up the money in thine hand, and shalt go unto the place which the LORD thy God shall choose: 
And thou shalt bestow that money for whatsoever thy soul lusteth after, for oxen, or for sheep, or for wine, or for strong drink, or for whatsoever thy soul desireth: and thou shalt eat there before the LORD thy God, and thou shalt rejoice, thou, and thine h
610,, saying, Thou shalt not eat of it: cursed is the ground for thy sake; in sorrow shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy life; 
Thorns also and thistles shall it bring forth to thee; and thou shalt eat the herb of the field; 
In the sweat of thy face shalt thou eat bread, till thou return unto the ground; for out of it wast thou taken: for dust thou art, and unto dust shalt thou return. 
And Adam called his wife's name Eve; because she was the mother of all living. 
Unto Adam also and to his wife did the LORD God make coats of skins, and clothed them. 
And the LORD God said, Behold, the man is become a
674,. 
These things speak, and exhort, and rebuke with all authority. Let no man despise thee. 
Put them in mind to be subject to principalities and powers, to obey magistrates, to be ready to every good work, 
To speak evil of no man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and envy, hateful, and hating one another. 
But after that the kindness and love of God our Saviour toward man appeared, 
Not by works of righteousness which we have done, but according to his mercy he saved us, by the washing of regeneration, and renew
497, Lord GOD will help me; therefore shall I not be confounded: therefore have I set my face like a flint, and I know that I shall not be ashamed. 
He is near that justifieth me; who will contend with me? let us stand together: who is mine adversary? let him come near to me. 
Behold, the Lord GOD will help me; who is he that shall condemn me? lo, they all shall wax old as a garment; the moth shall eat them up. 
Who is among you that feareth the LORD, that obeyeth the voice of his servant, that w
700,mount Ephraim with her suburbs; they gave also Gezer with her suburbs, 
And Jokmeam with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs, 
And Aijalon with her suburbs, and Gathrimmon with her suburbs: 
And out of the half tribe of Manasseh; Aner with her suburbs, and Bileam with her suburbs, for the family of the remnant of the sons of Kohath. 
Unto the sons of Gershom were given out of the family of the half tribe of Manasseh, Golan in Bashan with her suburbs, and Ashtaroth with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Issachar; Kedesh with her suburbs, Daberath with her suburbs, 
And Ramoth with her suburbs, and Anem with her suburbs: 
And out of the tribe of Asher; Mashal with her suburbs, and 
687,ng of Egypt called for the midwives, and said unto them, Why have ye done this thing, and have saved the men children alive? 
And the midwives said unto Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew women are not as the Egyptian women; for they are lively, and are delivered ere the midwives come in unto them. 
Therefore God dealt well with the midwives: and the people multiplied, and waxed very mighty. 
And it came to pass, because the midwives feared God, that he made them houses. 
And Pharaoh charged all his people, saying, Every son that is born ye shall cast into the river, and every daughter ye shall save alive. 
And there went a man of the house of Levi, and took to wife a daughter of Levi.
501,nd the Pharisees said unto him, Behold, why do they on the sabbath day that which is not lawful? 
And he said unto them, Have ye never read what David did, when he had need, and was an hungred, he, and they that were with him? 
How he went into the house of God in the days of Abiathar the high priest, and did eat the shewbread, which is not lawful to eat but for the priests, and gave also to them which were with him? 
And he said unto them, The sabbath was made for man, and not man for the sabbat
545, prepared a gourd, and made it to come up over Jonah, that it might be a shadow over his head, to deliver him from his grief. So Jonah was exceeding glad of the gourd. 
But God prepared a worm when the morning rose the next day, and it smote the gourd that it withered. 
And it came to pass, when the sun did arise, that God prepared a vehement east wind; and the sun beat upon the head of Jonah, that he fainted, and wished in himself to die, and said, It is better for me to die than to live. 
And God said to Jonah, Doest thou well to be angr
605,at can he have more but the kingdom? 
And Saul eyed David from that day and forward. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that the evil spirit from God came upon Saul, and he prophesied in the midst of the house: and David played with his hand, as at other times: and there was a javelin in Saul's hand. 
And Saul cast the javelin; for he said, I will smite David even to the wall with it. And David avoided out of his presence twice. 
And Saul was afraid of David, because the LORD was with him, and was departed from Saul. 
Therefore Saul removed him from him, and made him his captain over a thousand; a
592,e may abide with you for ever; 
Even the Spirit of truth; whom the world cannot receive, because it seeth him not, neither knoweth him: but ye know him; for he dwelleth with you, and shall be in you. 
I will not leave you comfortless: I will come to you. 
Yet a little while, and the world seeth me no more; but ye see me: because I live, ye shall live also. 
At that day ye shall know that I am in my Father, and ye in me, and I in you. 
He that hath my commandments, and keepeth them, he it is that loveth me: and he that loveth me shall be loved of my Father, and I will love him, and will
698, the court, and their cords, 
The cloths of service, to do service in the holy place, the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and the garments of his sons, to minister in the priest's office. 
And all the congregation of the children of Israel departed from the presence of Moses. 
And they came, every one whose heart stirred him up, and every one whom his spirit made willing, and they brought the LORD's offering to the work of the tabernacle of the congregation, and for all his service, and for the holy garments. 
And they came, both men and women, as many as were willing hearted, and brought bracelets, and earrings, and rings, and tablets, all jewels of gold: and every man that offered of
611, of life, which the Lord hath promised to them that love him. 
Let no man say when he is tempted, I am tempted of God: for God cannot be tempted with evil, neither tempteth he any man: 
But every man is tempted, when he is drawn away of his own lust, and enticed. 
Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin, when it is finished, bringeth forth death. 
Do not err, my beloved brethren. 
Every good gift and every perfect gift is from above, and cometh down from the Father of lights, with whom is no variableness, neither shadow of turning. 
Of his own will begat he us with the word of truth
681,ge to any man: how sayest thou, Ye shall be made free? 
Jesus answered them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Whosoever committeth sin is the servant of sin. 
And the servant abideth not in the house for ever: but the Son abideth ever. 
If the Son therefore shall make you free, ye shall be free indeed. 
I know that ye are Abraham's seed; but ye seek to kill me, because my word hath no place in you. 
I speak that which I have seen with my Father: and ye do that which ye have seen with your father. 
They answered and said unto him, Abraham is our father. Jesus saith unto them, If ye were Abraham's children, ye would do the works of Abraham. 
But now ye seek to kill me, a man 
706,dead body, or be in a journey afar off, yet he shall keep the passover unto the LORD. 
The fourteenth day of the second month at even they shall keep it, and eat it with unleavened bread and bitter herbs. 
They shall leave none of it unto the morning, nor break any bone of it: according to all the ordinances of the passover they shall keep it. 
But the man that is clean, and is not in a journey, and forbeareth to keep the passover, even the same soul shall be cut off from among his people: because he brought not the offering of the LORD in his appointed season, that man shall bear his sin. 
And if a stranger shall sojourn among you, and will keep the passover unto the LORD; according to the ordina
588,en: and then shall all the tribes of the earth mourn, and they shall see the Son of man coming in the clouds of heaven with power and great glory. 
And he shall send his angels with a great sound of a trumpet, and they shall gather together his elect from the four winds, from one end of heaven to the other. 
Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When his branch is yet tender, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is nigh: 
So likewise ye, when ye shall see all these things, know that it is near, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass, till 
662,der, and the house that is to be builded for the LORD must be exceeding magnifical, of fame and of glory throughout all countries: I will therefore now make preparation for it. So David prepared abundantly before his death. 
Then he called for Solomon his son, and charged him to build an house for the LORD God of Israel. 
And David said to Solomon, My son, as for me, it was in my mind to build an house unto the name of the LORD my God: 
But the word of the LORD came to me, saying, Thou hast shed blood abundantly, and hast made great wars: thou shalt not build an house unto my name, because thou hast shed much blood upon the earth in my sight. 
Behold, a 
512,o the poor; he hath sent me to heal the brokenhearted, to preach deliverance to the captives, and recovering of sight to the blind, to set at liberty them that are bruised, 
To preach the acceptable year of the Lord. 
And he closed the book, and he gave it again to the minister, and sat down. And the eyes of all them that were in the synagogue were fastened on him. 
And he began to say unto them, This day is this scripture fulfilled in your ears. 
And all bare him witness, and wondered at the gracious words
606,t of the children of Israel. 
And thou shalt appoint Aaron and his sons, and they shall wait on their priest's office: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
And I, behold, I have taken the Levites from among the children of Israel instead of all the firstborn that openeth the matrix among the children of Israel: therefore the Levites shall be mine; 
Because all the firstborn are mine; for on the day that I smote all the firstborn in the land of Egypt I hallowed unto me all the firstborn in Israel, both man and beast: mine shall they be: I a
486,so shall be in derision. 
For was not Israel a derision unto thee? was he found among thieves? for since thou spakest of him, thou skippedst for joy. 
O ye that dwell in Moab, leave the cities, and dwell in the rock, and be like the dove that maketh her nest in the sides of the hole's mouth. 
We have heard the pride of Moab, (he is exceeding proud) his loftiness, and his arrogancy, and his pride, and the haughtiness of his heart. 
I know his wrath, saith the LORD; but it shall not 
711,nd prayer. 
If thou put the brethren in remembrance of these things, thou shalt be a good minister of Jesus Christ, nourished up in the words of faith and of good doctrine, whereunto thou hast attained. 
But refuse profane and old wives' fables, and exercise thyself rather unto godliness. 
For bodily exercise profiteth little: but godliness is profitable unto all things, having promise of the life that now is, and of that which is to come. 
This is a faithful saying and worthy of all acceptation. 
For therefore we both labour and suffer reproach, because we trust in the living God, who is the Saviour of all men, specially of those that believe. 
These things command and teach. 
Let no man despise thy y
560,fore, that ye are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his coming only, but by the consolation wherewith he was comforted in you, when he told us your earnest d
529,to eat the bread of sorrows: for so he giveth his beloved sleep. 
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the womb is his reward. 
As arrows are in the hand of a mighty man; so are children of the youth. 
Happy is the man that hath his quiver full of them: they shall not be ashamed, but they shall speak with the enemies in the gate. 
Blessed is every one that feareth the LORD; that walketh in his ways. 
For thou shalt eat the labour of thine hands: happy shalt thou be, and it shall be well with thee. 
Thy
586, it is a shame for women to speak in the church. 
What? came the word of God out from you? or came it unto you only? 
If any man think himself to be a prophet, or spiritual, let him acknowledge that the things that I write unto you are the commandments of the Lord. 
But if any man be ignorant, let him be ignorant. 
Wherefore, brethren, covet to prophesy, and forbid not to speak with tongues. 
Let all things be done decently and in order. 
Moreover, brethren, I declare unto you the gospel which I preached unto you, which also ye have received, and wherein ye stand; 
By which also 
600,o me, Both drink thou, and I will also draw for thy camels: let the same be the woman whom the LORD hath appointed out for my master's son. 
And before I had done speaking in mine heart, behold, Rebekah came forth with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto the well, and drew water: and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray thee. 
And she made haste, and let down her pitcher from her shoulder, and said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank, and she made the camels drink also. 
And I asked her, and said, Whose daughter art thou? And she said, the daughter of Bet
550,wonders, great and sore, upon Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his household, before our eyes: 
And he brought us out from thence, that he might bring us in, to give us the land which he sware unto our fathers. 
And the LORD commanded us to do all these statutes, to fear the LORD our God, for our good always, that he might preserve us alive, as it is at this day. 
And it shall be our righteousness, if we observe to do all these commandments before the LORD our God, as he hath commanded us. 
When the LORD thy God shall bring thee into the land 
535,any creature that is not manifest in his sight: but all things are naked and opened unto the eyes of him with whom we have to do. 
Seeing then that we have a great high priest, that is passed into the heavens, Jesus the Son of God, let us hold fast our profession. 
For we have not an high priest which cannot be touched with the feeling of our infirmities; but was in all points tempted like as we are, yet without sin. 
Let us therefore come boldly unto the throne of grace, that we may obtain mercy, and find grace to help in time o
500, 
And I made an ark of shittim wood, and hewed two tables of stone like unto the first, and went up into the mount, having the two tables in mine hand. 
And he wrote on the tables, according to the first writing, the ten commandments, which the LORD spake unto you in the mount out of the midst of the fire in the day of the assembly: and the LORD gave them unto me. 
And I turned myself and came down from the mount, and put the tables in the ark which I had made; and there they be, as the LORD com
486,e one door, and two leaves for the other door. 
And there were made on them, on the doors of the temple, cherubims and palm trees, like as were made upon the walls; and there were thick planks upon the face of the porch without. 
And there were narrow windows and palm trees on the one side and on the other side, on the sides of the porch, and upon the side chambers of the house, and thick planks. 
Then he brought me forth into the utter court, the way toward the north: and he broug
675,ne, and bringest me into judgment with thee? 
Who can bring a clean thing out of an unclean? not one. 
Seeing his days are determined, the number of his months are with thee, thou hast appointed his bounds that he cannot pass; 
Turn from him, that he may rest, till he shall accomplish, as an hireling, his day. 
For there is hope of a tree, if it be cut down, that it will sprout again, and that the tender branch thereof will not cease. 
Though the root thereof wax old in the earth, and the stock thereof die in the ground; 
Yet through the scent of water it will bud, and bring forth boughs like a plant. 
But man dieth, and wasteth away: yea, man giveth up the ghost, an
521,heaven; till he knew that the most high God ruled in the kingdom of men, and that he appointeth over it whomsoever he will. 
And thou his son, O Belshazzar, hast not humbled thine heart, though thou knewest all this; 
But hast lifted up thyself against the Lord of heaven; and they have brought the vessels of his house before thee, and thou, and thy lords, thy wives, and thy concubines, have drunk wine in them; and thou hast praised the gods of silver, and gold, of brass, iron, wood, and stone, which see not, nor hea
661,ss, that tarrieth not for man, nor waiteth for the sons of men. 
And the remnant of Jacob shall be among the Gentiles in the midst of many people as a lion among the beasts of the forest, as a young lion among the flocks of sheep: who, if he go through, both treadeth down, and teareth in pieces, and none can deliver. 
Thine hand shall be lifted up upon thine adversaries, and all thine enemies shall be cut off. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD, that I will cut off thy horses out of the midst of thee, and I will destroy thy chariots: 
And I will cut off the cities of thy land, and throw down all thy strong holds: 
And I will cut off 
632,our Rock, even our enemies themselves being judges. 
For their vine is of the vine of Sodom, and of the fields of Gomorrah: their grapes are grapes of gall, their clusters are bitter: 
Their wine is the poison of dragons, and the cruel venom of asps. 
Is not this laid up in store with me, and sealed up among my treasures? 
To me belongeth vengeance and recompence; their foot shall slide in due time: for the day of their calamity is at hand, and the things that shall come upon them make haste. 
For the LORD shall judge his people, and repent himself for his servants, when he seeth that their power is gone, and there is none s
519,And brought the ass, and the colt, and put on them their clothes, and they set him thereon. 
And a very great multitude spread their garments in the way; others cut down branches from the trees, and strawed them in the way. 
And the multitudes that went before, and that followed, cried, saying, Hosanna to the son of David: Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord; Hosanna in the highest. 
And when he was come into Jerusalem, all the city was moved, saying, Who is this? 
And the multitude said, This is Jes
551,im, Because I said, Lest I die for her. 
And Abimelech said, What is this thou hast done unto us? one of the people might lightly have lien with thy wife, and thou shouldest have brought guiltiness upon us. 
And Abimelech charged all his people, saying, He that toucheth this man or his wife shall surely be put to death. 
Then Isaac sowed in that land, and received in the same year an hundredfold: and the LORD blessed him. 
And the man waxed great, and went forward, and grew until he became very great: 
For he had possession of flocks, and posses
519, and Zichri his son, and Shelomith his son. 
Which Shelomith and his brethren were over all the treasures of the dedicated things, which David the king, and the chief fathers, the captains over thousands and hundreds, and the captains of the host, had dedicated. 
Out of the spoils won in battles did they dedicate to maintain the house of the LORD. 
And all that Samuel the seer, and Saul the son of Kish, and Abner the son of Ner, and Joab the son of Zeruiah, had dedicated; and whosoever had dedicated any thing, it 
496, is understanding. 
Moreover Job continued his parable, and said, 
Oh that I were as in months past, as in the days when God preserved me; 
When his candle shined upon my head, and when by his light I walked through darkness; 
As I was in the days of my youth, when the secret of God was upon my tabernacle; 
When the Almighty was yet with me, when my children were about me; 
When I washed my steps with butter, and the rock poured me out rivers of oil; 
When I went out to the gate through the 
483, that day before thee. 
But I will deliver thee in that day, saith the LORD: and thou shalt not be given into the hand of the men of whom thou art afraid. 
For I will surely deliver thee, and thou shalt not fall by the sword, but thy life shall be for a prey unto thee: because thou hast put thy trust in me, saith the LORD. 
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD, after that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had let him go from Ramah, when he had taken him being bound in
686,ghbour's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his ox, nor his ass, nor any thing that is thy neighbour's. 
And all the people saw the thunderings, and the lightnings, and the noise of the trumpet, and the mountain smoking: and when the people saw it, they removed, and stood afar off. 
And they said unto Moses, Speak thou with us, and we will hear: but let not God speak with us, lest we die. 
And Moses said unto the people, Fear not: for God is come to prove you, and that his fear may be before your faces, that ye sin not. 
And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the thick darkness where God was. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Thus thou shalt say un
660,echem, and from the house of Millo, and devour Abimelech. 
And Jotham ran away, and fled, and went to Beer, and dwelt there, for fear of Abimelech his brother. 
When Abimelech had reigned three years over Israel, 
Then God sent an evil spirit between Abimelech and the men of Shechem; and the men of Shechem dealt treacherously with Abimelech: 
That the cruelty done to the threescore and ten sons of Jerubbaal might come, and their blood be laid upon Abimelech their brother, which slew them; and upon the men of Shechem, which aided him in the killing of his brethren. 
And the men of Shechem set liers in wait for him in the top of the mountains, and they r
694,ORD for a sweet savour: and the drink offering thereof shall be of wine, the fourth part of an hin. 
And ye shall eat neither bread, nor parched corn, nor green ears, until the selfsame day that ye have brought an offering unto your God: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
And ye shall count unto you from the morrow after the sabbath, from the day that ye brought the sheaf of the wave offering; seven sabbaths shall be complete: 
Even unto the morrow after the seventh sabbath shall ye number fifty days; and ye shall offer a new meat offering unto the LORD. 
Ye shall bring out of your habitations two wave loaves of two tenth deals; they shal
671,And Adonijah feared because of Solomon, and arose, and went, and caught hold on the horns of the altar. 
And it was told Solomon, saying, Behold, Adonijah feareth king Solomon: for, lo, he hath caught hold on the horns of the altar, saying, Let king Solomon swear unto me today that he will not slay his servant with the sword. 
And Solomon said, If he will shew himself a worthy man, there shall not an hair of him fall to the earth: but if wickedness shall be found in him, he shall die. 
So king Solomon sent, and they brought him down from the altar. And he came and bowed himself to king Solomon: and Solomon said unto him, Go to thine house. 
Now the days of David 
521,ed out arm, and with fury poured out. 
And I will bring you into the wilderness of the people, and there will I plead with you face to face. 
Like as I pleaded with your fathers in the wilderness of the land of Egypt, so will I plead with you, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I will cause you to pass under the rod, and I will bring you into the bond of the covenant: 
And I will purge out from among you the rebels, and them that transgress against me: I will bring them forth out of the country where they sojourn, and they sh
566,with their children. Of the sons of the Kohathites: Heman a singer, the son of Joel, the son of Shemuel, 
The son of Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of Eliel, the son of Toah, 
The son of Zuph, the son of Elkanah, the son of Mahath, the son of Amasai, 
The son of Elkanah, the son of Joel, the son of Azariah, the son of Zephaniah, 
The son of Tahath, the son of Assir, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, 
The son of Izhar, the son of Kohath, the son of Levi, the son of Israel. 
And his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, even Asaph the son of Ber
544,aved by the LORD, the shield of thy help, and who is the sword of thy excellency! and thine enemies shall be found liars unto thee; and thou shalt tread upon their high places. 
And Moses went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of Nebo, to the top of Pisgah, that is over against Jericho. And the LORD shewed him all the land of Gilead, unto Dan, 
And all Naphtali, and the land of Ephraim, and Manasseh, and all the land of Judah, unto the utmost sea, 
And the south, and the plain of the valley of Jericho, the city of palm trees, u
503,tterly, labour not to comfort me, because of the spoiling of the daughter of my people. 
For it is a day of trouble, and of treading down, and of perplexity by the Lord GOD of hosts in the valley of vision, breaking down the walls, and of crying to the mountains. 
And Elam bare the quiver with chariots of men and horsemen, and Kir uncovered the shield. 
And it shall come to pass, that thy choicest valleys shall be full of chariots, and the horsemen shall set themselves in array at the gate. 
And he
567,thers, and to thy kindred; and I will be with thee. 
And Jacob sent and called Rachel and Leah to the field unto his flock, 
And said unto them, I see your father's countenance, that it is not toward me as before; but the God of my father hath been with me. 
And ye know that with all my power I have served your father. 
And your father hath deceived me, and changed my wages ten times; but God suffered him not to hurt me. 
If he said thus, The speckled shall be thy wages; then all the cattle bare speckled: and if he said thus, The ringstraked shall be thy hire; 
552,he woman, and between thy seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy head, and thou shalt bruise his heel. 
Unto the woman he said, I will greatly multiply thy sorrow and thy conception; in sorrow thou shalt bring forth children; and thy desire shall be to thy husband, and he shall rule over thee. 
And unto Adam he said, Because thou hast hearkened unto the voice of thy wife, and hast eaten of the tree, of which I commanded thee, saying, Thou shalt not eat of it: cursed is the ground for thy sake; in sorrow shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy li
641,for a rock of offence to both the houses of Israel, for a gin and for a snare to the inhabitants of Jerusalem. 
And many among them shall stumble, and fall, and be broken, and be snared, and be taken. 
Bind up the testimony, seal the law among my disciples. 
And I will wait upon the LORD, that hideth his face from the house of Jacob, and I will look for him. 
Behold, I and the children whom the LORD hath given me are for signs and for wonders in Israel from the LORD of hosts, which dwelleth in mount Zion. 
And when they shall say unto you, Seek unto them that have familiar spirits, and unto wizards that peep, and that mutter: should 
501,house, which gave much alms to the people, and prayed to God alway. 
He saw in a vision evidently about the ninth hour of the day an angel of God coming in to him, and saying unto him, Cornelius. 
And when he looked on him, he was afraid, and said, What is it, Lord? And he said unto him, Thy prayers and thine alms are come up for a memorial before God. 
And now send men to Joppa, and call for one Simon, whose surname is Peter: 
He lodgeth with one Simon a tanner, whose house is by the sea side: h
622, which laboured much in the Lord. 
Salute Rufus chosen in the Lord, and his mother and mine. 
Salute Asyncritus, Phlegon, Hermas, Patrobas, Hermes, and the brethren which are with them. 
Salute Philologus, and Julia, Nereus, and his sister, and Olympas, and all the saints which are with them. 
Salute one another with an holy kiss. The churches of Christ salute you. 
Now I beseech you, brethren, mark them which cause divisions and offences contrary to the doctrine which ye have learned; and avoid them. 
For they that are such serve not our Lord Jesus Christ, but their own belly; and by good words and fair speeches d
632,ideon, The people are yet too many; bring them down unto the water, and I will try them for thee there: and it shall be, that of whom I say unto thee, This shall go with thee, the same shall go with thee; and of whomsoever I say unto thee, This shall not go with thee, the same shall not go. 
So he brought down the people unto the water: and the LORD said unto Gideon, Every one that lappeth of the water with his tongue, as a dog lappeth, him shalt thou set by himself; likewise every one that boweth down upon his knees to drink. 
And the number of them that lapped, putting their hand to their mouth, were three hundred men: but
532, look for judgment, but there is none; for salvation, but it is far off from us. 
For our transgressions are multiplied before thee, and our sins testify against us: for our transgressions are with us; and as for our iniquities, we know them; 
In transgressing and lying against the LORD, and departing away from our God, speaking oppression and revolt, conceiving and uttering from the heart words of falsehood. 
And judgment is turned away backward, and justice standeth afar off: for truth is fallen in the street, and equity can
704,am, 
And Jeuz, and Shachia, and Mirma. These were his sons, heads of the fathers. 
And of Hushim he begat Abitub, and Elpaal. 
The sons of Elpaal; Eber, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono, and Lod, with the towns thereof: 
Beriah also, and Shema, who were heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who drove away the inhabitants of Gath: 
And Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth, 
And Zebadiah, and Arad, and Ader, 
And Michael, and Ispah, and Joha, the sons of Beriah; 
And Zebadiah, and Meshullam, and Hezeki, and Heber, 
Ishmerai also, and Jezliah, and Jobab, the sons of Elpaal; 
And Jakim, and Zichri, and Zabdi, 
And Elienai, and Zilthai, and Eliel, 
And Adaiah, and Beraiah, and Shimrath, the
489,heed and beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees. 
And they reasoned among themselves, saying, It is because we have taken no bread. 
Which when Jesus perceived, he said unto them, O ye of little faith, why reason ye among yourselves, because ye have brought no bread? 
Do ye not yet understand, neither remember the five loaves of the five thousand, and how many baskets ye took up? 
Neither the seven loaves of the four thousand, and how many baskets ye took up? 
How 
696,D descended in the cloud, and stood with him there, and proclaimed the name of the LORD. 
And the LORD passed by before him, and proclaimed, The LORD, The LORD God, merciful and gracious, longsuffering, and abundant in goodness and truth, 
Keeping mercy for thousands, forgiving iniquity and transgression and sin, and that will by no means clear the guilty; visiting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children, and upon the children's children, unto the third and to the fourth generation. 
And Moses made haste, and bowed his head toward the earth, and worshipped. 
And he said, If now I have found grace in thy sight, O LORD, let my LORD, I pray thee, go among us; for it is a stiffnecked p
637,ther is not yet come; and when he cometh, he must continue a short space. 
And the beast that was, and is not, even he is the eighth, and is of the seven, and goeth into perdition. 
And the ten horns which thou sawest are ten kings, which have received no kingdom as yet; but receive power as kings one hour with the beast. 
These have one mind, and shall give their power and strength unto the beast. 
These shall make war with the Lamb, and the Lamb shall overcome them: for he is Lord of lords, and King of kings: and they that are with him are called, and chosen, and faithful. 
And he saith unto me, The waters which thou sawest, wh
716,h is the eighth month, was the house finished throughout all the parts thereof, and according to all the fashion of it. So was he seven years in building it. 
But Solomon was building his own house thirteen years, and he finished all his house. 
He built also the house of the forest of Lebanon; the length thereof was an hundred cubits, and the breadth thereof fifty cubits, and the height thereof thirty cubits, upon four rows of cedar pillars, with cedar beams upon the pillars. 
And it was covered with cedar above upon the beams, that lay on forty five pillars, fifteen in a row. 
And there were windows in three rows, and light was against light in three ranks. 
And all the doors and posts were square, with t
602,he altar: 
And he laid it upon my mouth, and said, Lo, this hath touched thy lips; and thine iniquity is taken away, and thy sin purged. 
Also I heard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and who will go for us? Then said I, Here am I; send me. 
And he said, Go, and tell this people, Hear ye indeed, but understand not; and see ye indeed, but perceive not. 
Make the heart of this people fat, and make their ears heavy, and shut their eyes; lest they see with their eyes, and hear with their ears, and understand with their heart, and convert, and be healed. 
Then said I, Lord, how long?
582, of Israel, saying, Come, let us see one another in the face. 
And Joash king of Israel sent to Amaziah king of Judah, saying, The thistle that was in Lebanon sent to the cedar that was in Lebanon, saying, Give thy daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by a wild beast that was in Lebanon, and trode down the thistle. 
Thou sayest, Lo, thou hast smitten the Edomites; and thine heart lifteth thee up to boast: abide now at home; why shouldest thou meddle to thine hurt, that thou shouldest fall, even thou, and Judah with thee? 
But Amaziah would not hear; for it came of God
714,LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Make thee two trumpets of silver; of a whole piece shalt thou make them: that thou mayest use them for the calling of the assembly, and for the journeying of the camps. 
And when they shall blow with them, all the assembly shall assemble themselves to thee at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And if they blow but with one trumpet, then the princes, which are heads of the thousands of Israel, shall gather themselves unto thee. 
When ye blow an alarm, then the camps that lie on the east parts shall go forward. 
When ye blow an alarm the second time, then the camps that lie on the south side shall take their journey: they shall blow an alarm for their journeys. 
628,and that whereupon they set their minds, their sons and their daughters, 
That he that escapeth in that day shall come unto thee, to cause thee to hear it with thine ears? 
In that day shall thy mouth be opened to him which is escaped, and thou shalt speak, and be no more dumb: and thou shalt be a sign unto them; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against the Ammonites, and prophesy against them; 
And say unto the Ammonites, Hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou saidst, Aha, against my sanctuary, when it was pr
681, your own hands, as we commanded you; 
That ye may walk honestly toward them that are without, and that ye may have lack of nothing. 
But I would not have you to be ignorant, brethren, concerning them which are asleep, that ye sorrow not, even as others which have no hope. 
For if we believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them also which sleep in Jesus will God bring with him. 
For this we say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we which are alive and remain unto the coming of the Lord shall not prevent them which are asleep. 
For the Lord himself shall descend from heaven with a shout, with the voice of the archangel, and with the trump of God: and the dead in
672,ile person, to whom they shall not give the honour of the kingdom: but he shall come in peaceably, and obtain the kingdom by flatteries. 
And with the arms of a flood shall they be overflown from before him, and shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant. 
And after the league made with him he shall work deceitfully: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people. 
He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong hold
556,ome out of Egypt, which covereth the face of the earth: come now, curse me them; peradventure I shall be able to overcome them, and drive them out. 
And God said unto Balaam, Thou shalt not go with them; thou shalt not curse the people: for they are blessed. 
And Balaam rose up in the morning, and said unto the princes of Balak, Get you into your land: for the LORD refuseth to give me leave to go with you. 
And the princes of Moab rose up, and they went unto Balak, and said, Balaam refuseth to come with us. 
And Balak sent yet again princes, more, an
578, the wall, and the tower which lieth out from the king's high house, that was by the court of the prison. After him Pedaiah the son of Parosh. 
Moreover the Nethinims dwelt in Ophel, unto the place over against the water gate toward the east, and the tower that lieth out. 
After them the Tekoites repaired another piece, over against the great tower that lieth out, even unto the wall of Ophel. 
From above the horse gate repaired the priests, every one over against his house. 
After them repaired Zadok the son of Immer over against his house. After him repaired also Shemaia
626,er grape appear, and the pomegranates bud forth: there will I give thee my loves. 
The mandrakes give a smell, and at our gates are all manner of pleasant fruits, new and old, which I have laid up for thee, O my beloved. 
O that thou wert as my brother, that sucked the breasts of my mother! when I should find thee without, I would kiss thee; yea, I should not be despised. 
I would lead thee, and bring thee into my mother's house, who would instruct me: I would cause thee to drink of spiced wine of the juice of my pomegranate. 
His left hand should be under my head, and his right hand should embrace me. 
I charge you, O
615,her side, they had forgotten to take bread. 
Then Jesus said unto them, Take heed and beware of the leaven of the Pharisees and of the Sadducees. 
And they reasoned among themselves, saying, It is because we have taken no bread. 
Which when Jesus perceived, he said unto them, O ye of little faith, why reason ye among yourselves, because ye have brought no bread? 
Do ye not yet understand, neither remember the five loaves of the five thousand, and how many baskets ye took up? 
Neither the seven loaves of the four thousand, and how many baskets ye took up? 
How is it that ye do not understand that I spake it n
630,thou? knowing that it was the Lord. 
Jesus then cometh, and taketh bread, and giveth them, and fish likewise. 
This is now the third time that Jesus shewed himself to his disciples, after that he was risen from the dead. 
So when they had dined, Jesus saith to Simon Peter, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me more than these? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs. 
He saith to him again the second time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my sheep. 
He saith unto him the third time, S
567,m to depart out of their coasts. 
And when he was come into the ship, he that had been possessed with the devil prayed him that he might be with him. 
Howbeit Jesus suffered him not, but saith unto him, Go home to thy friends, and tell them how great things the Lord hath done for thee, and hath had compassion on thee. 
And he departed, and began to publish in Decapolis how great things Jesus had done for him: and all men did marvel. 
And when Jesus was passed over again by ship unto the other side, much people gathered unto him: and he was nigh unto the sea. 
A
505,ey are laid desolate, they are given us to consume. 
Thus with your mouth ye have boasted against me, and have multiplied your words against me: I have heard them. 
Thus saith the Lord GOD; When the whole earth rejoiceth, I will make thee desolate. 
As thou didst rejoice at the inheritance of the house of Israel, because it was desolate, so will I do unto thee: thou shalt be desolate, O mount Seir, and all Idumea, even all of it: and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
Also, thou son of man, prophes
494,one. 
Then the high priest rose up, and all they that were with him, (which is the sect of the Sadducees,) and were filled with indignation, 
And laid their hands on the apostles, and put them in the common prison. 
But the angel of the Lord by night opened the prison doors, and brought them forth, and said, 
Go, stand and speak in the temple to the people all the words of this life. 
And when they heard that, they entered into the temple early in the morning, and taught. But the high prie
566,ith us? Lo, certainly in vain made he it; the pen of the scribes is in vain. 
The wise men are ashamed, they are dismayed and taken: lo, they have rejected the word of the LORD; and what wisdom is in them? 
Therefore will I give their wives unto others, and their fields to them that shall inherit them: for every one from the least even unto the greatest is given to covetousness, from the prophet even unto the priest every one dealeth falsely. 
For they have healed the hurt of the daughter of my people slightly, saying, Peace, peace; when there is no peace. 
We
717,nd him, we will not go down: for the man said unto us, Ye shall not see my face, except your brother be with you. 
And Israel said, Wherefore dealt ye so ill with me, as to tell the man whether ye had yet a brother? 
And they said, The man asked us straitly of our state, and of our kindred, saying, Is your father yet alive? have ye another brother? and we told him according to the tenor of these words: could we certainly know that he would say, Bring your brother down? 
And Judah said unto Israel his father, Send the lad with me, and we will arise and go; that we may live, and not die, both we, and thou, and also our little ones. 
I will be surety for him; of my hand shalt thou require him: if I bring him no
571,when the wise is instructed, he receiveth knowledge. 
The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked: but God overthroweth the wicked for their wickedness. 
Whoso stoppeth his ears at the cry of the poor, he also shall cry himself, but shall not be heard. 
A gift in secret pacifieth anger: and a reward in the bosom strong wrath. 
It is joy to the just to do judgment: but destruction shall be to the workers of iniquity. 
The man that wandereth out of the way of understanding shall remain in the congregation of the dead. 
He that loveth pleasure shall b
618, other Peninnah: and Peninnah had children, but Hannah had no children. 
And this man went up out of his city yearly to worship and to sacrifice unto the LORD of hosts in Shiloh. And the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, the priests of the LORD, were there. 
And when the time was that Elkanah offered, he gave to Peninnah his wife, and to all her sons and her daughters, portions: 
But unto Hannah he gave a worthy portion; for he loved Hannah: but the LORD had shut up her womb. 
And her adversary also provoked her sore, for to make her fret, because the LORD had shut up her womb. 
And as he did so year by yea
575,of the tabernacle. 
And a cubit on the one side, and a cubit on the other side of that which remaineth in the length of the curtains of the tent, it shall hang over the sides of the tabernacle on this side and on that side, to cover it. 
And thou shalt make a covering for the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and a covering above of badgers' skins. 
And thou shalt make boards for the tabernacle of shittim wood standing up. 
Ten cubits shall be the length of a board, and a cubit and a half shall be the breadth of one board. 
Two tenons shall there be in one board, set in or
630,eart by asking meat for their lust. 
Yea, they spake against God; they said, Can God furnish a table in the wilderness? 
Behold, he smote the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the streams overflowed; can he give bread also? can he provide flesh for his people? 
Therefore the LORD heard this, and was wroth: so a fire was kindled against Jacob, and anger also came up against Israel; 
Because they believed not in God, and trusted not in his salvation: 
Though he had commanded the clouds from above, and opened the doors of heaven, 
And had rained down manna upon them to eat, and had given them of the corn of heaven. 
Man d
490,lt do; for evil is determined against our master, and against all his household: for he is such a son of Belial, that a man cannot speak to him. 
Then Abigail made haste, and took two hundred loaves, and two bottles of wine, and five sheep ready dressed, and five measures of parched corn, and an hundred clusters of raisins, and two hundred cakes of figs, and laid them on asses. 
And she said unto her servants, Go on before me; behold, I come after you. But she told not her husband Naba
642,the wicked: 
For there shall be no reward to the evil man; the candle of the wicked shall be put out. 
My son, fear thou the LORD and the king: and meddle not with them that are given to change: 
For their calamity shall rise suddenly; and who knoweth the ruin of them both? 
These things also belong to the wise. It is not good to have respect of persons in judgment. 
He that saith unto the wicked, Thou are righteous; him shall the people curse, nations shall abhor him: 
But to them that rebuke him shall be delight, and a good blessing shall come upon them. 
Every man shall kiss his lips that giveth a right answer. 
Prepare thy work wi
666,unto the LORD in your set feasts, beside your vows, and your freewill offerings, for your burnt offerings, and for your meat offerings, and for your drink offerings, and for your peace offerings. 
And Moses told the children of Israel according to all that the LORD commanded Moses. 
And Moses spake unto the heads of the tribes concerning the children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded. 
If a man vow a vow unto the LORD, or swear an oath to bind his soul with a bond; he shall not break his word, he shall do according to all that proceedeth out of his mouth. 
If a woman also vow a vow unto the LORD, and bind herself by a bond, b
656,at hath understanding; but the eyes of a fool are in the ends of the earth. 
A foolish son is a grief to his father, and bitterness to her that bare him. 
Also to punish the just is not good, nor to strike princes for equity. 
He that hath knowledge spareth his words: and a man of understanding is of an excellent spirit. 
Even a fool, when he holdeth his peace, is counted wise: and he that shutteth his lips is esteemed a man of understanding. 
Through desire a man, having separated himself, seeketh and intermeddleth with all wisdom. 
A fool hath no delight in understanding, but that his heart may discover itself. 
When the wicked cometh, then comet
494,m. Wherefore now send and fetch him unto me, for he shall surely die. 
And Jonathan answered Saul his father, and said unto him, Wherefore shall he be slain? what hath he done? 
And Saul cast a javelin at him to smite him: whereby Jonathan knew that it was determined of his father to slay David. 
So Jonathan arose from the table in fierce anger, and did eat no meat the second day of the month: for he was grieved for David, because his father had done him shame. 
And it came to pass in the 
641,nd saith unto him, Every man at the beginning doth set forth good wine; and when men have well drunk, then that which is worse: but thou hast kept the good wine until now. 
This beginning of miracles did Jesus in Cana of Galilee, and manifested forth his glory; and his disciples believed on him. 
After this he went down to Capernaum, he, and his mother, and his brethren, and his disciples: and they continued there not many days. 
And the Jews' passover was at hand, and Jesus went up to Jerusalem. 
And found in the temple those that sold oxen and sheep and doves, and the changers of money sitting: 
And when he had made a scourge of sm
654,ight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and there be in it no yellow hair, and the scall be not in sight deeper than the skin; 
He shall be shaven, but the scall shall he not shave; and the priest shall shut up him that hath the scall seven days more: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the scall: and, behold, if the scall be not spread in the skin, nor be in sight deeper than the skin; then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and
562,on of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which were of them that searched the land, rent their clothes: 
And they spake unto all the company of the children of Israel, saying, The land, which we passed through to search it, is an exceeding good land. 
If the LORD delight in us, then he will bring us into this land, and give it us; a land which floweth with milk and honey. 
Only rebel not ye against the LORD, neither fear ye the people of the land; for they are bread for us: their defence is departed from them, and the LORD is with us: fear them not. 
But
649,ervant, and cut off his right ear. The servant's name was Malchus. 
Then said Jesus unto Peter, Put up thy sword into the sheath: the cup which my Father hath given me, shall I not drink it? 
Then the band and the captain and officers of the Jews took Jesus, and bound him, 
And led him away to Annas first; for he was father in law to Caiaphas, which was the high priest that same year. 
Now Caiaphas was he, which gave counsel to the Jews, that it was expedient that one man should die for the people. 
And Simon Peter followed Jesus, and so did another disciple: that disciple was known unto the high priest, and went in with Jesus into the palac
719,ss nations greater and mightier than thyself, cities great and fenced up to heaven, 
A people great and tall, the children of the Anakims, whom thou knowest, and of whom thou hast heard say, Who can stand before the children of Anak! 
Understand therefore this day, that the LORD thy God is he which goeth over before thee; as a consuming fire he shall destroy them, and he shall bring them down before thy face: so shalt thou drive them out, and destroy them quickly, as the LORD hath said unto thee. 
Speak not thou in thine heart, after that the LORD thy God hath cast them out from before thee, saying, For my righteousness the LORD hath brought me in to possess this land: but for the wickedness of these nations t
699,ness between us, if we do not so according to thy words. 
Then Jephthah went with the elders of Gilead, and the people made him head and captain over them: and Jephthah uttered all his words before the LORD in Mizpeh. 
And Jephthah sent messengers unto the king of the children of Ammon, saying, What hast thou to do with me, that thou art come against me to fight in my land? 
And the king of the children of Ammon answered unto the messengers of Jephthah, Because Israel took away my land, when they came up out of Egypt, from Arnon even unto Jabbok, and unto Jordan: now therefore restore those lands again peaceably. 
And Jephthah sent messengers again unto the king of the children of Ammon: 
A
575, his creatures. 
Wherefore, my beloved brethren, let every man be swift to hear, slow to speak, slow to wrath: 
For the wrath of man worketh not the righteousness of God. 
Wherefore lay apart all filthiness and superfluity of naughtiness, and receive with meekness the engrafted word, which is able to save your souls. 
But be ye doers of the word, and not hearers only, deceiving your own selves. 
For if any be a hearer of the word, and not a doer, he is like unto a man beholding his natural face in a glass: 
For he beholdeth himself, and goeth his way, and straightway f
686,once knew this, how that the Lord, having saved the people out of the land of Egypt, afterward destroyed them that believed not. 
And the angels which kept not their first estate, but left their own habitation, he hath reserved in everlasting chains under darkness unto the judgment of the great day. 
Even as Sodom and Gomorrha, and the cities about them in like manner, giving themselves over to fornication, and going after strange flesh, are set forth for an example, suffering the vengeance of eternal fire. 
Likewise also these filthy dreamers defile the flesh, despise dominion, and speak evil of dignities. 
Yet Michael the archangel, when contending with the devil he disputed 
618,ss. 
Moreover thou shalt not lie carnally with thy neighbour's wife, to defile thyself with her. 
And thou shalt not let any of thy seed pass through the fire to Molech, neither shalt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD. 
Thou shalt not lie with mankind, as with womankind: it is abomination. 
Neither shalt thou lie with any beast to defile thyself therewith: neither shall any woman stand before a beast to lie down thereto: it is confusion. 
Defile not ye yourselves in any of these things: for in all these the nations are defiled which I cast out before you: 
And the land is defiled: therefore I do v
503,I regard iniquity in my heart, the Lord will not hear me: 
But verily God hath heard me; he hath attended to the voice of my prayer. 
Blessed be God, which hath not turned away my prayer, nor his mercy from me. 
God be merciful unto us, and bless us; and cause his face to shine upon us; Selah. 
That thy way may be known upon earth, thy saving health among all nations. 
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise thee. 
O let the nations be glad and sing for joy: for thou shalt judg
581,rate their purpose, all the days of Cyrus king of Persia, even until the reign of Darius king of Persia. 
And in the reign of Ahasuerus, in the beginning of his reign, wrote they unto him an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and Jerusalem. 
And in the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel, and the rest of their companions, unto Artaxerxes king of Persia; and the writing of the letter was written in the Syrian tongue, and interpreted in the Syrian tongue. 
Rehum the chancellor and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter against Jerusalem to Artaxerxes the 
500,
And he took him aside from the multitude, and put his fingers into his ears, and he spit, and touched his tongue; 
And looking up to heaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is, Be opened. 
And straightway his ears were opened, and the string of his tongue was loosed, and he spake plain. 
And he charged them that they should tell no man: but the more he charged them, so much the more a great deal they published it; 
And were beyond measure astonished, saying, He hath done all thin
584, the men, the children of Belial, which are in Gibeah, that we may put them to death, and put away evil from Israel. But the children of Benjamin would not hearken to the voice of their brethren the children of Israel. 
But the children of Benjamin gathered themselves together out of the cities unto Gibeah, to go out to battle against the children of Israel. 
And the children of Benjamin were numbered at that time out of the cities twenty and six thousand men that drew sword, beside the inhabitants of Gibeah, which were numbered seven hundred chosen men. 
Among all this people 
506,not spare children. 
And Babylon, the glory of kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldees' excellency, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah. 
It shall never be inhabited, neither shall it be dwelt in from generation to generation: neither shall the Arabian pitch tent there; neither shall the shepherds make their fold there. 
But wild beasts of the desert shall lie there; and their houses shall be full of doleful creatures; and owls shall dwell there, and satyrs shall dance there. 
And the wild 
522,to a mountain on the east of Bethel, and pitched his tent, having Bethel on the west, and Hai on the east: and there he builded an altar unto the LORD, and called upon the name of the LORD. 
And Abram journeyed, going on still toward the south. 
And there was a famine in the land: and Abram went down into Egypt to sojourn there; for the famine was grievous in the land. 
And it came to pass, when he was come near to enter into Egypt, that he said unto Sarai his wife, Behold now, I know that thou art a fair woman to lo
702,nd therein was found written, that the Ammonite and the Moabite should not come into the congregation of God for ever; 
Because they met not the children of Israel with bread and with water, but hired Balaam against them, that he should curse them: howbeit our God turned the curse into a blessing. 
Now it came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they separated from Israel all the mixed multitude. 
And before this, Eliashib the priest, having the oversight of the chamber of the house of our God, was allied unto Tobiah: 
And he had prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the meat offerings, the frankincense, and the vessels, and the tithes of the corn, the new wine, an
684,saying, There are men come out of Samaria. 
And he said, Whether they be come out for peace, take them alive; or whether they be come out for war, take them alive. 
So these young men of the princes of the provinces came out of the city, and the army which followed them. 
And they slew every one his man: and the Syrians fled; and Israel pursued them: and Benhadad the king of Syria escaped on an horse with the horsemen. 
And the king of Israel went out, and smote the horses and chariots, and slew the Syrians with a great slaughter. 
And the prophet came to the king of Israel, and said unto him, Go, strengthen thyself, and mark, and see what thou doest: for at the return of the
549,erefore seven brethren: and the first took a wife, and died without children. 
And the second took her to wife, and he died childless. 
And the third took her; and in like manner the seven also: and they left no children, and died. 
Last of all the woman died also. 
Therefore in the resurrection whose wife of them is she? for seven had her to wife. 
And Jesus answering said unto them, The children of this world marry, and are given in marriage: 
But they which shall be accounted worthy to obtain that world, and the resurrection from the dead, 
692,ield, that Cain rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him. 
And the LORD said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he said, I know not: Am I my brother's keeper? 
And he said, What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood crieth unto me from the ground. 
And now art thou cursed from the earth, which hath opened her mouth to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand; 
When thou tillest the ground, it shall not henceforth yield unto thee her strength; a fugitive and a vagabond shalt thou be in the earth. 
And Cain said unto the LORD, My punishment is greater than I can bear. 
Behold, thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the earth; and from thy face shall 
607,n thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt all the days of thy life. 
And there shall be no leavened bread seen with thee in all thy coast seven days; neither shall there any thing of the flesh, which thou sacrificedst the first day at even, remain all night until the morning. 
Thou mayest not sacrifice the passover within any of thy gates, which the LORD thy God giveth thee: 
But at the place which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name in, there thou shalt sacrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the sun, at the season that thou camest forth out of Egypt. 
And thou shalt roas
604, city, at the coming in at the doors. 
Unto you, O men, I call; and my voice is to the sons of man. 
O ye simple, understand wisdom: and, ye fools, be ye of an understanding heart. 
Hear; for I will speak of excellent things; and the opening of my lips shall be right things. 
For my mouth shall speak truth; and wickedness is an abomination to my lips. 
All the words of my mouth are in righteousness; there is nothing froward or perverse in them. 
They are all plain to him that understandeth, and right to them that find knowledge. 
Receive my instruction, and not silver; and knowledge rather than ch
556, chief baker among his servants. 
And he restored the chief butler unto his butlership again; and he gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand: 
But he hanged the chief baker: as Joseph had interpreted to them. 
Yet did not the chief butler remember Joseph, but forgat him. 
And it came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh dreamed: and, behold, he stood by the river. 
And, behold, there came up out of the river seven well favoured kine and fatfleshed; and they fed in a meadow. 
And, behold, seven other kine came up after them out of the river, il
639,ish man, whether he rage or laugh, there is no rest. 
The bloodthirsty hate the upright: but the just seek his soul. 
A fool uttereth all his mind: but a wise man keepeth it in till afterwards. 
If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked. 
The poor and the deceitful man meet together: the LORD lighteneth both their eyes. 
The king that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be established for ever. 
The rod and reproof give wisdom: but a child left to himself bringeth his mother to shame. 
When the wicked are multiplied, transgression increaseth: but the righteous shall see their fall. 
Correct thy son, and he s
677,e up to mount Sinai: for thou chargedst us, saying, Set bounds about the mount, and sanctify it. 
And the LORD said unto him, Away, get thee down, and thou shalt come up, thou, and Aaron with thee: but let not the priests and the people break through to come up unto the LORD, lest he break forth upon them. 
So Moses went down unto the people, and spake unto them. 
And God spake all these words, saying, 
I am the LORD thy God, which have brought thee out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage. 
Thou shalt have no other gods before me. 
Thou shalt not make unto thee any graven image, or any likeness of any thing that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth
567,ense altar. 
And Azariah the chief priest, and all the priests, looked upon him, and, behold, he was leprous in his forehead, and they thrust him out from thence; yea, himself hasted also to go out, because the LORD had smitten him. 
And Uzziah the king was a leper unto the day of his death, and dwelt in a several house, being a leper; for he was cut off from the house of the LORD: and Jotham his son was over the king's house, judging the people of the land. 
Now the rest of the acts of Uzziah, first and last, did Isaiah the prophet, the son of Amoz, write. 
So
569,my mouth in righteousness, and shall not return, That unto me every knee shall bow, every tongue shall swear. 
Surely, shall one say, in the LORD have I righteousness and strength: even to him shall men come; and all that are incensed against him shall be ashamed. 
In the LORD shall all the seed of Israel be justified, and shall glory. 
Bel boweth down, Nebo stoopeth, their idols were upon the beasts, and upon the cattle: your carriages were heavy loaden; they are a burden to the weary beast. 
They stoop, they bow down together; they could not deliver the burden,
590,this greatness, in making known all these great things. 
O LORD, there is none like thee, neither is there any God beside thee, according to all that we have heard with our ears. 
And what one nation in the earth is like thy people Israel, whom God went to redeem to be his own people, to make thee a name of greatness and terribleness, by driving out nations from before thy people whom thou hast redeemed out of Egypt? 
For thy people Israel didst thou make thine own people for ever; and thou, LORD, becamest their God. 
Therefore now, LORD, let the thing that thou hast spoken concernin
562,dren of Tobiah, the children of Nekoda, six hundred forty and two. 
And of the priests: the children of Habaiah, the children of Koz, the children of Barzillai, which took one of the daughters of Barzillai the Gileadite to wife, and was called after their name. 
These sought their register among those that were reckoned by genealogy, but it was not found: therefore were they, as polluted, put from the priesthood. 
And the Tirshatha said unto them, that they should not eat of the most holy things, till there stood up a priest with Urim and Thummim. 
The who
541, take a prey? to carry away silver and gold, to take away cattle and goods, to take a great spoil? 
Therefore, son of man, prophesy and say unto Gog, Thus saith the Lord GOD; In that day when my people of Israel dwelleth safely, shalt thou not know it? 
And thou shalt come from thy place out of the north parts, thou, and many people with thee, all of them riding upon horses, a great company, and a mighty army: 
And thou shalt come up against my people of Israel, as a cloud to cover the land; it shall be in the latter days, and I will b
492,they shall forecast devices against him. 
Yea, they that feed of the portion of his meat shall destroy him, and his army shall overflow: and many shall fall down slain. 
And both of these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and they shall speak lies at one table; but it shall not prosper: for yet the end shall be at the time appointed. 
Then shall he return into his land with great riches; and his heart shall be against the holy covenant; and he shall do exploits, and return to his ow
501,to the city of his refuge, that he should come again to dwell in the land, until the death of the priest. 
So ye shall not pollute the land wherein ye are: for blood it defileth the land: and the land cannot be cleansed of the blood that is shed therein, but by the blood of him that shed it. 
Defile not therefore the land which ye shall inhabit, wherein I dwell: for I the LORD dwell among the children of Israel. 
And the chief fathers of the families of the children of Gilead, the son of Machir, 
644,t of the land of Egypt unto this day: consider of it, take advice, and speak your minds. 
Then all the children of Israel went out, and the congregation was gathered together as one man, from Dan even to Beersheba, with the land of Gilead, unto the LORD in Mizpeh. 
And the chief of all the people, even of all the tribes of Israel, presented themselves in the assembly of the people of God, four hundred thousand footmen that drew sword. 
(Now the children of Benjamin heard that the children of Israel were gone up to Mizpeh.) Then said the children of Israel, Tell us, how was this wickedness? 
And the Levite, the husband of the woman that 
486,of Israel, Enquire, I pray thee, at the word of the LORD to day. 
Then the king of Israel gathered the prophets together, about four hundred men, and said unto them, Shall I go against Ramothgilead to battle, or shall I forbear? And they said, Go up; for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand of the king. 
And Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of the LORD besides, that we might enquire of him? 
And the king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat, There is yet one man, Micaiah
495,ifted up the head of Jehoiachin king of Judah, and brought him forth out of prison. 
And spake kindly unto him, and set his throne above the throne of the kings that were with him in Babylon, 
And changed his prison garments: and he did continually eat bread before him all the days of his life. 
And for his diet, there was a continual diet given him of the king of Babylon, every day a portion until the day of his death, all the days of his life. 
How doth the city sit solitary, that was ful
582,
And when thou preparest a bullock for a burnt offering, or for a sacrifice in performing a vow, or peace offerings unto the LORD: 
Then shall he bring with a bullock a meat offering of three tenth deals of flour mingled with half an hin of oil. 
And thou shalt bring for a drink offering half an hin of wine, for an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
Thus shall it be done for one bullock, or for one ram, or for a lamb, or a kid. 
According to the number that ye shall prepare, so shall ye do to every one according to their number. 
All that are born of the
539,om the mount, and the mount burned with fire: and the two tables of the covenant were in my two hands. 
And I looked, and, behold, ye had sinned against the LORD your God, and had made you a molten calf: ye had turned aside quickly out of the way which the LORD had commanded you. 
And I took the two tables, and cast them out of my two hands, and brake them before your eyes. 
And I fell down before the LORD, as at the first, forty days and forty nights: I did neither eat bread, nor drink water, because of all your sins which ye sinned
713, according to the purpose of him who worketh all things after the counsel of his own will: 
That we should be to the praise of his glory, who first trusted in Christ. 
In whom ye also trusted, after that ye heard the word of truth, the gospel of your salvation: in whom also after that ye believed, ye were sealed with that holy Spirit of promise, 
Which is the earnest of our inheritance until the redemption of the purchased possession, unto the praise of his glory. 
Wherefore I also, after I heard of your faith in the Lord Jesus, and love unto all the saints, 
Cease not to give thanks for you, making mention of you in my prayers; 
That the God of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Father of glory, may give unto y
557,her shall any plague come nigh thy dwelling. 
For he shall give his angels charge over thee, to keep thee in all thy ways. 
They shall bear thee up in their hands, lest thou dash thy foot against a stone. 
Thou shalt tread upon the lion and adder: the young lion and the dragon shalt thou trample under feet. 
Because he hath set his love upon me, therefore will I deliver him: I will set him on high, because he hath known my name. 
He shall call upon me, and I will answer him: I will be with him in trouble; I will deliver him, and honour him. 
With long
642,n in pieces; he shall not spare: so that there shall not be found in the bursting of it a sherd to take fire from the hearth, or to take water withal out of the pit. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD, the Holy One of Israel; In returning and rest shall ye be saved; in quietness and in confidence shall be your strength: and ye would not. 
But ye said, No; for we will flee upon horses; therefore shall ye flee: and, We will ride upon the swift; therefore shall they that pursue you be swift. 
One thousand shall flee at the rebuke of one; at the rebuke of five shall ye flee: till ye be left as a beacon upon the top of a mountain, and as an ensi
674,lods cleave fast together? 
Wilt thou hunt the prey for the lion? or fill the appetite of the young lions, 
When they couch in their dens, and abide in the covert to lie in wait? 
Who provideth for the raven his food? when his young ones cry unto God, they wander for lack of meat. 
Knowest thou the time when the wild goats of the rock bring forth? or canst thou mark when the hinds do calve? 
Canst thou number the months that they fulfil? or knowest thou the time when they bring forth? 
They bow themselves, they bring forth their young ones, they cast out their sorrows. 
Their young ones are in good liking, they grow up with corn; they go forth, and return not unto t
590, of the graves after his resurrection, and went into the holy city, and appeared unto many. 
Now when the centurion, and they that were with him, watching Jesus, saw the earthquake, and those things that were done, they feared greatly, saying, Truly this was the Son of God. 
And many women were there beholding afar off, which followed Jesus from Galilee, ministering unto him: 
Among which was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James and Joses, and the mother of Zebedees children. 
When the even was come, there came a rich man of Arimathaea, named Joseph, who also himself was Jesu
661,ll shew mine opinion. 
Behold, I waited for your words; I gave ear to your reasons, whilst ye searched out what to say. 
Yea, I attended unto you, and, behold, there was none of you that convinced Job, or that answered his words: 
Lest ye should say, We have found out wisdom: God thrusteth him down, not man. 
Now he hath not directed his words against me: neither will I answer him with your speeches. 
They were amazed, they answered no more: they left off speaking. 
When I had waited, (for they spake not, but stood still, and answered no more;) 
I said, I will answer also my part, I also will shew mine opinion. 
For I am full of matter, the spirit withi
617,e in parables; and without a parable spake he not unto them: 
That it might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophet, saying, I will open my mouth in parables; I will utter things which have been kept secret from the foundation of the world. 
Then Jesus sent the multitude away, and went into the house: and his disciples came unto him, saying, Declare unto us the parable of the tares of the field. 
He answered and said unto them, He that soweth the good seed is the Son of man; 
The field is the world; the good seed are the children of the kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked one; 
The enemy
673,srael, or of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that giveth any of his seed unto Molech; he shall surely be put to death: the people of the land shall stone him with stones. 
And I will set my face against that man, and will cut him off from among his people; because he hath given of his seed unto Molech, to defile my sanctuary, and to profane my holy name. 
And if the people of the land do any ways hide their eyes from the man, when he giveth of his seed unto Molech, and kill him not: 
Then I will set my face against that man, and against his family, and will cut him off, and all that go a whoring after him, to commit whoredom with Molech, from among their peop
595,rouble it. 
But all the silver, and gold, and vessels of brass and iron, are consecrated unto the LORD: they shall come into the treasury of the LORD. 
So the people shouted when the priests blew with the trumpets: and it came to pass, when the people heard the sound of the trumpet, and the people shouted with a great shout, that the wall fell down flat, so that the people went up into the city, every man straight before him, and they took the city. 
And they utterly destroyed all that was in the city, both man and woman, young and old, and ox, and sheep, and ass, with the edge of the swo
639, him, saying, Lord, wilt thou at this time restore again the kingdom to Israel? 
And he said unto them, It is not for you to know the times or the seasons, which the Father hath put in his own power. 
But ye shall receive power, after that the Holy Ghost is come upon you: and ye shall be witnesses unto me both in Jerusalem, and in all Judaea, and in Samaria, and unto the uttermost part of the earth. 
And when he had spoken these things, while they beheld, he was taken up; and a cloud received him out of their sight. 
And while they looked stedfastly toward heaven as he went up, behold, two men stood by them in white apparel; 
Which
536,elders of Judah sat before me, that the hand of the Lord GOD fell there upon me. 
Then I beheld, and lo a likeness as the appearance of fire: from the appearance of his loins even downward, fire; and from his loins even upward, as the appearance of brightness, as the colour of amber. 
And he put forth the form of an hand, and took me by a lock of mine head; and the spirit lifted me up between the earth and the heaven, and brought me in the visions of God to Jerusalem, to the door of the inner gate that looketh toward the north; wh
714,he tokens of the liars, and maketh diviners mad; that turneth wise men backward, and maketh their knowledge foolish; 
That confirmeth the word of his servant, and performeth the counsel of his messengers; that saith to Jerusalem, Thou shalt be inhabited; and to the cities of Judah, Ye shall be built, and I will raise up the decayed places thereof: 
That saith to the deep, Be dry, and I will dry up thy rivers: 
That saith of Cyrus, He is my shepherd, and shall perform all my pleasure: even saying to Jerusalem, Thou shalt be built; and to the temple, Thy foundation shall be laid. 
Thus saith the LORD to his anointed, to Cyrus, whose right hand I have holden, to subdue nations before him; and I will loose th
555, fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is thy love than wine! and the smell of thine ointments than all spices! 
Thy lips, O my spouse, drop as the honeycomb: honey and milk are under thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of Lebanon. 
A garden inclosed is my sister, my spouse; a spring shut up, a fountain sealed. 
Thy plants are an orchard of pomegranates, with pleasant fruits; camphire, with spikenard, 
Spikenard and saffron; calamus and cinnamon, with all trees of frankincense; myrrh and aloes, with all the 
632,rd the utter court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof: and the going up to it had eight steps. 
And he brought me into the inner court toward the east: and he measured the gate according to these measures. 
And the little chambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the arches thereof, were according to these measures: and there were windows therein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five and twenty cubits broad. 
And the arches thereof were toward the outward court; and palm trees were upon the posts thereof, on this side, and on that side: and the going up to it had eight steps. 

616,a place for beasts to lie down in! every one that passeth by her shall hiss, and wag his hand. 
Woe to her that is filthy and polluted, to the oppressing city! 
She obeyed not the voice; she received not correction; she trusted not in the LORD; she drew not near to her God. 
Her princes within her are roaring lions; her judges are evening wolves; they gnaw not the bones till the morrow. 
Her prophets are light and treacherous persons: her priests have polluted the sanctuary, they have done violence to the law. 
The just LORD is in the midst thereof; he will not do iniquity: every morning doth he bring his jud
643,ere as swift as the roes upon the mountains; 
Ezer the first, Obadiah the second, Eliab the third, 
Mishmannah the fourth, Jeremiah the fifth, 
Attai the sixth, Eliel the seventh, 
Johanan the eighth, Elzabad the ninth, 
Jeremiah the tenth, Machbanai the eleventh. 
These were of the sons of Gad, captains of the host: one of the least was over an hundred, and the greatest over a thousand. 
These are they that went over Jordan in the first month, when it had overflown all his banks; and they put to flight all them of the valleys, both toward the east, and toward the west. 
And there came of the children of Benjamin and Judah to the hold 
698, maidens will fast likewise; and so will I go in unto the king, which is not according to the law: and if I perish, I perish. 
So Mordecai went his way, and did according to all that Esther had commanded him. 
Now it came to pass on the third day, that Esther put on her royal apparel, and stood in the inner court of the king's house, over against the king's house: and the king sat upon his royal throne in the royal house, over against the gate of the house. 
And it was so, when the king saw Esther the queen standing in the court, that she obtained favour in his sight: and the king held out to Esther the golden sceptre that was in his hand. So Esther drew near, and touched the top of the sc
633,heir heart with labour; they fell down, and there was none to help. 
Then they cried unto the LORD in their trouble, and he saved them out of their distresses. 
He brought them out of darkness and the shadow of death, and brake their bands in sunder. 
Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his wonderful works to the children of men! 
For he hath broken the gates of brass, and cut the bars of iron in sunder. 
Fools because of their transgression, and because of their iniquities, are afflicted. 
Their soul abhorreth all manner of meat; and they draw near unto the gates of death. 
Then they cry unto the LORD
498,me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief singer on my stringed instruments. 
The word of the LORD which came unto Zephaniah the son of Cushi, the son of Gedaliah, the son of Amariah, the son of Hizkiah, in the days of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah. 
I will utterly consume all things from off the land, saith the LORD. 
I will consume man and beast; I will consume the fowls of the heaven, and the fishes of the sea, and the stumbling blocks with the wicked: and I will cut off man fr
612,t pluck you up: for I repent me of the evil that I have done unto you. 
Be not afraid of the king of Babylon, of whom ye are afraid; be not afraid of him, saith the LORD: for I am with you to save you, and to deliver you from his hand. 
And I will shew mercies unto you, that he may have mercy upon you, and cause you to return to your own land. 
But if ye say, We will not dwell in this land, neither obey the voice of the LORD your God, 
Saying, No; but we will go into the land of Egypt, where we shall see no war, nor hear the sound of the trumpet, nor have hunger of bread; and there will we dwell: 
And now
613,rselves, and dress it first; for ye are many; and call on the name of your gods, but put no fire under. 
And they took the bullock which was given them, and they dressed it, and called on the name of Baal from morning even until noon, saying, O Baal, hear us. But there was no voice, nor any that answered. And they leaped upon the altar which was made. 
And it came to pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said, Cry aloud: for he is a god; either he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth, and must be awaked. 
And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their
701,and said unto his counsellors, Did not we cast three men bound into the midst of the fire? They answered and said unto the king, True, O king. 
He answered and said, Lo, I see four men loose, walking in the midst of the fire, and they have no hurt; and the form of the fourth is like the Son of God. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar came near to the mouth of the burning fiery furnace, and spake, and said, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, ye servants of the most high God, come forth, and come hither. Then Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, came forth of the midst of the fire. 
And the princes, governors, and captains, and the king's counsellors, being gathered together, saw these men, upon whose bodies the fi
559,lord the king. 
But Abishai the son of Zeruiah answered and said, Shall not Shimei be put to death for this, because he cursed the LORD's anointed? 
And David said, What have I to do with you, ye sons of Zeruiah, that ye should this day be adversaries unto me? shall there any man be put to death this day in Israel? for do not I know that I am this day king over Israel? 
Therefore the king said unto Shimei, Thou shalt not die. And the king sware unto him. 
And Mephibosheth the son of Saul came down to meet the king, and had neither dressed his feet, nor 
693,d of any of the people that were with Saul and Jonathan: but with Saul and with Jonathan his son was there found. 
And the garrison of the Philistines went out to the passage of Michmash. 
Now it came to pass upon a day, that Jonathan the son of Saul said unto the young man that bare his armour, Come, and let us go over to the Philistines' garrison, that is on the other side. But he told not his father. 
And Saul tarried in the uttermost part of Gibeah under a pomegranate tree which is in Migron: and the people that were with him were about six hundred men; 
And Ahiah, the son of Ahitub, Ichabod's brother, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eli, the LORD's priest in Shiloh, wearing an ep
716, 
And she gave the king an hundred and twenty talents of gold, and of spices very great store, and precious stones: there came no more such abundance of spices as these which the queen of Sheba gave to king Solomon. 
And the navy also of Hiram, that brought gold from Ophir, brought in from Ophir great plenty of almug trees, and precious stones. 
And the king made of the almug trees pillars for the house of the LORD, and for the king's house, harps also and psalteries for singers: there came no such almug trees, nor were seen unto this day. 
And king Solomon gave unto the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, beside that which Solomon gave her of his royal bounty. So she turned and went to her
683,aldeans, whose cry is in the ships. 
I am the LORD, your Holy One, the creator of Israel, your King. 
Thus saith the LORD, which maketh a way in the sea, and a path in the mighty waters; 
Which bringeth forth the chariot and horse, the army and the power; they shall lie down together, they shall not rise: they are extinct, they are quenched as tow. 
Remember ye not the former things, neither consider the things of old. 
Behold, I will do a new thing; now it shall spring forth; shall ye not know it? I will even make a way in the wilderness, and rivers in the desert. 
The beast of the field shall honour me, the dragons and the owls: because I give waters in the wilderness, and
694,es, that I may not destroy them all. 
And I will bring forth a seed out of Jacob, and out of Judah an inheritor of my mountains: and mine elect shall inherit it, and my servants shall dwell there. 
And Sharon shall be a fold of flocks, and the valley of Achor a place for the herds to lie down in, for my people that have sought me. 
But ye are they that forsake the LORD, that forget my holy mountain, that prepare a table for that troop, and that furnish the drink offering unto that number. 
Therefore will I number you to the sword, and ye shall all bow down to the slaughter: because when I called, ye did not answer; when I spake, ye did not hear; but did evil before mine eyes, and did c
706,into an inner chamber. 
And his servants said unto him, Behold now, we have heard that the kings of the house of Israel are merciful kings: let us, I pray thee, put sackcloth on our loins, and ropes upon our heads, and go out to the king of Israel: peradventure he will save thy life. 
So they girded sackcloth on their loins, and put ropes on their heads, and came to the king of Israel, and said, Thy servant Benhadad saith, I pray thee, let me live. And he said, Is he yet alive? he is my brother. 
Now the men did diligently observe whether any thing would come from him, and did hastily catch it: and they said, Thy brother Benhadad. Then he said, Go ye, bring him. Then Benhadad came forth to him; an
670,is people slew them with a great slaughter: so there fell down slain of Israel five hundred thousand chosen men. 
Thus the children of Israel were brought under at that time, and the children of Judah prevailed, because they relied upon the LORD God of their fathers. 
And Abijah pursued after Jeroboam, and took cities from him, Bethel with the towns thereof, and Jeshanah with the towns thereof, and Ephraim with the towns thereof. 
Neither did Jeroboam recover strength again in the days of Abijah: and the LORD struck him, and he died. 
But Abijah waxed mighty, and married fourteen wives, and begat twenty and two sons, and sixteen daughters. 
And the rest of the a
690,hat is in the field, let him likewise not return back. 
Remember Lot's wife. 
Whosoever shall seek to save his life shall lose it; and whosoever shall lose his life shall preserve it. 
I tell you, in that night there shall be two men in one bed; the one shall be taken, and the other shall be left. 
Two women shall be grinding together; the one shall be taken, and the other left. 
Two men shall be in the field; the one shall be taken, and the other left. 
And they answered and said unto him, Where, Lord? And he said unto them, Wheresoever the body is, thither will the eagles be gathered together. 
And he spake a parable unto them to this end, that men ought always to pray, and not t
700,f the house of the LORD. And Samuel feared to shew Eli the vision. 
Then Eli called Samuel, and said, Samuel, my son. And he answered, Here am I. 
And he said, What is the thing that the LORD hath said unto thee? I pray thee hide it not from me: God do so to thee, and more also, if thou hide any thing from me of all the things that he said unto thee. 
And Samuel told him every whit, and hid nothing from him. And he said, It is the LORD: let him do what seemeth him good. 
And Samuel grew, and the LORD was with him, and did let none of his words fall to the ground. 
And all Israel from Dan even to Beersheba knew that Samuel was established to be a prophet of the LORD. 
And the LORD appeared ag
566, his own sin, and had no sons. 
Why should the name of our father be done away from among his family, because he hath no son? Give unto us therefore a possession among the brethren of our father. 
And Moses brought their cause before the LORD. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
The daughters of Zelophehad speak right: thou shalt surely give them a possession of an inheritance among their father's brethren; and thou shalt cause the inheritance of their father to pass unto them. 
And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a man die, and h
598, blue, and that can skill to grave with the cunning men that are with me in Judah and in Jerusalem, whom David my father did provide. 
Send me also cedar trees, fir trees, and algum trees, out of Lebanon: for I know that thy servants can skill to cut timber in Lebanon; and, behold, my servants shall be with thy servants, 
Even to prepare me timber in abundance: for the house which I am about to build shall be wonderful great. 
And, behold, I will give to thy servants, the hewers that cut timber, twenty thousand measures of beaten wheat, and twenty thousand measures of barley, and twenty thou
674,f him came the chief ruler; but the birthright was Joseph's:) 
The sons, I say, of Reuben the firstborn of Israel were, Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi. 
The sons of Joel; Shemaiah his son, Gog his son, Shimei his son, 
Micah his son, Reaia his son, Baal his son, 
Beerah his son, whom Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria carried away captive: he was prince of the Reubenites. 
And his brethren by their families, when the genealogy of their generations was reckoned, were the chief, Jeiel, and Zechariah, 
And Bela the son of Azaz, the son of Shema, the son of Joel, who dwelt in Aroer, even unto Nebo and Baalmeon: 
And eastward he inhabited unto the entering in of the w
697,fter my name. 
And David gathered all the people together, and went to Rabbah, and fought against it, and took it. 
And he took their king's crown from off his head, the weight whereof was a talent of gold with the precious stones: and it was set on David's head. And he brought forth the spoil of the city in great abundance. 
And he brought forth the people that were therein, and put them under saws, and under harrows of iron, and under axes of iron, and made them pass through the brick-kiln: and thus did he unto all the cities of the children of Ammon. So David and all the people returned unto Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass after this, that Absalom the son of David had a fair sister, wh
489,led his word that he had commanded in the days of old: he hath thrown down, and hath not pitied: and he hath caused thine enemy to rejoice over thee, he hath set up the horn of thine adversaries. 
Their heart cried unto the LORD, O wall of the daughter of Zion, let tears run down like a river day and night: give thyself no rest; let not the apple of thine eye cease. 
Arise, cry out in the night: in the beginning of the watches pour out thine heart like water before the face of the LOR
623,nd if thou redeem him not, then shalt thou break his neck. All the firstborn of thy sons thou shalt redeem. And none shall appear before me empty. 
Six days thou shalt work, but on the seventh day thou shalt rest: in earing time and in harvest thou shalt rest. 
And thou shalt observe the feast of weeks, of the firstfruits of wheat harvest, and the feast of ingathering at the year's end. 
Thrice in the year shall all your menchildren appear before the LORD God, the God of Israel. 
For I will cast out the nations before thee, and enlarge thy borders: neither shall any man desire thy land, when thou shalt go up to appe
492,urned unto the LORD, and said, Oh, this people have sinned a great sin, and have made them gods of gold. 
Yet now, if thou wilt forgive their sin--; and if not, blot me, I pray thee, out of thy book which thou hast written. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Whosoever hath sinned against me, him will I blot out of my book. 
Therefore now go, lead the people unto the place of which I have spoken unto thee: behold, mine Angel shall go before thee: nevertheless in the day when I visit I will vi
516,hy God. 
If there be found among you, within any of thy gates which the LORD thy God giveth thee, man or woman, that hath wrought wickedness in the sight of the LORD thy God, in transgressing his covenant, 
And hath gone and served other gods, and worshipped them, either the sun, or moon, or any of the host of heaven, which I have not commanded; 
And it be told thee, and thou hast heard of it, and enquired diligently, and, behold, it be true, and the thing certain, that such abomination is wrought in Israel: 
T
642,d the children of Israel enquired of the LORD, (for the ark of the covenant of God was there in those days, 
And Phinehas, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron, stood before it in those days,) saying, Shall I yet again go out to battle against the children of Benjamin my brother, or shall I cease? And the LORD said, Go up; for to morrow I will deliver them into thine hand. 
And Israel set liers in wait round about Gibeah. 
And the children of Israel went up against the children of Benjamin on the third day, and put themselves in array against Gibeah, as at other times. 
And the children of Benjamin went out against the people, and wer
709,nd they glorified God, saying, That a great prophet is risen up among us; and, That God hath visited his people. 
And this rumour of him went forth throughout all Judaea, and throughout all the region round about. 
And the disciples of John shewed him of all these things. 
And John calling unto him two of his disciples sent them to Jesus, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another? 
When the men were come unto him, they said, John Baptist hath sent us unto thee, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another? 
And in that same hour he cured many of their infirmities and plagues, and of evil spirits; and unto many that were blind he gave sight. 
Then Jesus answering sai
676,to meet him that cometh against him with twenty thousand? 
Or else, while the other is yet a great way off, he sendeth an ambassage, and desireth conditions of peace. 
So likewise, whosoever he be of you that forsaketh not all that he hath, he cannot be my disciple. 
Salt is good: but if the salt have lost his savour, wherewith shall it be seasoned? 
It is neither fit for the land, nor yet for the dunghill; but men cast it out. He that hath ears to hear, let him hear. 
Then drew near unto him all the publicans and sinners for to hear him. 
And the Pharisees and scribes murmured, saying, This man receiveth sinners, and eateth with them. 
And he spake this parable unto 
545,great a matter a little fire kindleth! 
And the tongue is a fire, a world of iniquity: so is the tongue among our members, that it defileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of nature; and it is set on fire of hell. 
For every kind of beasts, and of birds, and of serpents, and of things in the sea, is tamed, and hath been tamed of mankind: 
But the tongue can no man tame; it is an unruly evil, full of deadly poison. 
Therewith bless we God, even the Father; and therewith curse we men, which are made after the similitude of God
587, faith. 
Now therefore why tempt ye God, to put a yoke upon the neck of the disciples, which neither our fathers nor we were able to bear? 
But we believe that through the grace of the LORD Jesus Christ we shall be saved, even as they. 
Then all the multitude kept silence, and gave audience to Barnabas and Paul, declaring what miracles and wonders God had wrought among the Gentiles by them. 
And after they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Men and brethren, hearken unto me: 
Simeon hath declared how God at the first did visit the Gentiles, to take out of them a people 
543,he place where he was crucified there was a garden; and in the garden a new sepulchre, wherein was never man yet laid. 
There laid they Jesus therefore because of the Jews' preparation day; for the sepulchre was nigh at hand. 
The first day of the week cometh Mary Magdalene early, when it was yet dark, unto the sepulchre, and seeth the stone taken away from the sepulchre. 
Then she runneth, and cometh to Simon Peter, and to the other disciple, whom Jesus loved, and saith unto them, They have taken away the LORD out of the sepulchre, and 
692,cted of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be slain, and be raised the third day. 
And he said to them all, If any man will come after me, let him deny himself, and take up his cross daily, and follow me. 
For whosoever will save his life shall lose it: but whosoever will lose his life for my sake, the same shall save it. 
For what is a man advantaged, if he gain the whole world, and lose himself, or be cast away? 
For whosoever shall be ashamed of me and of my words, of him shall the Son of man be ashamed, when he shall come in his own glory, and in his Father's, and of the holy angels. 
But I tell you of a truth, there be some standing here, which shall not taste of deat
561, the kingdoms of the earth: thou hast made heaven and earth. 
Incline thine ear, O LORD, and hear; open thine eyes, O LORD, and see: and hear all the words of Sennacherib, which hath sent to reproach the living God. 
Of a truth, LORD, the kings of Assyria have laid waste all the nations, and their countries, 
And have cast their gods into the fire: for they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and stone: therefore they have destroyed them. 
Now therefore, O LORD our God, save us from his hand, that all the kingdoms of the earth may know that th
705, will give thanks unto thee for ever. 
In thee, O LORD, do I put my trust; let me never be ashamed: deliver me in thy righteousness. 
Bow down thine ear to me; deliver me speedily: be thou my strong rock, for an house of defence to save me. 
For thou art my rock and my fortress; therefore for thy name's sake lead me, and guide me. 
Pull me out of the net that they have laid privily for me: for thou art my strength. 
Into thine hand I commit my spirit: thou hast redeemed me, O LORD God of truth. 
I have hated them that regard lying vanities: but I trust in the LORD. 
I will be glad and rejoice in thy mercy: for thou hast considered my trouble; thou hast known my soul in adversities; 
And hast not 
649,e city of David, which is Zion. 
And all the men of Israel assembled themselves unto king Solomon at the feast in the month Ethanim, which is the seventh month. 
And all the elders of Israel came, and the priests took up the ark. 
And they brought up the ark of the LORD, and the tabernacle of the congregation, and all the holy vessels that were in the tabernacle, even those did the priests and the Levites bring up. 
And king Solomon, and all the congregation of Israel, that were assembled unto him, were with him before the ark, sacrificing sheep and oxen, that could not be told nor numbered for multitude. 
And the priests brought in the ark 
688,ons of gold, of a thousand drams; and two vessels of fine copper, precious as gold. 
And I said unto them, Ye are holy unto the LORD; the vessels are holy also; and the silver and the gold are a freewill offering unto the LORD God of your fathers. 
Watch ye, and keep them, until ye weigh them before the chief of the priests and the Levites, and chief of the fathers of Israel, at Jerusalem, in the chambers of the house of the LORD. 
So took the priests and the Levites the weight of the silver, and the gold, and the vessels, to bring them to Jerusalem unto the house of our God. 
Then we departed from the river of Ahava on the twelfth day of the first month, to go unto Jerusalem: an
489, and drew his sword, and struck a servant of the high priest's, and smote off his ear. 
Then said Jesus unto him, Put up again thy sword into his place: for all they that take the sword shall perish with the sword. 
Thinkest thou that I cannot now pray to my Father, and he shall presently give me more than twelve legions of angels? 
But how then shall the scriptures be fulfilled, that thus it must be? 
In that same hour said Jesus to the multitudes, Are ye come out as against a thief 
480,hat afflict thee; which have said to thy soul, Bow down, that we may go over: and thou hast laid thy body as the ground, and as the street, to them that went over. 
Awake, awake; put on thy strength, O Zion; put on thy beautiful garments, O Jerusalem, the holy city: for henceforth there shall no more come into thee the uncircumcised and the unclean. 
Shake thyself from the dust; arise, and sit down, O Jerusalem: loose thyself from the bands of thy neck, O captive daughter of 
559,s. 
Out of the south cometh the whirlwind: and cold out of the north. 
By the breath of God frost is given: and the breadth of the waters is straitened. 
Also by watering he wearieth the thick cloud: he scattereth his bright cloud: 
And it is turned round about by his counsels: that they may do whatsoever he commandeth them upon the face of the world in the earth. 
He causeth it to come, whether for correction, or for his land, or for mercy. 
Hearken unto this, O Job: stand still, and consider the wondrous works of God. 
Dost thou know when God disposed
599, up that which is behind of the afflictions of Christ in my flesh for his body's sake, which is the church: 
Whereof I am made a minister, according to the dispensation of God which is given to me for you, to fulfil the word of God; 
Even the mystery which hath been hid from ages and from generations, but now is made manifest to his saints: 
To whom God would make known what is the riches of the glory of this mystery among the Gentiles; which is Christ in you, the hope of glory: 
Whom we preach, warning every man, and teaching every man in all wisdom; that we may present every man perfect in 
702,here: and make there an altar unto God, that appeared unto thee when thou fleddest from the face of Esau thy brother. 
Then Jacob said unto his household, and to all that were with him, Put away the strange gods that are among you, and be clean, and change your garments: 
And let us arise, and go up to Bethel; and I will make there an altar unto God, who answered me in the day of my distress, and was with me in the way which I went. 
And they gave unto Jacob all the strange gods which were in their hand, and all their earrings which were in their ears; and Jacob hid them under the oak which was by Shechem. 
And they journeyed: and the terror of God was upon the cities that were round about the
612,et more against him by provoking the most High in the wilderness. 
And they tempted God in their heart by asking meat for their lust. 
Yea, they spake against God; they said, Can God furnish a table in the wilderness? 
Behold, he smote the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the streams overflowed; can he give bread also? can he provide flesh for his people? 
Therefore the LORD heard this, and was wroth: so a fire was kindled against Jacob, and anger also came up against Israel; 
Because they believed not in God, and trusted not in his salvation: 
Though he had commanded the clouds from above, and opene
517,of the countries, to serve wood and stone. 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely with a mighty hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out, will I rule over you: 
And I will bring you out from the people, and will gather you out of the countries wherein ye are scattered, with a mighty hand, and with a stretched out arm, and with fury poured out. 
And I will bring you into the wilderness of the people, and there will I plead with you face to face. 
Like as I pleaded with your fathers in the wild
636,ildren's children will I plead. 
For pass over the isles of Chittim, and see; and send unto Kedar, and consider diligently, and see if there be such a thing. 
Hath a nation changed their gods, which are yet no gods? but my people have changed their glory for that which doth not profit. 
Be astonished, O ye heavens, at this, and be horribly afraid, be ye very desolate, saith the LORD. 
For my people have committed two evils; they have forsaken me the fountain of living waters, and hewed them out cisterns, broken cisterns, that can hold no water. 
Is Israel a servant? is he a homeborn slave? why is he spoiled? 
The young lions roa
492, shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work. 
Also in the day of the firstfruits, when ye bring a new meat offering unto the LORD, after your weeks be out, ye shall have an holy convocation; ye shall do no servile work: 
But ye shall offer the burnt offering for a sweet savour unto the LORD; two young bullocks, one ram, seven lambs of the first year; 
And their meat offering of flour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto one bullock, two tenth deals unto one ram, 
A s
581,r, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono, and Lod, with the towns thereof: 
Beriah also, and Shema, who were heads of the fathers of the inhabitants of Aijalon, who drove away the inhabitants of Gath: 
And Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth, 
And Zebadiah, and Arad, and Ader, 
And Michael, and Ispah, and Joha, the sons of Beriah; 
And Zebadiah, and Meshullam, and Hezeki, and Heber, 
Ishmerai also, and Jezliah, and Jobab, the sons of Elpaal; 
And Jakim, and Zichri, and Zabdi, 
And Elienai, and Zilthai, and Eliel, 
And Adaiah, and Beraiah, and Shimrath, the sons of Shimhi; 
And Ishpa
692,ing deep, who can find it out? 
I applied mine heart to know, and to search, and to seek out wisdom, and the reason of things, and to know the wickedness of folly, even of foolishness and madness: 
And I find more bitter than death the woman, whose heart is snares and nets, and her hands as bands: whoso pleaseth God shall escape from her; but the sinner shall be taken by her. 
Behold, this have I found, saith the preacher, counting one by one, to find out the account: 
Which yet my soul seeketh, but I find not: one man among a thousand have I found; but a woman among all those have I not found. 
Lo, this only have I found, that God hath made man upright; but they have sought out many
711,ompany of those that published it. 
Kings of armies did flee apace: and she that tarried at home divided the spoil. 
Though ye have lien among the pots, yet shall ye be as the wings of a dove covered with silver, and her feathers with yellow gold. 
When the Almighty scattered kings in it, it was white as snow in Salmon. 
The hill of God is as the hill of Bashan; an high hill as the hill of Bashan. 
Why leap ye, ye high hills? this is the hill which God desireth to dwell in; yea, the LORD will dwell in it for ever. 
The chariots of God are twenty thousand, even thousands of angels: the Lord is among them, as in Sinai, in the holy place. 
Thou hast ascended on high, thou hast led captivity captive: thou 
595,oud for a covering; and fire to give light in the night. 
The people asked, and he brought quails, and satisfied them with the bread of heaven. 
He opened the rock, and the waters gushed out; they ran in the dry places like a river. 
For he remembered his holy promise, and Abraham his servant. 
And he brought forth his people with joy, and his chosen with gladness: 
And gave them the lands of the heathen: and they inherited the labour of the people; 
That they might observe his statutes, and keep his laws. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is goo
491,l, very grievous, such as there was none like it in all the land of Egypt since it became a nation. 
And the hail smote throughout all the land of Egypt all that was in the field, both man and beast; and the hail smote every herb of the field, and brake every tree of the field. 
Only in the land of Goshen, where the children of Israel were, was there no hail. 
And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said unto them, I have sinned this time: the LORD is righteous, and I and 
618,ve their carcases in abomination. 
Whatsoever hath no fins nor scales in the waters, that shall be an abomination unto you. 
And these are they which ye shall have in abomination among the fowls; they shall not be eaten, they are an abomination: the eagle, and the ossifrage, and the ospray, 
And the vulture, and the kite after his kind; 
Every raven after his kind; 
And the owl, and the night hawk, and the cuckow, and the hawk after his kind, 
And the little owl, and the cormorant, and the great owl, 
And the swan, and the pelican, and the gier eagle, 
And the stork, the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, a
655,Son of man be risen again from the dead. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, Why then say the scribes that Elias must first come? 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Elias truly shall first come, and restore all things. 
But I say unto you, That Elias is come already, and they knew him not, but have done unto him whatsoever they listed. Likewise shall also the Son of man suffer of them. 
Then the disciples understood that he spake unto them of John the Baptist. 
And when they were come to the multitude, there came to him a certain man, kneeling down to him, and saying, 
Lord, have mercy on my son: for he is lunatick, and sore vexed: for oftt
660,r is better for you, either that all the sons of Jerubbaal, which are threescore and ten persons, reign over you, or that one reign over you? remember also that I am your bone and your flesh. 
And his mother's brethren spake of him in the ears of all the men of Shechem all these words: and their hearts inclined to follow Abimelech; for they said, He is our brother. 
And they gave him threescore and ten pieces of silver out of the house of Baalberith, wherewith Abimelech hired vain and light persons, which followed him. 
And he went unto his father's house at Ophrah, and slew his brethren the sons of Jerubbaal, being threescore and ten persons, upon one
524,out the sun: I stood up, and I cried in the congregation. 
I am a brother to dragons, and a companion to owls. 
My skin is black upon me, and my bones are burned with heat. 
My harp also is turned to mourning, and my organ into the voice of them that weep. 
I made a covenant with mine eyes; why then should I think upon a maid? 
For what portion of God is there from above? and what inheritance of the Almighty from on high? 
Is not destruction to the wicked? and a strange punishment to the workers of iniquity? 
Doth not 
539, them, and spake roughly unto them; and he said unto them, Whence come ye? And they said, From the land of Canaan to buy food. 
And Joseph knew his brethren, but they knew not him. 
And Joseph remembered the dreams which he dreamed of them, and said unto them, Ye are spies; to see the nakedness of the land ye are come. 
And they said unto him, Nay, my lord, but to buy food are thy servants come. 
We are all one man's sons; we are true men, thy servants are no spies. 
And he said unto them, Nay, but to see the nakedness of the land ye
599,gently observe whether any thing would come from him, and did hastily catch it: and they said, Thy brother Benhadad. Then he said, Go ye, bring him. Then Benhadad came forth to him; and he caused him to come up into the chariot. 
And Ben-hadad said unto him, The cities, which my father took from thy father, I will restore; and thou shalt make streets for thee in Damascus, as my father made in Samaria. Then said Ahab, I will send thee away with this covenant. So he made a covenant with him, and sent him away. 
And a certain man of the sons of the prophets said unto his neighbour in the word of
684,? or what evil is in mine hand? 
Now therefore, I pray thee, let my lord the king hear the words of his servant. If the LORD have stirred thee up against me, let him accept an offering: but if they be the children of men, cursed be they before the LORD; for they have driven me out this day from abiding in the inheritance of the LORD, saying, Go, serve other gods. 
Now therefore, let not my blood fall to the earth before the face of the LORD: for the king of Israel is come out to seek a flea, as when one doth hunt a partridge in the mountains. 
Then said Saul, I have sinned: return, my son David: for I will no more do thee harm, because my soul was precious in thine eyes this 
716,s unto the Hebrews, as they have been to you: quit yourselves like men, and fight. 
And the Philistines fought, and Israel was smitten, and they fled every man into his tent: and there was a very great slaughter; for there fell of Israel thirty thousand footmen. 
And the ark of God was taken; and the two sons of Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were slain. 
And there ran a man of Benjamin out of the army, and came to Shiloh the same day with his clothes rent, and with earth upon his head. 
And when he came, lo, Eli sat upon a seat by the wayside watching: for his heart trembled for the ark of God. And when the man came into the city, and told it, all the city cried out. 
And when Eli heard the noise of the crying,
690,om him. 
And I besought thy disciples to cast him out; and they could not. 
And Jesus answering said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long shall I be with you, and suffer you? Bring thy son hither. 
And as he was yet a coming, the devil threw him down, and tare him. And Jesus rebuked the unclean spirit, and healed the child, and delivered him again to his father. 
And they were all amazed at the mighty power of God. But while they wondered every one at all things which Jesus did, he said unto his disciples, 
Let these sayings sink down into your ears: for the Son of man shall be delivered into the hands of men. 
But they understood not this saying, and it was hid from them
567,d fought with him. 
And the Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew the men of seven hundred chariots of the Syrians, and forty thousand horsemen, and smote Shobach the captain of their host, who died there. 
And when all the kings that were servants to Hadarezer saw that they were smitten before Israel, they made peace with Israel, and served them. So the Syrians feared to help the children of Ammon any more. 
And it came to pass, after the year was expired, at the time when kings go forth to battle, that David sent Joab, and his servants with him, and all 
639,f the LORD, behold, as soon as thou art departed from me, a lion shall slay thee. And as soon as he was departed from him, a lion found him, and slew him. 
Then he found another man, and said, Smite me, I pray thee. And the man smote him, so that in smiting he wounded him. 
So the prophet departed, and waited for the king by the way, and disguised himself with ashes upon his face. 
And as the king passed by, he cried unto the king: and he said, Thy servant went out into the midst of the battle; and, behold, a man turned aside, and brought a man unto me, and said, Keep this man: if by any means he be missing, then shall thy life be 
537,d. 
And Hagar bare Abram a son: and Abram called his son's name, which Hagar bare, Ishmael. 
And Abram was fourscore and six years old, when Hagar bare Ishmael to Abram. 
And when Abram was ninety years old and nine, the LORD appeared to Abram, and said unto him, I am the Almighty God; walk before me, and be thou perfect. 
And I will make my covenant between me and thee, and will multiply thee exceedingly. 
And Abram fell on his face: and God talked with him, saying, 
As for me, behold, my covenant is with thee, and thou shalt be a
612,; lest a more honourable man than thou be bidden of him; 
And he that bade thee and him come and say to thee, Give this man place; and thou begin with shame to take the lowest room. 
But when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest room; that when he that bade thee cometh, he may say unto thee, Friend, go up higher: then shalt thou have worship in the presence of them that sit at meat with thee. 
For whosoever exalteth himself shall be abased; and he that humbleth himself shall be exalted. 
Then said he also to him that bade him, When thou makest a dinner or a supper, call not thy friends, nor thy 
662,lood to destroy all flesh. 
And the bow shall be in the cloud; and I will look upon it, that I may remember the everlasting covenant between God and every living creature of all flesh that is upon the earth. 
And God said unto Noah, This is the token of the covenant, which I have established between me and all flesh that is upon the earth. 
And the sons of Noah, that went forth of the ark, were Shem, and Ham, and Japheth: and Ham is the father of Canaan. 
These are the three sons of Noah: and of them was the whole earth overspread. 
And Noah began to be an husbandman, and he planted a vineyard: 
And he drank of the wine, and was drunken; and he was uncov
615,, that our eyes may be opened. 
So Jesus had compassion on them, and touched their eyes: and immediately their eyes received sight, and they followed him. 
And when they drew nigh unto Jerusalem, and were come to Bethphage, unto the mount of Olives, then sent Jesus two disciples, 
Saying unto them, Go into the village over against you, and straightway ye shall find an ass tied, and a colt with her: loose them, and bring them unto me. 
And if any man say ought unto you, ye shall say, The Lord hath need of them; and straightway he will send them. 
All this was done, that it might be fulfilled which was spoken 
644,iveth all thine iniquities; who healeth all thy diseases; 
Who redeemeth thy life from destruction; who crowneth thee with lovingkindness and tender mercies; 
Who satisfieth thy mouth with good things; so that thy youth is renewed like the eagle's. 
The LORD executeth righteousness and judgment for all that are oppressed. 
He made known his ways unto Moses, his acts unto the children of Israel. 
The LORD is merciful and gracious, slow to anger, and plenteous in mercy. 
He will not always chide: neither will he keep his anger for ever. 
He hath not dealt with us after our sins; nor rewarded us according to our iniquities. 
For as the hea
636,he covenant of the LORD your God, which he commanded you, and have gone and served other gods, and bowed yourselves to them; then shall the anger of the LORD be kindled against you, and ye shall perish quickly from off the good land which he hath given unto you. 
And Joshua gathered all the tribes of Israel to Shechem, and called for the elders of Israel, and for their heads, and for their judges, and for their officers; and they presented themselves before God. 
And Joshua said unto all the people, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Your fathers dwelt on the other side of the flood in old time, even Terah, the father of Abraham
645, all that is made for them: so shall they serve. 
At the appointment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their service: and ye shall appoint unto them in charge all their burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As for the sons of Merari, thou shalt number them after their families, by the house of their fathers; 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old shalt thou number them, every one that entere
625,e LORD, that he hath taken against Babylon; and his purposes, that he hath purposed against the land of the Chaldeans: Surely the least of the flock shall draw them out: surely he shall make their habitation desolate with them. 
At the noise of the taking of Babylon the earth is moved, and the cry is heard among the nations. 
Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will raise up against Babylon, and against them that dwell in the midst of them that rise up against me, a destroying wind; 
And will send unto Babylon fanners, that shall fan her, and shall empty her land: for in the day of trouble they shall be against her round a
708, broken Rahab in pieces, as one that is slain; thou hast scattered thine enemies with thy strong arm. 
The heavens are thine, the earth also is thine: as for the world and the fulness thereof, thou hast founded them. 
The north and the south thou hast created them: Tabor and Hermon shall rejoice in thy name. 
Thou hast a mighty arm: strong is thy hand, and high is thy right hand. 
Justice and judgment are the habitation of thy throne: mercy and truth shall go before thy face. 
Blessed is the people that know the joyful sound: they shall walk, O LORD, in the light of thy countenance. 
In thy name shall they rejoice all the day: and in thy righteousness shall they be exalted. 
For thou art the glory o
611,, and thou art come to excellent ornaments: thy breasts are fashioned, and thine hair is grown, whereas thou wast naked and bare. 
Now when I passed by thee, and looked upon thee, behold, thy time was the time of love; and I spread my skirt over thee, and covered thy nakedness: yea, I sware unto thee, and entered into a covenant with thee, saith the Lord GOD, and thou becamest mine. 
Then washed I thee with water; yea, I throughly washed away thy blood from thee, and I anointed thee with oil. 
I clothed thee also with broidered work, and shod thee with badgers' skin, and I girded thee about with fine lin
596,d shall pour out his blood at the bottom of the altar of burnt offering. 
And he shall burn all his fat upon the altar, as the fat of the sacrifice of peace offerings: and the priest shall make an atonement for him as concerning his sin, and it shall be forgiven him. 
And if any one of the common people sin through ignorance, while he doeth somewhat against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and be guilty; 
Or if his sin, which he hath sinned, come to his knowledge: then he shall bring his offering, a kid of the goats, a female without blemish
597,word of the LORD, which he spake by Joshua the son of Nun. 
And Elijah the Tishbite, who was of the inhabitants of Gilead, said unto Ahab, As the LORD God of Israel liveth, before whom I stand, there shall not be dew nor rain these years, but according to my word. 
And the word of the LORD came unto him, saying, 
Get thee hence, and turn thee eastward, and hide thyself by the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan. 
And it shall be, that thou shalt drink of the brook; and I have commanded the ravens to feed thee there. 
So he went and did according unto the word of the LORD: for he went and d
672,me up the fir tree, and instead of the brier shall come up the myrtle tree: and it shall be to the LORD for a name, for an everlasting sign that shall not be cut off. 
Thus saith the LORD, Keep ye judgment, and do justice: for my salvation is near to come, and my righteousness to be revealed. 
Blessed is the man that doeth this, and the son of man that layeth hold on it; that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and keepeth his hand from doing any evil. 
Neither let the son of the stranger, that hath joined himself to the LORD, speak, saying, The LORD hath utterly separated me from his people: neither let the eunuch say, Behold, I am a dry tree. 
For thus saith 
615,seek the LORD understand all things. 
Better is the poor that walketh in his uprightness, than he that is perverse in his ways, though he be rich. 
Whoso keepeth the law is a wise son: but he that is a companion of riotous men shameth his father. 
He that by usury and unjust gain increaseth his substance, he shall gather it for him that will pity the poor. 
He that turneth away his ear from hearing the law, even his prayer shall be abomination. 
Whoso causeth the righteous to go astray in an evil way, he shall fall himself into his own pit: but the upright shall have good things in possession. 
The rich man 
661,ites: of Merari, the family of the Merarites. 
These are the families of the Levites: the family of the Libnites, the family of the Hebronites, the family of the Mahlites, the family of the Mushites, the family of the Korathites. And Kohath begat Amram. 
And the name of Amram's wife was Jochebed, the daughter of Levi, whom her mother bare to Levi in Egypt: and she bare unto Amram Aaron and Moses, and Miriam their sister. 
And unto Aaron was born Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
And Nadab and Abihu died, when they offered strange fire before the LORD. 
And those that were numbered of them were twenty and three thousand, all males from a month old
578,nd we know that his testimony is true. 
And there are also many other things which Jesus did, the which, if they should be written every one, I suppose that even the world itself could not contain the books that should be written. Amen. 
The former treatise have I made, O Theophilus, of all that Jesus began both to do and teach, 
Until the day in which he was taken up, after that he through the Holy Ghost had given commandments unto the apostles whom he had chosen: 
To whom also he shewed himself alive after his passion by many infallible proofs, being seen of them forty 
535,rty days and forty nights; he did neither eat bread, nor drink water. And he wrote upon the tables the words of the covenant, the ten commandments. 
And it came to pass, when Moses came down from mount Sinai with the two tables of testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the mount, that Moses wist not that the skin of his face shone while he talked with him. 
And when Aaron and all the children of Israel saw Moses, behold, the skin of his face shone; and they were afraid to come nigh him. 
And Moses called unto them; and 
510,heir torment was as the torment of a scorpion, when he striketh a man. 
And in those days shall men seek death, and shall not find it; and shall desire to die, and death shall flee from them. 
And the shapes of the locusts were like unto horses prepared unto battle; and on their heads were as it were crowns like gold, and their faces were as the faces of men. 
And they had hair as the hair of women, and their teeth were as the teeth of lions. 
And they had breastplates, as it were breastplates of iron; an
590,ny God or man within thirty days, save of thee, O king, shall be cast into the den of lions? The king answered and said, The thing is true, according to the law of the Medes and Persians, which altereth not. 
Then answered they and said before the king, That Daniel, which is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O king, nor the decree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition three times a day. 
Then the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased with himself, and set his heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he laboured till the going down of th
542,rney into the wilderness by the way of the Red sea, as the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount Seir many days. 
And the LORD spake unto me, saying, 
Ye have compassed this mountain long enough: turn you northward. 
And command thou the people, saying, Ye are to pass through the coast of your brethren the children of Esau, which dwell in Seir; and they shall be afraid of you: take ye good heed unto yourselves therefore: 
Meddle not with them; for I will not give you of their land, no, not so much as a foot breadth; because I have 
663, the evening; and, lo, in her mouth was an olive leaf pluckt off: so Noah knew that the waters were abated from off the earth. 
And he stayed yet other seven days; and sent forth the dove; which returned not again unto him any more. 
And it came to pass in the six hundredth and first year, in the first month, the first day of the month, the waters were dried up from off the earth: and Noah removed the covering of the ark, and looked, and, behold, the face of the ground was dry. 
And in the second month, on the seven and twentieth day of the month, was the earth dried. 
And God spake unto Noah, saying, 
Go forth of the ark, thou, and thy wife, and thy sons
596, blood of Zacharias which perished between the altar and the temple: verily I say unto you, It shall be required of this generation. 
Woe unto you, lawyers! for ye have taken away the key of knowledge: ye entered not in yourselves, and them that were entering in ye hindered. 
And as he said these things unto them, the scribes and the Pharisees began to urge him vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of many things: 
Laying wait for him, and seeking to catch something out of his mouth, that they might accuse him. 
In the mean time, when there were gathered together an innumerable multitude
538,ay far from her, and come not nigh the door of her house: 
Lest thou give thine honour unto others, and thy years unto the cruel: 
Lest strangers be filled with thy wealth; and thy labours be in the house of a stranger; 
And thou mourn at the last, when thy flesh and thy body are consumed, 
And say, How have I hated instruction, and my heart despised reproof; 
And have not obeyed the voice of my teachers, nor inclined mine ear to them that instructed me! 
I was almost in all evil in the midst of the congregation and assembly. 
Drink
668, and they made the ships in Eziongaber. 
Then Eliezer the son of Dodavah of Mareshah prophesied against Jehoshaphat, saying, Because thou hast joined thyself with Ahaziah, the LORD hath broken thy works. And the ships were broken, that they were not able to go to Tarshish. 
Now Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David. And Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
And he had brethren the sons of Jehoshaphat, Azariah, and Jehiel, and Zechariah, and Azariah, and Michael, and Shephatiah: all these were the sons of Jehoshaphat king of Israel. 
And their father gave them great gifts of silver, and of gold, and of preciou
704,his angels: praise ye him, all his hosts. 
Praise ye him, sun and moon: praise him, all ye stars of light. 
Praise him, ye heavens of heavens, and ye waters that be above the heavens. 
Let them praise the name of the LORD: for he commanded, and they were created. 
He hath also stablished them for ever and ever: he hath made a decree which shall not pass. 
Praise the LORD from the earth, ye dragons, and all deeps: 
Fire, and hail; snow, and vapours; stormy wind fulfilling his word: 
Mountains, and all hills; fruitful trees, and all cedars: 
Beasts, and all cattle; creeping things, and flying fowl: 
Kings of the earth, and all people; princes, and all judges of the earth: 
Both young men, and maid
504,r, O LORD; and all thy commandments are truth. 
Concerning thy testimonies, I have known of old that thou hast founded them for ever. 
Consider mine affliction, and deliver me: for I do not forget thy law. 
Plead my cause, and deliver me: quicken me according to thy word. 
Salvation is far from the wicked: for they seek not thy statutes. 
Great are thy tender mercies, O LORD: quicken me according to thy judgments. 
Many are my persecutors and mine enemies; yet do I not decline from thy testimonies. 
510,fore I took them away as I saw good. 
Neither hath Samaria committed half of thy sins; but thou hast multiplied thine abominations more than they, and hast justified thy sisters in all thine abominations which thou hast done. 
Thou also, which hast judged thy sisters, bear thine own shame for thy sins that thou hast committed more abominable than they: they are more righteous than thou: yea, be thou confounded also, and bear thy shame, in that thou hast justified thy sisters. 
When I shall bring again the
563,emies, which shall spoil them, and take them, and carry them to Babylon. 
And thou, Pashur, and all that dwell in thine house shall go into captivity: and thou shalt come to Babylon, and there thou shalt die, and shalt be buried there, thou, and all thy friends, to whom thou hast prophesied lies. 
O LORD, thou hast deceived me, and I was deceived; thou art stronger than I, and hast prevailed: I am in derision daily, every one mocketh me. 
For since I spake, I cried out, I cried violence and spoil; because the word of the LORD was made a reproach unto me, an
692,rael for ever and ever. And all the people said, Amen, and praised the LORD. 
So he left there before the ark of the covenant of the LORD Asaph and his brethren, to minister before the ark continually, as every day's work required: 
And Obededom with their brethren, threescore and eight; Obededom also the son of Jeduthun and Hosah to be porters: 
And Zadok the priest, and his brethren the priests, before the tabernacle of the LORD in the high place that was at Gibeon, 
To offer burnt offerings unto the LORD upon the altar of the burnt offering continually morning and evening, and to do according to all that is written in the law of the LORD, which he commanded Israel; 
And with them 
613, away, and pluck thee out of thy dwelling place, and root thee out of the land of the living. Selah. 
The righteous also shall see, and fear, and shall laugh at him: 
Lo, this is the man that made not God his strength; but trusted in the abundance of his riches, and strengthened himself in his wickedness. 
But I am like a green olive tree in the house of God: I trust in the mercy of God for ever and ever. 
I will praise thee for ever, because thou hast done it: and I will wait on thy name; for it is good before thy saints. 
The fool hath said in his heart, There is no God. Corrupt are they, and have done a
495,after their covetousness. 
And, lo, thou art unto them as a very lovely song of one that hath a pleasant voice, and can play well on an instrument: for they hear thy words, but they do them not. 
And when this cometh to pass, (lo, it will come,) then shall they know that a prophet hath been among them. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, prophesy against the shepherds of Israel, prophesy, and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD unto the shepherds; Woe be to the s
488,followed Omri prevailed against the people that followed Tibni the son of Ginath: so Tibni died, and Omri reigned. 
In the thirty and first year of Asa king of Judah began Omri to reign over Israel, twelve years: six years reigned he in Tirzah. 
And he bought the hill Samaria of Shemer for two talents of silver, and built on the hill, and called the name of the city which he built, after the name of Shemer, owner of the hill, Samaria. 
But Omri wrought evil in the eyes of the LORD, a
573,Tyre, and Zidon, and all the coasts of Palestine? will ye render me a recompence? and if ye recompense me, swiftly and speedily will I return your recompence upon your own head; 
Because ye have taken my silver and my gold, and have carried into your temples my goodly pleasant things: 
The children also of Judah and the children of Jerusalem have ye sold unto the Grecians, that ye might remove them far from their border. 
Behold, I will raise them out of the place whither ye have sold them, and will return your recompence upon your own head: 
And I will sell your son
546,hat not alone at Ephesus, but almost throughout all Asia, this Paul hath persuaded and turned away much people, saying that they be no gods, which are made with hands: 
So that not only this our craft is in danger to be set at nought; but also that the temple of the great goddess Diana should be despised, and her magnificence should be destroyed, whom all Asia and the world worshippeth. 
And when they heard these sayings, they were full of wrath, and cried out, saying, Great is Diana of the Ephesians. 
And the whole city was filled with con
669,f I have done this; if there be iniquity in my hands; 
If I have rewarded evil unto him that was at peace with me; (yea, I have delivered him that without cause is mine enemy:) 
Let the enemy persecute my soul, and take it; yea, let him tread down my life upon the earth, and lay mine honour in the dust. Selah. 
Arise, O LORD, in thine anger, lift up thyself because of the rage of mine enemies: and awake for me to the judgment that thou hast commanded. 
So shall the congregation of the people compass thee about: for their sakes therefore return thou on high. 
The LORD shall judge the people: judge me, O LORD, according to my righteousness, and according to mine 
573,e. 
So they girded sackcloth on their loins, and put ropes on their heads, and came to the king of Israel, and said, Thy servant Benhadad saith, I pray thee, let me live. And he said, Is he yet alive? he is my brother. 
Now the men did diligently observe whether any thing would come from him, and did hastily catch it: and they said, Thy brother Benhadad. Then he said, Go ye, bring him. Then Benhadad came forth to him; and he caused him to come up into the chariot. 
And Ben-hadad said unto him, The cities, which my father took from thy father, I will restore; and thou
684,to all the congregation. 
And they put him in ward, because it was not declared what should be done to him. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, The man shall be surely put to death: all the congregation shall stone him with stones without the camp. 
And all the congregation brought him without the camp, and stoned him with stones, and he died; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, and bid them that they make them fringes in the borders of their garments throughout their generations, and that they put upon the fringe of the borders a ribband of blue: 
And it shall be unto you for a fringe, that ye may look upon it, 
703, with Saul and with Jonathan his son was there found. 
And the garrison of the Philistines went out to the passage of Michmash. 
Now it came to pass upon a day, that Jonathan the son of Saul said unto the young man that bare his armour, Come, and let us go over to the Philistines' garrison, that is on the other side. But he told not his father. 
And Saul tarried in the uttermost part of Gibeah under a pomegranate tree which is in Migron: and the people that were with him were about six hundred men; 
And Ahiah, the son of Ahitub, Ichabod's brother, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eli, the LORD's priest in Shiloh, wearing an ephod. And the people knew not that Jonathan was gone. 
And between the 
709,ants, and ye that fear him, both small and great. 
And I heard as it were the voice of a great multitude, and as the voice of many waters, and as the voice of mighty thunderings, saying, Alleluia: for the Lord God omnipotent reigneth. 
Let us be glad and rejoice, and give honour to him: for the marriage of the Lamb is come, and his wife hath made herself ready. 
And to her was granted that she should be arrayed in fine linen, clean and white: for the fine linen is the righteousness of saints. 
And he saith unto me, Write, Blessed are they which are called unto the marriage supper of the Lamb. And he saith unto me, These are the true sayings of God. 
And I fell at his feet to worship him. And he said 
660,ore thy dead. 
And Abraham hearkened unto Ephron; and Abraham weighed to Ephron the silver, which he had named in the audience of the sons of Heth, four hundred shekels of silver, current money with the merchant. 
And the field of Ephron which was in Machpelah, which was before Mamre, the field, and the cave which was therein, and all the trees that were in the field, that were in all the borders round about, were made sure 
Unto Abraham for a possession in the presence of the children of Heth, before all that went in at the gate of his city. 
And after this, Abraham buried Sarah his wife in the cave of the field of Machpelah before Mamre: the same is 
585, of great stature, whose fingers and toes were four and twenty, six on each hand, and six on each foot and he also was the son of the giant. 
But when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimea David's brother slew him. 
These were born unto the giant in Gath; and they fell by the hand of David, and by the hand of his servants. 
And Satan stood up against Israel, and provoked David to number Israel. 
And David said to Joab and to the rulers of the people, Go, number Israel from Beersheba even to Dan; and bring the number of them to me, that I may know it. 
And Joab answered, T
649,h his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And what saddle soever he rideth upon that hath the issue shall be unclean. 
And whosoever toucheth any thing that was under him shall be unclean until the even: and he that beareth any of those things shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And whomsoever he toucheth that hath the issue, and hath not rinsed his hands in water, he shall wash his clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the even. 
And the vessel of earth, that he toucheth which hath the issue, shall be broken: and every vessel of wood shall b
697, with pestilence; and thou shalt be cut off from the earth. 
And in very deed for this cause have I raised thee up, for to shew in thee my power; and that my name may be declared throughout all the earth. 
As yet exaltest thou thyself against my people, that thou wilt not let them go? 
Behold, to morrow about this time I will cause it to rain a very grievous hail, such as hath not been in Egypt since the foundation thereof even until now. 
Send therefore now, and gather thy cattle, and all that thou hast in the field; for upon every man and beast which shall be found in the field, and shall not be brought home, the hail shall come down upon them, and they shall die. 
He that feared the wo
582,idst thou write all these words at his mouth? 
Then Baruch answered them, He pronounced all these words unto me with his mouth, and I wrote them with ink in the book. 
Then said the princes unto Baruch, Go, hide thee, thou and Jeremiah; and let no man know where ye be. 
And they went in to the king into the court, but they laid up the roll in the chamber of Elishama the scribe, and told all the words in the ears of the king. 
So the king sent Jehudi to fetch the roll: and he took it out of Elishama the scribe's chamber. And Jehudi read it in the ears of the king, and in the e
694,ts ceaseth, the noise of them that rejoice endeth, the joy of the harp ceaseth. 
They shall not drink wine with a song; strong drink shall be bitter to them that drink it. 
The city of confusion is broken down: every house is shut up, that no man may come in. 
There is a crying for wine in the streets; all joy is darkened, the mirth of the land is gone. 
In the city is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with destruction. 
When thus it shall be in the midst of the land among the people, there shall be as the shaking of an olive tree, and as the gleaning grapes when the vintage is done. 
They shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty of the LORD, they shall cry alo
678, of the people with a great slaughter. 
And the men of Bethshemesh said, Who is able to stand before this holy LORD God? and to whom shall he go up from us? 
And they sent messengers to the inhabitants of Kirjathjearim, saying, The Philistines have brought again the ark of the LORD; come ye down, and fetch it up to you. 
And the men of Kirjathjearim came, and fetched up the ark of the LORD, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and sanctified Eleazar his son to keep the ark of the LORD. 
And it came to pass, while the ark abode in Kirjathjearim, that the time was long; for it was twenty years: and all the house of Israel lamented after the LORD. 
And Sa
577,e fire yonder; for they are hallowed. 
The censers of these sinners against their own souls, let them make them broad plates for a covering of the altar: for they offered them before the LORD, therefore they are hallowed: and they shall be a sign unto the children of Israel. 
And Eleazar the priest took the brasen censers, wherewith they that were burnt had offered; and they were made broad plates for a covering of the altar: 
To be a memorial unto the children of Israel, that no stranger, which is not of the seed of Aaron, come near to offer incense before the LORD; tha
651, dam; on the eighth day thou shalt give it me. 
And ye shall be holy men unto me: neither shall ye eat any flesh that is torn of beasts in the field; ye shall cast it to the dogs. 
Thou shalt not raise a false report: put not thine hand with the wicked to be an unrighteous witness. 
Thou shalt not follow a multitude to do evil; neither shalt thou speak in a cause to decline after many to wrest judgment: 
Neither shalt thou countenance a poor man in his cause. 
If thou meet thine enemy's ox or his ass going astray, thou shalt surely bring it back to him again. 
If thou see the ass of him that hateth thee lying under his burden, and wouldest for
597,ing, What have I done? every one turned to his course, as the horse rusheth into the battle. 
Yea, the stork in the heaven knoweth her appointed times; and the turtle and the crane and the swallow observe the time of their coming; but my people know not the judgment of the LORD. 
How do ye say, We are wise, and the law of the LORD is with us? Lo, certainly in vain made he it; the pen of the scribes is in vain. 
The wise men are ashamed, they are dismayed and taken: lo, they have rejected the word of the LORD; and what wisdom is in them? 
Therefore will I give their wives unto others, and th
490,rtificer in brass and iron: and the sister of Tubalcain was Naamah. 
And Lamech said unto his wives, Adah and Zillah, Hear my voice; ye wives of Lamech, hearken unto my speech: for I have slain a man to my wounding, and a young man to my hurt. 
If Cain shall be avenged sevenfold, truly Lamech seventy and sevenfold. 
And Adam knew his wife again; and she bare a son, and called his name Seth: For God, said she, hath appointed me another seed instead of Abel, whom Cain slew. 
And to Seth,
703,d shalt be the third ruler in the kingdom. 
Then Daniel answered and said before the king, Let thy gifts be to thyself, and give thy rewards to another; yet I will read the writing unto the king, and make known to him the interpretation. 
O thou king, the most high God gave Nebuchadnezzar thy father a kingdom, and majesty, and glory, and honour: 
And for the majesty that he gave him, all people, nations, and languages, trembled and feared before him: whom he would he slew; and whom he would he kept alive; and whom he would he set up; and whom he would he put down. 
But when his heart was lifted up, and his mind hardened in pride, he was deposed from his kingly throne, and they took his glory fr
548,thy God for any vow: for even both these are abomination unto the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt not lend upon usury to thy brother; usury of money, usury of victuals, usury of any thing that is lent upon usury: 
Unto a stranger thou mayest lend upon usury; but unto thy brother thou shalt not lend upon usury: that the LORD thy God may bless thee in all that thou settest thine hand to in the land whither thou goest to possess it. 
When thou shalt vow a vow unto the LORD thy God, thou shalt not slack to pay it: for the LORD thy God will surely requi
552,n, and earth, the sea, and all that therein is: which keepeth truth for ever: 
Which executeth judgment for the oppressed: which giveth food to the hungry. The LORD looseth the prisoners: 
The LORD openeth the eyes of the blind: the LORD raiseth them that are bowed down: the LORD loveth the righteous: 
The LORD preserveth the strangers; he relieveth the fatherless and widow: but the way of the wicked he turneth upside down. 
The LORD shall reign for ever, even thy God, O Zion, unto all generations. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD: for it 
559, smote him. 
And when they had blindfolded him, they struck him on the face, and asked him, saying, Prophesy, who is it that smote thee? 
And many other things blasphemously spake they against him. 
And as soon as it was day, the elders of the people and the chief priests and the scribes came together, and led him into their council, saying, 
Art thou the Christ? tell us. And he said unto them, If I tell you, ye will not believe: 
And if I also ask you, ye will not answer me, nor let me go. 
Hereafter shall the Son of man sit on the right hand of the po
685,s' houses. 
But what went ye out for to see? A prophet? yea, I say unto you, and more than a prophet. 
For this is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee. 
Verily I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there hath not risen a greater than John the Baptist: notwithstanding he that is least in the kingdom of heaven is greater than he. 
And from the days of John the Baptist until now the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent take it by force. 
For all the prophets and the law prophesied until John. 
And if ye will receive it, this is Elias, which was for to come. 
He that hath ears 
610,ts of Gebal and the wise men thereof were in thee thy calkers: all the ships of the sea with their mariners were in thee to occupy thy merchandise. 
They of Persia and of Lud and of Phut were in thine army, thy men of war: they hanged the shield and helmet in thee; they set forth thy comeliness. 
The men of Arvad with thine army were upon thy walls round about, and the Gammadims were in thy towers: they hanged their shields upon thy walls round about; they have made thy beauty perfect. 
Tarshish was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of all kind of riches; with silver, iron, tin, and lead, they tra
574, sojourning of the children of Israel, who dwelt in Egypt, was four hundred and thirty years. 
And it came to pass at the end of the four hundred and thirty years, even the selfsame day it came to pass, that all the hosts of the LORD went out from the land of Egypt. 
It is a night to be much observed unto the LORD for bringing them out from the land of Egypt: this is that night of the LORD to be observed of all the children of Israel in their generations. 
And the LORD said unto Moses and Aaron, This is the ordinance of the passover: There shall no stranger eat thereo
670,a beyond Jordan, where John was baptizing. 
The next day John seeth Jesus coming unto him, and saith, Behold the Lamb of God, which taketh away the sin of the world. 
This is he of whom I said, After me cometh a man which is preferred before me: for he was before me. 
And I knew him not: but that he should be made manifest to Israel, therefore am I come baptizing with water. 
And John bare record, saying, I saw the Spirit descending from heaven like a dove, and it abode upon him. 
And I knew him not: but he that sent me to baptize with water, the same said unto me, Upon whom thou shalt see the Spirit descending, and remaining on him, the same is he which baptize
662, after that ye were come forth out of Egypt. 
When thou dost lend thy brother any thing, thou shalt not go into his house to fetch his pledge. 
Thou shalt stand abroad, and the man to whom thou dost lend shall bring out the pledge abroad unto thee. 
And if the man be poor, thou shalt not sleep with his pledge: 
In any case thou shalt deliver him the pledge again when the sun goeth down, that he may sleep in his own raiment, and bless thee: and it shall be righteousness unto thee before the LORD thy God. 
Thou shalt not oppress an hired servant that is poor and needy, whether he be of thy brethren, or of thy strangers that are in thy land within thy gates
596,r man did, they had not had sin: but now have they both seen and hated both me and my Father. 
But this cometh to pass, that the word might be fulfilled that is written in their law, They hated me without a cause. 
But when the Comforter is come, whom I will send unto you from the Father, even the Spirit of truth, which proceedeth from the Father, he shall testify of me: 
And ye also shall bear witness, because ye have been with me from the beginning. 
These things have I spoken unto you, that ye should not be offended. 
They shall put you out of the synagogues: yea, the time cometh, that 
525, us. 
And he said unto him, Behold now, there is in this city a man of God, and he is an honourable man; all that he saith cometh surely to pass: now let us go thither; peradventure he can shew us our way that we should go. 
Then said Saul to his servant, But, behold, if we go, what shall we bring the man? for the bread is spent in our vessels, and there is not a present to bring to the man of God: what have we? 
And the servant answered Saul again, and said, Behold, I have here at hand the fourth part of a shekel of si
608,nd thou shalt speak, and be no more dumb: and thou shalt be a sign unto them; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 
Son of man, set thy face against the Ammonites, and prophesy against them; 
And say unto the Ammonites, Hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou saidst, Aha, against my sanctuary, when it was profaned; and against the land of Israel, when it was desolate; and against the house of Judah, when they went into captivity; 
Behold, therefore I will deliver thee to the men of the east for a possession, and they sha
519,nto the people: for the cause was of God, that the LORD might perform his word, which he spake by the hand of Ahijah the Shilonite to Jeroboam the son of Nebat. 
And when all Israel saw that the king would not hearken unto them, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David? and we have none inheritance in the son of Jesse: every man to your tents, O Israel: and now, David, see to thine own house. So all Israel went to their tents. 
But as for the children of Israel that dwelt in the cities o
557,ot possible that the blood of bulls and of goats should take away sins. 
Wherefore when he cometh into the world, he saith, Sacrifice and offering thou wouldest not, but a body hast thou prepared me: 
In burnt offerings and sacrifices for sin thou hast had no pleasure. 
Then said I, Lo, I come (in the volume of the book it is written of me,) to do thy will, O God. 
Above when he said, Sacrifice and offering and burnt offerings and offering for sin thou wouldest not, neither hadst pleasure therein; which are offered by the law; 
Then said he, Lo, I com
648, 
And they dwelt therein, and have built thee a sanctuary therein for thy name, saying, 
If, when evil cometh upon us, as the sword, judgment, or pestilence, or famine, we stand before this house, and in thy presence, (for thy name is in this house,) and cry unto thee in our affliction, then thou wilt hear and help. 
And now, behold, the children of Ammon and Moab and mount Seir, whom thou wouldest not let Israel invade, when they came out of the land of Egypt, but they turned from them, and destroyed them not; 
Behold, I say, how they reward us, to come to cast us out of thy possession, which thou hast given us to inherit. 
O our God, wilt
573,t was not the king of Israel, they turned back again from pursuing him. 
And a certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of Israel between the joints of the harness: therefore he said to his chariot man, Turn thine hand, that thou mayest carry me out of the host; for I am wounded. 
And the battle increased that day: howbeit the king of Israel stayed himself up in his chariot against the Syrians until the even: and about the time of the sun going down he died. 
And Jehoshaphat the king of Judah returned to his house in peace to Jerusalem. 
And Jehu the s
544,e sea in multitude, eating and drinking, and making merry. 
And Solomon reigned over all kingdoms from the river unto the land of the Philistines, and unto the border of Egypt: they brought presents, and served Solomon all the days of his life. 
And Solomon's provision for one day was thirty measures of fine flour, and threescore measures of meal, 
Ten fat oxen, and twenty oxen out of the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and roebucks, and fallowdeer, and fatted fowl. 
For he had dominion over all the region on this side the r
575,bolster. 
And Saul knew David's voice, and said, Is this thy voice, my son David? And David said, It is my voice, my lord, O king. 
And he said, Wherefore doth my lord thus pursue after his servant? for what have I done? or what evil is in mine hand? 
Now therefore, I pray thee, let my lord the king hear the words of his servant. If the LORD have stirred thee up against me, let him accept an offering: but if they be the children of men, cursed be they before the LORD; for they have driven me out this day from abiding in the inheritance of the LORD, saying, Go, serve ot
563,e altar, and upon the posts of the gate of the inner court. 
And so thou shalt do the seventh day of the month for every one that erreth, and for him that is simple: so shall ye reconcile the house. 
In the first month, in the fourteenth day of the month, ye shall have the passover, a feast of seven days; unleavened bread shall be eaten. 
And upon that day shall the prince prepare for himself and for all the people of the land a bullock for a sin offering. 
And seven days of the feast he shall prepare a burnt offering to the LORD, seven bullocks and seven r
662, bless the LORD your God. And all the congregation blessed the LORD God of their fathers, and bowed down their heads, and worshipped the LORD, and the king. 
And they sacrificed sacrifices unto the LORD, and offered burnt offerings unto the LORD, on the morrow after that day, even a thousand bullocks, a thousand rams, and a thousand lambs, with their drink offerings, and sacrifices in abundance for all Israel: 
And did eat and drink before the LORD on that day with great gladness. And they made Solomon the son of David king the second time, and anointed him unto the LORD to be the chief governor, and Zadok to be priest. 
Then Solomon sat on the throne of
658,now that I am the LORD, when I shall scatter them among the nations, and disperse them in the countries. 
But I will leave a few men of them from the sword, from the famine, and from the pestilence; that they may declare all their abominations among the heathen whither they come; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
Moreover the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 
Son of man, eat thy bread with quaking, and drink thy water with trembling and with carefulness; 
And say unto the people of the land, Thus saith the Lord GOD of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and of the land of Israel; They shall eat their bread with carefulness, and drink their water
709,cut off those that have familiar spirits, and the wizards, out of the land: wherefore then layest thou a snare for my life, to cause me to die? 
And Saul sware to her by the LORD, saying, As the LORD liveth, there shall no punishment happen to thee for this thing. 
Then said the woman, Whom shall I bring up unto thee? And he said, Bring me up Samuel. 
And when the woman saw Samuel, she cried with a loud voice: and the woman spake to Saul, saying, Why hast thou deceived me? for thou art Saul. 
And the king said unto her, Be not afraid: for what sawest thou? And the woman said unto Saul, I saw gods ascending out of the earth. 
And he said unto her, What form is he of? And she said, An old man cometh up
482,the judgments, which the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses unto the children of Israel in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho. 
These be the words which Moses spake unto all Israel on this side Jordan in the wilderness, in the plain over against the Red sea, between Paran, and Tophel, and Laban, and Hazeroth, and Dizahab. 
(There are eleven days' journey from Horeb by the way of mount Seir unto Kadeshbarnea.) 
And it came to pass in the fortieth year, in the eleventh mo
567,or for sheep, or for wine, or for strong drink, or for whatsoever thy soul desireth: and thou shalt eat there before the LORD thy God, and thou shalt rejoice, thou, and thine household, 
And the Levite that is within thy gates; thou shalt not forsake him; for he hath no part nor inheritance with thee. 
At the end of three years thou shalt bring forth all the tithe of thine increase the same year, and shalt lay it up within thy gates: 
And the Levite, (because he hath no part nor inheritance with thee,) and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, which 
581,n lien with. In the ways hast thou sat for them, as the Arabian in the wilderness; and thou hast polluted the land with thy whoredoms and with thy wickedness. 
Therefore the showers have been withholden, and there hath been no latter rain; and thou hadst a whore's forehead, thou refusedst to be ashamed. 
Wilt thou not from this time cry unto me, My father, thou art the guide of my youth? 
Will he reserve his anger for ever? will he keep it to the end? Behold, thou hast spoken and done evil things as thou couldest. 
The LORD said also unto me in the days of Josiah the king, H
564,f the stars, how high they are! 
And thou sayest, How doth God know? can he judge through the dark cloud? 
Thick clouds are a covering to him, that he seeth not; and he walketh in the circuit of heaven. 
Hast thou marked the old way which wicked men have trodden? 
Which were cut down out of time, whose foundation was overflown with a flood: 
Which said unto God, Depart from us: and what can the Almighty do for them? 
Yet he filled their houses with good things: but the counsel of the wicked is far from me. 
The righteous see it, and are glad: and the innocen
628,! 
Let them exalt him also in the congregation of the people, and praise him in the assembly of the elders. 
He turneth rivers into a wilderness, and the watersprings into dry ground; 
A fruitful land into barrenness, for the wickedness of them that dwell therein. 
He turneth the wilderness into a standing water, and dry ground into watersprings. 
And there he maketh the hungry to dwell, that they may prepare a city for habitation; 
And sow the fields, and plant vineyards, which may yield fruits of increase. 
He blesseth them also, so that they are multiplied greatly; and suffereth not their cattle to decrease. 
Again, t
513,my people is broken with a great breach, with a very grievous blow. 
If I go forth into the field, then behold the slain with the sword! and if I enter into the city, then behold them that are sick with famine! yea, both the prophet and the priest go about into a land that they know not. 
Hast thou utterly rejected Judah? hath thy soul lothed Zion? why hast thou smitten us, and there is no healing for us? we looked for peace, and there is no good; and for the time of healing, and behold trouble! 
We acknowle
510,try spake to us, saying, Take victuals with you for the journey, and go to meet them, and say unto them, We are your servants: therefore now make ye a league with us. 
This our bread we took hot for our provision out of our houses on the day we came forth to go unto you; but now, behold, it is dry, and it is mouldy: 
And these bottles of wine, which we filled, were new; and, behold, they be rent: and these our garments and our shoes are become old by reason of the very long journey. 
And the men took of t
567,he tribes of Levi he gave none inheritance; the sacrifices of the LORD God of Israel made by fire are their inheritance, as he said unto them. 
And Moses gave unto the tribe of the children of Reuben inheritance according to their families. 
And their coast was from Aroer, that is on the bank of the river Arnon, and the city that is in the midst of the river, and all the plain by Medeba; 
Heshbon, and all her cities that are in the plain; Dibon, and Bamothbaal, and Bethbaalmeon, 
And Jahaza, and Kedemoth, and Mephaath, 
And Kirjathaim, and Sibmah, and Zarethsha
663, us? 
Surely your turning of things upside down shall be esteemed as the potter's clay: for shall the work say of him that made it, He made me not? or shall the thing framed say of him that framed it, He had no understanding? 
Is it not yet a very little while, and Lebanon shall be turned into a fruitful field, and the fruitful field shall be esteemed as a forest? 
And in that day shall the deaf hear the words of the book, and the eyes of the blind shall see out of obscurity, and out of darkness. 
The meek also shall increase their joy in the LORD, and the poor among men shall rejoice in the Holy One of Israel. 
For the terrible one is brought to nought, 
700,rden Pharaoh's heart, and multiply my signs and my wonders in the land of Egypt. 
But Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you, that I may lay my hand upon Egypt, and bring forth mine armies, and my people the children of Israel, out of the land of Egypt by great judgments. 
And the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I stretch forth mine hand upon Egypt, and bring out the children of Israel from among them. 
And Moses and Aaron did as the LORD commanded them, so did they. 
And Moses was fourscore years old, and Aaron fourscore and three years old, when they spake unto Pharaoh. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 
When Pharaoh shall speak unto you, saying, Shew a mirac
693,a man will sustain his infirmity; but a wounded spirit who can bear? 
The heart of the prudent getteth knowledge; and the ear of the wise seeketh knowledge. 
A man's gift maketh room for him, and bringeth him before great men. 
He that is first in his own cause seemeth just; but his neighbour cometh and searcheth him. 
The lot causeth contentions to cease, and parteth between the mighty. 
A brother offended is harder to be won than a strong city: and their contentions are like the bars of a castle. 
A man's belly shall be satisfied with the fruit of his mouth; and with the increase of his lips shall he be filled. 
Death and life are in the power of the tongue: and they that love it sh
495,up those of his that did remain in the day of distress. 
For the day of the LORD is near upon all the heathen: as thou hast done, it shall be done unto thee: thy reward shall return upon thine own head. 
For as ye have drunk upon my holy mountain, so shall all the heathen drink continually, yea, they shall drink, and they shall swallow down, and they shall be as though they had not been. 
But upon mount Zion shall be deliverance, and there shall be holiness; and the house of Jacob shall pos
714,ings come to pass, know that it is nigh, even at the doors. 
Verily I say unto you, that this generation shall not pass, till all these things be done. 
Heaven and earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass away. 
But of that day and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels which are in heaven, neither the Son, but the Father. 
Take ye heed, watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is. 
For the Son of Man is as a man taking a far journey, who left his house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his work, and commanded the porter to watch. 
Watch ye therefore: for ye know not when the master of the house cometh, at even, or at midnight, or at the cockcrowing, or in the morn
567,d against him to slay him. 
And they said one to another, Behold, this dreamer cometh. 
Come now therefore, and let us slay him, and cast him into some pit, and we will say, Some evil beast hath devoured him: and we shall see what will become of his dreams. 
And Reuben heard it, and he delivered him out of their hands; and said, Let us not kill him. 
And Reuben said unto them, Shed no blood, but cast him into this pit that is in the wilderness, and lay no hand upon him; that he might rid him out of their hands, to deliver him to his father again. 
And it came t
493,y endureth for ever. 
Who can utter the mighty acts of the LORD? who can shew forth all his praise? 
Blessed are they that keep judgment, and he that doeth righteousness at all times. 
Remember me, O LORD, with the favour that thou bearest unto thy people: O visit me with thy salvation; 
That I may see the good of thy chosen, that I may rejoice in the gladness of thy nation, that I may glory with thine inheritance. 
We have sinned with our fathers, we have committed iniquity, we have done
554, LORD men depart from evil. 
When a man's ways please the LORD, he maketh even his enemies to be at peace with him. 
Better is a little with righteousness than great revenues without right. 
A man's heart deviseth his way: but the LORD directeth his steps. 
A divine sentence is in the lips of the king: his mouth transgresseth not in judgment. 
A just weight and balance are the LORD's: all the weights of the bag are his work. 
It is an abomination to kings to commit wickedness: for the throne is established by righteousness. 
Righteous lips are the 
719, for all the words of this letter, and of that which they had seen concerning this matter, and which had come unto them, 
The Jews ordained, and took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all such as joined themselves unto them, so as it should not fail, that they would keep these two days according to their writing, and according to their appointed time every year; 
And that these days should be remembered and kept throughout every generation, every family, every province, and every city; and that these days of Purim should not fail from among the Jews, nor the memorial of them perish from their seed. 
Then Esther the queen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the Jew, wrote with all authority, to confir
666,, and every one mourn that dwelleth therein? and it shall rise up wholly as a flood; and it shall be cast out and drowned, as by the flood of Egypt. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the Lord GOD, that I will cause the sun to go down at noon, and I will darken the earth in the clear day: 
And I will turn your feasts into mourning, and all your songs into lamentation; and I will bring up sackcloth upon all loins, and baldness upon every head; and I will make it as the mourning of an only son, and the end thereof as a bitter day. 
Behold, the days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a famine in the land, not a famine of bread, nor a thirst f
588, nor thy sons with thee, when ye go into the tabernacle of the congregation, lest ye die: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations: 
And that ye may put difference between holy and unholy, and between unclean and clean; 
And that ye may teach the children of Israel all the statutes which the LORD hath spoken unto them by the hand of Moses. 
And Moses spake unto Aaron, and unto Eleazar and unto Ithamar, his sons that were left, Take the meat offering that remaineth of the offerings of the LORD made by fire, and eat it without leaven beside the altar: for it is most
598,two kings of Midian, Zebah and Zalmunna, and discomfited all the host. 
And Gideon the son of Joash returned from battle before the sun was up, 
And caught a young man of the men of Succoth, and enquired of him: and he described unto him the princes of Succoth, and the elders thereof, even threescore and seventeen men. 
And he came unto the men of Succoth, and said, Behold Zebah and Zalmunna, with whom ye did upbraid me, saying, Are the hands of Zebah and Zalmunna now in thine hand, that we should give bread unto thy men that are weary? 
And he took the elders of the city, and thorns of the 
594,ales, and every living creature that moveth, which the waters brought forth abundantly, after their kind, and every winged fowl after his kind: and God saw that it was good. 
And God blessed them, saying, Be fruitful, and multiply, and fill the waters in the seas, and let fowl multiply in the earth. 
And the evening and the morning were the fifth day. 
And God said, Let the earth bring forth the living creature after his kind, cattle, and creeping thing, and beast of the earth after his kind: and it was so. 
And God made the beast of the earth after his kind, and cattle after their kind,
668,r sins; for we also forgive every one that is indebted to us. And lead us not into temptation; but deliver us from evil. 
And he said unto them, Which of you shall have a friend, and shall go unto him at midnight, and say unto him, Friend, lend me three loaves; 
For a friend of mine in his journey is come to me, and I have nothing to set before him? 
And he from within shall answer and say, Trouble me not: the door is now shut, and my children are with me in bed; I cannot rise and give thee. 
I say unto you, Though he will not rise and give him, because he is his friend, yet because of his importunity he will rise and give him as many as he needeth. 
And I say
614, a man. 
Then came his disciples, and said unto him, Knowest thou that the Pharisees were offended, after they heard this saying? 
But he answered and said, Every plant, which my heavenly Father hath not planted, shall be rooted up. 
Let them alone: they be blind leaders of the blind. And if the blind lead the blind, both shall fall into the ditch. 
Then answered Peter and said unto him, Declare unto us this parable. 
And Jesus said, Are ye also yet without understanding? 
Do not ye yet understand, that whatsoever entereth in at the mouth goeth into the belly, and is cast out into the draught? 
But those th
567,ith the princes of his people. 
He maketh the barren woman to keep house, and to be a joyful mother of children. Praise ye the LORD. 
When Israel went out of Egypt, the house of Jacob from a people of strange language; 
Judah was his sanctuary, and Israel his dominion. 
The sea saw it, and fled: Jordan was driven back. 
The mountains skipped like rams, and the little hills like lambs. 
What ailed thee, O thou sea, that thou fleddest? thou Jordan, that thou wast driven back? 
Ye mountains, that ye skipped like rams; and ye little hills, like lambs? 
Tremble, tho
680,l. 
My soul hath them still in remembrance, and is humbled in me. 
This I recall to my mind, therefore have I hope. 
It is of the LORD's mercies that we are not consumed, because his compassions fail not. 
They are new every morning: great is thy faithfulness. 
The LORD is my portion, saith my soul; therefore will I hope in him. 
The LORD is good unto them that wait for him, to the soul that seeketh him. 
It is good that a man should both hope and quietly wait for the salvation of the LORD. 
It is good for a man that he bear the yoke of his youth. 
He sitteth alone and keepeth silence, because he hath borne it upon him. 
He putteth his mouth in the dust; if so be there ma
563,children of the east were gathered together, and went over, and pitched in the valley of Jezreel. 
But the Spirit of the LORD came upon Gideon, and he blew a trumpet; and Abiezer was gathered after him. 
And he sent messengers throughout all Manasseh; who also was gathered after him: and he sent messengers unto Asher, and unto Zebulun, and unto Naphtali; and they came up to meet them. 
And Gideon said unto God, If thou wilt save Israel by mine hand, as thou hast said, 
Behold, I will put a fleece of wool in the floor; and if the dew be on the fleece only, a
493, on the bank of the river Arnon, and the city that is in the midst of the river, and all the plain by Medeba; 
Heshbon, and all her cities that are in the plain; Dibon, and Bamothbaal, and Bethbaalmeon, 
And Jahaza, and Kedemoth, and Mephaath, 
And Kirjathaim, and Sibmah, and Zarethshahar in the mount of the valley, 
And Bethpeor, and Ashdothpisgah, and Bethjeshimoth, 
And all the cities of the plain, and all the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, which reigned in Heshbon, whom Moses 
693, will take away out of the midst of thee them that rejoice in thy pride, and thou shalt no more be haughty because of my holy mountain. 
I will also leave in the midst of thee an afflicted and poor people, and they shall trust in the name of the LORD. 
The remnant of Israel shall not do iniquity, nor speak lies; neither shall a deceitful tongue be found in their mouth: for they shall feed and lie down, and none shall make them afraid. 
Sing, O daughter of Zion; shout, O Israel; be glad and rejoice with all the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem. 
The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast out thine enemy: the king of Israel, even the LORD, is in the midst of thee: thou shalt not
632, the swan, and the pelican, and the gier eagle, 
And the stork, the heron after her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat. 
All fowls that creep, going upon all four, shall be an abomination unto you. 
Yet these may ye eat of every flying creeping thing that goeth upon all four, which have legs above their feet, to leap withal upon the earth; 
Even these of them ye may eat; the locust after his kind, and the bald locust after his kind, and the beetle after his kind, and the grasshopper after his kind. 
But all other flying creeping things, which have four feet, shall be an abomination unto you. 
And for these ye shall be unclea
642,ou, as he hath promised you!) 
How can I myself alone bear your cumbrance, and your burden, and your strife? 
Take you wise men, and understanding, and known among your tribes, and I will make them rulers over you. 
And ye answered me, and said, The thing which thou hast spoken is good for us to do. 
So I took the chief of your tribes, wise men, and known, and made them heads over you, captains over thousands, and captains over hundreds, and captains over fifties, and captains over tens, and officers among your tribes. 
And I charged your judges at that time, saying, Hear the causes between your brethren, and judge righteously between
601,h day: and, behold, if the plague be somewhat dark, and the plague spread not in the skin, the priest shall pronounce him clean: it is but a scab: and he shall wash his clothes, and be clean. 
But if the scab spread much abroad in the skin, after that he hath been seen of the priest for his cleansing, he shall be seen of the priest again. 
And if the priest see that, behold, the scab spreadeth in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a leprosy. 
When the plague of leprosy is in a man, then he shall be brought unto the priest; 
And the priest shall see him: and, behold, if
647,otten us again unto a lively hope by the resurrection of Jesus Christ from the dead, 
To an inheritance incorruptible, and undefiled, and that fadeth not away, reserved in heaven for you, 
Who are kept by the power of God through faith unto salvation ready to be revealed in the last time. 
Wherein ye greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be, ye are in heaviness through manifold temptations: 
That the trial of your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth, though it be tried with fire, might be found unto praise and honour and glory at the appearing of Jesus Christ: 
Whom having not seen, ye love; in whom, tho
622, day of the LORD is at hand: for the LORD hath prepared a sacrifice, he hath bid his guests. 
And it shall come to pass in the day of the LORD's sacrifice, that I will punish the princes, and the king's children, and all such as are clothed with strange apparel. 
In the same day also will I punish all those that leap on the threshold, which fill their masters' houses with violence and deceit. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD, that there shall be the noise of a cry from the fish gate, and an howling from the second, and a great crashing from the hills. 
Howl, ye inhabitants of Maktesh, for all 
571,sea. 
Now when much time was spent, and when sailing was now dangerous, because the fast was now already past, Paul admonished them, 
And said unto them, Sirs, I perceive that this voyage will be with hurt and much damage, not only of the lading and ship, but also of our lives. 
Nevertheless the centurion believed the master and the owner of the ship, more than those things which were spoken by Paul. 
And because the haven was not commodious to winter in, the more part advised to depart thence also, if by any means they might attain to Phenice, and there to winter;
606, as Ariel. 
And I will camp against thee round about, and will lay siege against thee with a mount, and I will raise forts against thee. 
And thou shalt be brought down, and shalt speak out of the ground, and thy speech shall be low out of the dust, and thy voice shall be, as of one that hath a familiar spirit, out of the ground, and thy speech shall whisper out of the dust. 
Moreover the multitude of thy strangers shall be like small dust, and the multitude of the terrible ones shall be as chaff that passeth away: yea, it shall be at an instant suddenly. 
Thou shalt be visited of the LORD of hosts 
491, man, that thou shouldest magnify him? and that thou shouldest set thine heart upon him? 
And that thou shouldest visit him every morning, and try him every moment? 
How long wilt thou not depart from me, nor let me alone till I swallow down my spittle? 
I have sinned; what shall I do unto thee, O thou preserver of men? why hast thou set me as a mark against thee, so that I am a burden to myself? 
And why dost thou not pardon my transgression, and take away my iniquity? for now shall I 
600,s fathers, and was buried in the city of David his father: and Rehoboam his son reigned in his stead. 
And Rehoboam went to Shechem: for all Israel were come to Shechem to make him king. 
And it came to pass, when Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who was yet in Egypt, heard of it, (for he was fled from the presence of king Solomon, and Jeroboam dwelt in Egypt;) 
That they sent and called him. And Jeroboam and all the congregation of Israel came, and spake unto Rehoboam, saying, 
Thy father made our yoke grievous: now therefore make thou the grievous service of thy father, and his heavy yoke which he
497,rom among his people. 
And whatsoever soul it be that doeth any work in that same day, the same soul will I destroy from among his people. 
Ye shall do no manner of work: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations in all your dwellings. 
It shall be unto you a sabbath of rest, and ye shall afflict your souls: in the ninth day of the month at even, from even unto even, shall ye celebrate your sabbath. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, s
699,people, Come near unto me. And all the people came near unto him. And he repaired the altar of the LORD that was broken down. 
And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the number of the tribes of the sons of Jacob, unto whom the word of the LORD came, saying, Israel shall be thy name: 
And with the stones he built an altar in the name of the LORD: and he made a trench about the altar, as great as would contain two measures of seed. 
And he put the wood in order, and cut the bullock in pieces, and laid him on the wood, and said, Fill four barrels with water, and pour it on the burnt sacrifice, and on the wood. 
And he said, Do it the second time. And they did it the second time. And he sa
683,n by name: him they compelled to bear his cross. 
And when they were come unto a place called Golgotha, that is to say, a place of a skull, 
They gave him vinegar to drink mingled with gall: and when he had tasted thereof, he would not drink. 
And they crucified him, and parted his garments, casting lots: that it might be fulfilled which was spoken by the prophet, They parted my garments among them, and upon my vesture did they cast lots. 
And sitting down they watched him there; 
And set up over his head his accusation written, THIS IS JESUS THE KING OF THE JEWS. 
Then were there two thieves crucified with him, one on the right hand, and another on the left. 
And they that 
523,And these things will they do unto you, because they have not known the Father, nor me. 
But these things have I told you, that when the time shall come, ye may remember that I told you of them. And these things I said not unto you at the beginning, because I was with you. 
But now I go my way to him that sent me; and none of you asketh me, Whither goest thou? 
But because I have said these things unto you, sorrow hath filled your heart. 
Nevertheless I tell you the truth; It is expedient for you that I go away: for i
576,t he, willing to justify himself, said unto Jesus, And who is my neighbour? 
And Jesus answering said, A certain man went down from Jerusalem to Jericho, and fell among thieves, which stripped him of his raiment, and wounded him, and departed, leaving him half dead. 
And by chance there came down a certain priest that way: and when he saw him, he passed by on the other side. 
And likewise a Levite, when he was at the place, came and looked on him, and passed by on the other side. 
But a certain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and when he saw him, he had c
608,g of Judah began Baasha the son of Ahijah to reign over all Israel in Tirzah, twenty and four years. 
And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of Jeroboam, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
Then the word of the LORD came to Jehu the son of Hanani against Baasha, saying, 
Forasmuch as I exalted thee out of the dust, and made thee prince over my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the way of Jeroboam, and hast made my people Israel to sin, to provoke me to anger with their sins; 
Behold, I will take away the posterity of Baasha, and the posterity of his house; an
528,e your rest: behold, the hour is at hand, and the Son of man is betrayed into the hands of sinners. 
Rise, let us be going: behold, he is at hand that doth betray me. 
And while he yet spake, lo, Judas, one of the twelve, came, and with him a great multitude with swords and staves, from the chief priests and elders of the people. 
Now he that betrayed him gave them a sign, saying, Whomsoever I shall kiss, that same is he: hold him fast. 
And forthwith he came to Jesus, and said, Hail, master; and kissed him. 
And Jesus sai
480,hall make a spoil of thy riches, and make a prey of thy merchandise: and they shall break down thy walls, and destroy thy pleasant houses: and they shall lay thy stones and thy timber and thy dust in the midst of the water. 
And I will cause the noise of thy songs to cease; and the sound of thy harps shall be no more heard. 
And I will make thee like the top of a rock: thou shalt be a place to spread nets upon; thou shalt be built no more: for I the LORD have spoken it, saith
670,his servants the prophets. 
Yea, all Israel have transgressed thy law, even by departing, that they might not obey thy voice; therefore the curse is poured upon us, and the oath that is written in the law of Moses the servant of God, because we have sinned against him. 
And he hath confirmed his words, which he spake against us, and against our judges that judged us, by bringing upon us a great evil: for under the whole heaven hath not been done as hath been done upon Jerusalem. 
As it is written in the law of Moses, all this evil is come upon us: yet made we not our prayer before the LORD our God, that we might turn from our iniquities, and understand thy truth
559,ylon, came Nebuzaradan, captain of the guard, which served the king of Babylon, into Jerusalem, 
And burned the house of the LORD, and the king's house; and all the houses of Jerusalem, and all the houses of the great men, burned he with fire: 
And all the army of the Chaldeans, that were with the captain of the guard, brake down all the walls of Jerusalem round about. 
Then Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carried away captive certain of the poor of the people, and the residue of the people that remained in the city, and those that fell away, that 
593,ou art come to excellent ornaments: thy breasts are fashioned, and thine hair is grown, whereas thou wast naked and bare. 
Now when I passed by thee, and looked upon thee, behold, thy time was the time of love; and I spread my skirt over thee, and covered thy nakedness: yea, I sware unto thee, and entered into a covenant with thee, saith the Lord GOD, and thou becamest mine. 
Then washed I thee with water; yea, I throughly washed away thy blood from thee, and I anointed thee with oil. 
I clothed thee also with broidered work, and shod thee with badgers' skin, and I girded thee about wit
693,servant, she shall not go out as the menservants do. 
If she please not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself, then shall he let her be redeemed: to sell her unto a strange nation he shall have no power, seeing he hath dealt deceitfully with her. 
And if he have betrothed her unto his son, he shall deal with her after the manner of daughters. 
If he take him another wife; her food, her raiment, and her duty of marriage, shall he not diminish. 
And if he do not these three unto her, then shall she go out free without money. 
He that smiteth a man, so that he die, shall be surely put to death. 
And if a man lie not in wait, but God deliver him into his hand; then I will appoint 
696,rs of the river? 
Thine own wickedness shall correct thee, and thy backslidings shall reprove thee: know therefore and see that it is an evil thing and bitter, that thou hast forsaken the LORD thy God, and that my fear is not in thee, saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
For of old time I have broken thy yoke, and burst thy bands; and thou saidst, I will not transgress; when upon every high hill and under every green tree thou wanderest, playing the harlot. 
Yet I had planted thee a noble vine, wholly a right seed: how then art thou turned into the degenerate plant of a strange vine unto me? 
For though thou wash thee with nitre, and take thee much soap, yet thine iniquity is marked before me, 
653,in pieces, and stamped the residue with his feet; 
And of the ten horns that were in his head, and of the other which came up, and before whom three fell; even of that horn that had eyes, and a mouth that spake very great things, whose look was more stout than his fellows. 
I beheld, and the same horn made war with the saints, and prevailed against them; 
Until the Ancient of days came, and judgment was given to the saints of the most High; and the time came that the saints possessed the kingdom. 
Thus he said, The fourth beast shall be the fourth kingdom upon earth, which shall be diverse from all kingdoms, and shall devour the whole earth, and
692,eart of fools is in the house of mirth. 
It is better to hear the rebuke of the wise, than for a man to hear the song of fools. 
For as the crackling of thorns under a pot, so is the laughter of the fool: this also is vanity. 
Surely oppression maketh a wise man mad; and a gift destroyeth the heart. 
Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof: and the patient in spirit is better than the proud in spirit. 
Be not hasty in thy spirit to be angry: for anger resteth in the bosom of fools. 
Say not thou, What is the cause that the former days were better than these? for thou dost not enquire wisely concerning this. 
Wisdom is good with an inheritance: and by it there is profi
538,ted up. 
Whithersoever the spirit was to go, they went, thither was their spirit to go; and the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
When those went, these went; and when those stood, these stood; and when those were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
And the likeness of the firmament upon the heads of the living creature was as the colour of the terrible crystal, stretched forth
531,will I sing praise unto thy name for ever, that I may daily perform my vows. 
Truly my soul waiteth upon God: from him cometh my salvation. 
He only is my rock and my salvation; he is my defence; I shall not be greatly moved. 
How long will ye imagine mischief against a man? ye shall be slain all of you: as a bowing wall shall ye be, and as a tottering fence. 
They only consult to cast him down from his excellency: they delight in lies: they bless with their mouth, but they curse inwardly. Selah. 
My soul, wait thou only upon
685, say, Come and see. 
And there went out another horse that was red: and power was given to him that sat thereon to take peace from the earth, and that they should kill one another: and there was given unto him a great sword. 
And when he had opened the third seal, I heard the third beast say, Come and see. And I beheld, and lo a black horse; and he that sat on him had a pair of balances in his hand. 
And I heard a voice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure of wheat for a penny, and three measures of barley for a penny; and see thou hurt not the oil and the wine. 
And when he had opened the fourth seal, I heard the voice of the fourth beast say, Come and see. 
And I l
680,lse I will come unto thee quickly, and will remove thy candlestick out of his place, except thou repent. 
But this thou hast, that thou hatest the deeds of the Nicolaitanes, which I also hate. 
He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the churches; To him that overcometh will I give to eat of the tree of life, which is in the midst of the paradise of God. 
And unto the angel of the church in Smyrna write; These things saith the first and the last, which was dead, and is alive; 
I know thy works, and tribulation, and poverty, (but thou art rich) and I know the blasphemy of them which say they are Jews, and are not, but are the synagogue of Satan. 
Fear 
523,o man, to be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all men. 
For we ourselves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient, deceived, serving divers lusts and pleasures, living in malice and envy, hateful, and hating one another. 
But after that the kindness and love of God our Saviour toward man appeared, 
Not by works of righteousness which we have done, but according to his mercy he saved us, by the washing of regeneration, and renewing of the Holy Ghost; 
Which he shed on us abundantly through Jesus Chris
530,hou knowest: remember me, and visit me, and revenge me of my persecutors; take me not away in thy longsuffering: know that for thy sake I have suffered rebuke. 
Thy words were found, and I did eat them; and thy word was unto me the joy and rejoicing of mine heart: for I am called by thy name, O LORD God of hosts. 
I sat not in the assembly of the mockers, nor rejoiced; I sat alone because of thy hand: for thou hast filled me with indignation. 
Why is my pain perpetual, and my wound incurable, which refuseth to be healed? wil
604,phat, saying, Because thou hast joined thyself with Ahaziah, the LORD hath broken thy works. And the ships were broken, that they were not able to go to Tarshish. 
Now Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers in the city of David. And Jehoram his son reigned in his stead. 
And he had brethren the sons of Jehoshaphat, Azariah, and Jehiel, and Zechariah, and Azariah, and Michael, and Shephatiah: all these were the sons of Jehoshaphat king of Israel. 
And their father gave them great gifts of silver, and of gold, and of precious things, with fenced cities in Judah: but the 
676,, and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem: and he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD his God. 
Against him came up Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and bound him in fetters, to carry him to Babylon. 
Nebuchadnezzar also carried of the vessels of the house of the LORD to Babylon, and put them in his temple at Babylon. 
Now the rest of the acts of Jehoiakim, and his abominations which he did, and that which was found in him, behold, they are written in the book of the kings of Israel and Judah: and Jehoiachin his son reigned in his stead. 
Jehoiachin was eight years old when he began to reign, and he reigned three months and ten days in Jerusalem: and he d
661,ntain, and three thousand and six hundred to oversee them. 
And Solomon sent to Huram the king of Tyre, saying, As thou didst deal with David my father, and didst send him cedars to build him an house to dwell therein, even so deal with me. 
Behold, I build an house to the name of the LORD my God, to dedicate it to him, and to burn before him sweet incense, and for the continual shewbread, and for the burnt offerings morning and evening, on the sabbaths, and on the new moons, and on the solemn feasts of the LORD our God. This is an ordinance for ever to Israel. 
And the house which I build is great: for great is our God above all gods. 
But who is able 
711,f the land among the people, there shall be as the shaking of an olive tree, and as the gleaning grapes when the vintage is done. 
They shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty of the LORD, they shall cry aloud from the sea. 
Wherefore glorify ye the LORD in the fires, even the name of the LORD God of Israel in the isles of the sea. 
From the uttermost part of the earth have we heard songs, even glory to the righteous. But I said, My leanness, my leanness, woe unto me! the treacherous dealers have dealt treacherously; yea, the treacherous dealers have dealt very treacherously. 
Fear, and the pit, and the snare, are upon thee, O inhabitant of the earth. 
And it shall come to pass, that
614, desireth life, and loveth many days, that he may see good? 
Keep thy tongue from evil, and thy lips from speaking guile. 
Depart from evil, and do good; seek peace, and pursue it. 
The eyes of the LORD are upon the righteous, and his ears are open unto their cry. 
The face of the LORD is against them that do evil, to cut off the remembrance of them from the earth. 
The righteous cry, and the LORD heareth, and delivereth them out of all their troubles. 
The LORD is nigh unto them that are of a broken heart; and saveth such as be of a contrite spirit. 
Many are the afflictions of the righteous: but the LORD 
706,the number of the years of the fruits doth he sell unto thee. 
Ye shall not therefore oppress one another; but thou shalt fear thy God:for I am the LORD your God. 
Wherefore ye shall do my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do them; and ye shall dwell in the land in safety. 
And the land shall yield her fruit, and ye shall eat your fill, and dwell therein in safety. 
And if ye shall say, What shall we eat the seventh year? behold, we shall not sow, nor gather in our increase: 
Then I will command my blessing upon you in the sixth year, and it shall bring forth fruit for three years. 
And ye shall sow the eighth year, and eat yet of old fruit until the ninth year; until her fruits come in ye shal
659,congregation of the children of Israel, and it shall be forgiven them; for it is ignorance: and they shall bring their offering, a sacrifice made by fire unto the LORD, and their sin offering before the LORD, for their ignorance: 
And it shall be forgiven all the congregation of the children of Israel, and the stranger that sojourneth among them; seeing all the people were in ignorance. 
And if any soul sin through ignorance, then he shall bring a she goat of the first year for a sin offering. 
And the priest shall make an atonement for the soul that sinneth ignorantly, when he sinneth by ignorance before the LORD, to make an atonement for him; and it
557,u, there is joy in the presence of the angels of God over one sinner that repenteth. 
And he said, A certain man had two sons: 
And the younger of them said to his father, Father, give me the portion of goods that falleth to me. And he divided unto them his living. 
And not many days after the younger son gathered all together, and took his journey into a far country, and there wasted his substance with riotous living. 
And when he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that land; and he began to be in want. 
And he went and joined himself to a
653,d, within the temple, and let us shut the doors of the temple: for they will come to slay thee; yea, in the night will they come to slay thee. 
And I said, Should such a man as I flee? and who is there, that, being as I am, would go into the temple to save his life? I will not go in. 
And, lo, I perceived that God had not sent him; but that he pronounced this prophecy against me: for Tobiah and Sanballat had hired him. 
Therefore was he hired, that I should be afraid, and do so, and sin, and that they might have matter for an evil report, that they might reproach me. 
My God, think thou upon Tobiah and Sanballat according to these their works, a
630, corn is bruised; because he will not ever be threshing it, nor break it with the wheel of his cart, nor bruise it with his horsemen. 
This also cometh forth from the LORD of hosts, which is wonderful in counsel, and excellent in working. 
Woe to Ariel, to Ariel, the city where David dwelt! add ye year to year; let them kill sacrifices. 
Yet I will distress Ariel, and there shall be heaviness and sorrow: and it shall be unto me as Ariel. 
And I will camp against thee round about, and will lay siege against thee with a mount, and I will raise forts against thee. 
And thou shalt be brought down, and shalt speak out of the gr
629,he midst of the fire. 
And the princes, governors, and captains, and the king's counsellors, being gathered together, saw these men, upon whose bodies the fire had no power, nor was an hair of their head singed, neither were their coats changed, nor the smell of fire had passed on them. 
Then Nebuchadnezzar spake, and said, Blessed be the God of Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, who hath sent his angel, and delivered his servants that trusted in him, and have changed the king's word, and yielded their bodies, that they might not serve nor worship any god, except their own God. 
Therefore I make a decree, That every people,
491,nt: before all thy people I will do marvels, such as have not been done in all the earth, nor in any nation: and all the people among which thou art shall see the work of the LORD: for it is a terrible thing that I will do with thee. 
Observe thou that which I command thee this day: behold, I drive out before thee the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and the Perizzite, and the Hivite, and the Jebusite. 
Take heed to thyself, lest thou make a covenant with the inhabitants of 
680, the LORD. 
For thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even deal with thee as thou hast done, which hast despised the oath in breaking the covenant. 
Nevertheless I will remember my covenant with thee in the days of thy youth, and I will establish unto thee an everlasting covenant. 
Then thou shalt remember thy ways, and be ashamed, when thou shalt receive thy sisters, thine elder and thy younger: and I will give them unto thee for daughters, but not by thy covenant. 
And I will establish my covenant with thee; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD: 
That thou mayest remember, and be confounded, and never open thy mouth any more because of thy shame, when I am pacified toward t
587,he and the elders of Israel, and put dust upon their heads. 
And Joshua said, Alas, O LORD God, wherefore hast thou at all brought this people over Jordan, to deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to destroy us? would to God we had been content, and dwelt on the other side Jordan! 
O LORD, what shall I say, when Israel turneth their backs before their enemies! 
For the Canaanites and all the inhabitants of the land shall hear of it, and shall environ us round, and cut off our name from the earth: and what wilt thou do unto thy great name? 
And the LORD said unto Joshua, Get th
506,tedfastly into heaven, and saw the glory of God, and Jesus standing on the right hand of God, 
And said, Behold, I see the heavens opened, and the Son of man standing on the right hand of God. 
Then they cried out with a loud voice, and stopped their ears, and ran upon him with one accord, 
And cast him out of the city, and stoned him: and the witnesses laid down their clothes at a young man's feet, whose name was Saul. 
And they stoned Stephen, calling upon God, and saying, Lord Jesus, receive my spi
526,shall give strength unto his king, and exalt the horn of his anointed. 
And Elkanah went to Ramah to his house. And the child did minister unto the LORD before Eli the priest. 
Now the sons of Eli were sons of Belial; they knew not the LORD. 
And the priest's custom with the people was, that, when any man offered sacrifice, the priest's servant came, while the flesh was in seething, with a fleshhook of three teeth in his hand; 
And he struck it into the pan, or kettle, or caldron, or pot; all that the fleshhook brought u
607,on precept, precept upon precept; line upon line, line upon line; here a little, and there a little; that they might go, and fall backward, and be broken, and snared, and taken. 
Wherefore hear the word of the LORD, ye scornful men, that rule this people which is in Jerusalem. 
Because ye have said, We have made a covenant with death, and with hell are we at agreement; when the overflowing scourge shall pass through, it shall not come unto us: for we have made lies our refuge, and under falsehood have we hid ourselves: 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, I lay in Zion for a foundation a stone
499, horses for all the kings of the Hittites, and for the kings of Syria, by their means. 
And Solomon determined to build an house for the name of the LORD, and an house for his kingdom. 
And Solomon told out threescore and ten thousand men to bear burdens, and fourscore thousand to hew in the mountain, and three thousand and six hundred to oversee them. 
And Solomon sent to Huram the king of Tyre, saying, As thou didst deal with David my father, and didst send him cedars to build him an house to
498, which he put on when he went into the holy place, and shall leave them there: 
And he shall wash his flesh with water in the holy place, and put on his garments, and come forth, and offer his burnt offering, and the burnt offering of the people, and make an atonement for himself, and for the people. 
And the fat of the sin offering shall he burn upon the altar. 
And he that let go the goat for the scapegoat shall wash his clothes, and bathe his flesh in water, and afterward come into the camp
552, city is given into the hand of the Chaldeans, that fight against it, because of the sword, and of the famine, and of the pestilence: and what thou hast spoken is come to pass; and, behold, thou seest it. 
And thou hast said unto me, O Lord GOD, Buy thee the field for money, and take witnesses; for the city is given into the hand of the Chaldeans. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto Jeremiah, saying, 
Behold, I am the LORD, the God of all flesh: is there any thing too hard for me? 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will give this city int
705,orning: thou hast the dew of thy youth. 
The LORD hath sworn, and will not repent, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchizedek. 
The Lord at thy right hand shall strike through kings in the day of his wrath. 
He shall judge among the heathen, he shall fill the places with the dead bodies; he shall wound the heads over many countries. 
He shall drink of the brook in the way: therefore shall he lift up the head. 
Praise ye the LORD. I will praise the LORD with my whole heart, in the assembly of the upright, and in the congregation. 
The works of the LORD are great, sought out of all them that have pleasure therein. 
His work is honourable and glorious: and his righteousness endureth f
483,shment: but the righteous into life eternal. 
And it came to pass, when Jesus had finished all these sayings, he said unto his disciples, 
Ye know that after two days is the feast of the passover, and the Son of man is betrayed to be crucified. 
Then assembled together the chief priests, and the scribes, and the elders of the people, unto the palace of the high priest, who was called Caiaphas, 
And consulted that they might take Jesus by subtilty, and kill him. 
But they said, N
483,pon God, and he answereth him: the just upright man is laughed to scorn. 
He that is ready to slip with his feet is as a lamp despised in the thought of him that is at ease. 
The tabernacles of robbers prosper, and they that provoke God are secure; into whose hand God bringeth abundantly. 
But ask now the beasts, and they shall teach thee; and the fowls of the air, and they shall tell thee: 
Or speak to the earth, and it shall teach thee: and the fishes of the sea shall declare 
499,ut your border unto the entrance of Hamath; and the goings forth of the border shall be to Zedad: 
And the border shall go on to Ziphron, and the goings out of it shall be at Hazarenan: this shall be your north border. 
And ye shall point out your east border from Hazarenan to Shepham: 
And the coast shall go down from Shepham to Riblah, on the east side of Ain; and the border shall descend, and shall reach unto the side of the sea of Chinnereth eastward: 
And the border shall go down to Jordan
481,d he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way of his father, and in his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin. 
And Baasha the son of Ahijah, of the house of Issachar, conspired against him; and Baasha smote him at Gibbethon, which belonged to the Philistines; for Nadab and all Israel laid siege to Gibbethon. 
Even in the third year of Asa king of Judah did Baasha slay him, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he reigned, that he smote all the hou
631,oms of the earth, to be a curse, and an astonishment, and an hissing, and a reproach, among all the nations whither I have driven them: 
Because they have not hearkened to my words, saith the LORD, which I sent unto them by my servants the prophets, rising up early and sending them; but ye would not hear, saith the LORD. 
Hear ye therefore the word of the LORD, all ye of the captivity, whom I have sent from Jerusalem to Babylon: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, of Ahab the son of Kolaiah, and of Zedekiah the son of Maaseiah, which prophesy a lie unto you in my name; Behold, I will deliver them into the hand
595,n is as a man travelling into a far country, who called his own servants, and delivered unto them his goods. 
And unto one he gave five talents, to another two, and to another one; to every man according to his several ability; and straightway took his journey. 
Then he that had received the five talents went and traded with the same, and made them other five talents. 
And likewise he that had received two, he also gained other two. 
But he that had received one went and digged in the earth, and hid his lord's money. 
After a long time the lord of those servants cometh, and reckoneth with
488,th me. 
These are now the chief of their fathers, and this is the genealogy of them that went up with me from Babylon, in the reign of Artaxerxes the king. 
Of the sons of Phinehas; Gershom: of the sons of Ithamar; Daniel: of the sons of David; Hattush. 
Of the sons of Shechaniah, of the sons of Pharosh; Zechariah: and with him were reckoned by genealogy of the males an hundred and fifty. 
Of the sons of Pahathmoab; Elihoenai the son of Zerahiah, and with him two hundred males. 
Of t
485,er the grapes in it of thy vine undressed. 
For it is the jubile; it shall be holy unto you: ye shall eat the increase thereof out of the field. 
In the year of this jubile ye shall return every man unto his possession. 
And if thou sell ought unto thy neighbour, or buyest ought of thy neighbour's hand, ye shall not oppress one another: 
According to the number of years after the jubile thou shalt buy of thy neighbour, and according unto the number of years of the fruits he shall 
669,s they have increased. 
And I will sow them among the people: and they shall remember me in far countries; and they shall live with their children, and turn again. 
I will bring them again also out of the land of Egypt, and gather them out of Assyria; and I will bring them into the land of Gilead and Lebanon; and place shall not be found for them. 
And he shall pass through the sea with affliction, and shall smite the waves in the sea, and all the deeps of the river shall dry up: and the pride of Assyria shall be brought down, and the sceptre of Egypt shall depart away. 
And I will strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up and down in his name, saith 
496,ve faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountain, Remove hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be impossible unto you. 
Howbeit this kind goeth not out but by prayer and fasting. 
And while they abode in Galilee, Jesus said unto them, The Son of man shall be betrayed into the hands of men: 
And they shall kill him, and the third day he shall be raised again. And they were exceeding sorry. 
And when they were come to Capernaum, they that received tr
519,eir folly shall be manifest unto all men, as their's also was. 
But thou hast fully known my doctrine, manner of life, purpose, faith, longsuffering, charity, patience, 
Persecutions, afflictions, which came unto me at Antioch, at Iconium, at Lystra; what persecutions I endured: but out of them all the Lord delivered me. 
Yea, and all that will live godly in Christ Jesus shall suffer persecution. 
But evil men and seducers shall wax worse and worse, deceiving, and being deceived. 
But continue thou in the things w
701,hand: and I took the grapes, and pressed them into Pharaoh's cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand. 
And Joseph said unto him, This is the interpretation of it: The three branches are three days: 
Yet within three days shall Pharaoh lift up thine head, and restore thee unto thy place: and thou shalt deliver Pharaoh's cup into his hand, after the former manner when thou wast his butler. 
But think on me when it shall be well with thee, and shew kindness, I pray thee, unto me, and make mention of me unto Pharaoh, and bring me out of this house: 
For indeed I was stolen away out of the land of the Hebrews: and here also have I done nothing that they should put me into the dungeon. 
When th
564,uked of him: 
For whom the Lord loveth he chasteneth, and scourgeth every son whom he receiveth. 
If ye endure chastening, God dealeth with you as with sons; for what son is he whom the father chasteneth not? 
But if ye be without chastisement, whereof all are partakers, then are ye bastards, and not sons. 
Furthermore we have had fathers of our flesh which corrected us, and we gave them reverence: shall we not much rather be in subjection unto the Father of spirits, and live? 
For they verily for a few days chastened us after their own pleasure; but he for 
660,houses of the kings of Judah, shall be defiled as the place of Tophet, because of all the houses upon whose roofs they have burned incense unto all the host of heaven, and have poured out drink offerings unto other gods. 
Then came Jeremiah from Tophet, whither the LORD had sent him to prophesy; and he stood in the court of the LORD's house; and said to all the people, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon this city and upon all her towns all the evil that I have pronounced against it, because they have hardened their necks, that they might not hear my words. 
Now Pashur the son of Immer the priest, who was also ch
616,him with garments. And the angel of the LORD stood by. 
And the angel of the LORD protested unto Joshua, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; If thou wilt walk in my ways, and if thou wilt keep my charge, then thou shalt also judge my house, and shalt also keep my courts, and I will give thee places to walk among these that stand by. 
Hear now, O Joshua the high priest, thou, and thy fellows that sit before thee: for they are men wondered at: for, behold, I will bring forth my servant the BRANCH. 
For behold the stone that I have laid before Joshua; upon one stone shall be seven eyes: behold, I will engrave
679,ch as I love, and bring it to me, that I may eat; that my soul may bless thee before I die. 
And Rebekah heard when Isaac spake to Esau his son. And Esau went to the field to hunt for venison, and to bring it. 
And Rebekah spake unto Jacob her son, saying, Behold, I heard thy father speak unto Esau thy brother, saying, 
Bring me venison, and make me savoury meat, that I may eat, and bless thee before the LORD before my death. 
Now therefore, my son, obey my voice according to that which I command thee. 
Go now to the flock, and fetch me from thence two good kids of the goats; and I will make them savoury meat for thy father, such as he loveth: 
And thou shalt bring it to
552,t all the work of the sanctuary, came every man from his work which they made; 
And they spake unto Moses, saying, The people bring much more than enough for the service of the work, which the LORD commanded to make. 
And Moses gave commandment, and they caused it to be proclaimed throughout the camp, saying, Let neither man nor woman make any more work for the offering of the sanctuary. So the people were restrained from bringing. 
For the stuff they had was sufficient for all the work to make it, and too much. 
And every wise hearted man among 
685,to the impotent man, by what means he is made whole; 
Be it known unto you all, and to all the people of Israel, that by the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth, whom ye crucified, whom God raised from the dead, even by him doth this man stand here before you whole. 
This is the stone which was set at nought of you builders, which is become the head of the corner. 
Neither is there salvation in any other: for there is none other name under heaven given among men, whereby we must be saved. 
Now when they saw the boldness of Peter and John, and perceived that they were unlearned and ignorant men, they marvelled; and they took knowledge of them, that they had been with Jesus. 
And b
602, save the souls alive that should not live, by your lying to my people that hear your lies? 
Wherefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against your pillows, wherewith ye there hunt the souls to make them fly, and I will tear them from your arms, and will let the souls go, even the souls that ye hunt to make them fly. 
Your kerchiefs also will I tear, and deliver my people out of your hand, and they shall be no more in your hand to be hunted; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
Because with lies ye have made the heart of the righteous sad, whom I have not made sad; and strengthened the h
613,ribe of Zabulon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Joseph were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Benjamin were sealed twelve thousand. 
After this I beheld, and, lo, a great multitude, which no man could number, of all nations, and kindreds, and people, and tongues, stood before the throne, and before the Lamb, clothed with white robes, and palms in their hands; 
And cried with a loud voice, saying, Salvation to our God which sitteth upon the throne, and unto the Lamb. 
And all the angels stood round about the throne, and about the elders and the four beasts, and fell before the throne on t
580,s we do toward you: 
To the end he may stablish your hearts unblameable in holiness before God, even our Father, at the coming of our Lord Jesus Christ with all his saints. 
Furthermore then we beseech you, brethren, and exhort you by the Lord Jesus, that as ye have received of us how ye ought to walk and to please God, so ye would abound more and more. 
For ye know what commandments we gave you by the Lord Jesus. 
For this is the will of God, even your sanctification, that ye should abstain from fornication: 
That every one of you should know how to possess his vessel in s
546,he had built in Samaria. 
And Ahab made a grove; and Ahab did more to provoke the LORD God of Israel to anger than all the kings of Israel that were before him. 
In his days did Hiel the Bethelite build Jericho: he laid the foundation thereof in Abiram his firstborn, and set up the gates thereof in his youngest son Segub, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Joshua the son of Nun. 
And Elijah the Tishbite, who was of the inhabitants of Gilead, said unto Ahab, As the LORD God of Israel liveth, before whom I stand, there shall
674,atural branches, take heed lest he also spare not thee. 
Behold therefore the goodness and severity of God: on them which fell, severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his goodness: otherwise thou also shalt be cut off. 
And they also, if they abide not still in unbelief, shall be graffed in: for God is able to graff them in again. 
For if thou wert cut out of the olive tree which is wild by nature, and wert graffed contrary to nature into a good olive tree: how much more shall these, which be the natural branches, be graffed into their own olive tree? 
For I would not, brethren, that ye should be ignorant of this mystery, lest ye should be wise in 
561,onsumed. 
She hath wearied herself with lies, and her great scum went not forth out of her: her scum shall be in the fire. 
In thy filthiness is lewdness: because I have purged thee, and thou wast not purged, thou shalt not be purged from thy filthiness any more, till I have caused my fury to rest upon thee. 
I the LORD have spoken it: it shall come to pass, and I will do it; I will not go back, neither will I spare, neither will I repent; according to thy ways, and according to thy doings, shall they judge thee, saith the Lord GOD. 
Also the word of the 
569,s sake. 
And it came to pass after the plague, that the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Eleazar the son of Aaron the priest, saying, 
Take the sum of all the congregation of the children of Israel, from twenty years old and upward, throughout their fathers' house, all that are able to go to war in Israel. 
And Moses and Eleazar the priest spake with them in the plains of Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 
Take the sum of the people, from twenty years old and upward; as the LORD commanded Moses and the children of Israel, which went forth out of the land of Egyp
489,ried them away, even the Reubenites, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, and brought them unto Halah, and Habor, and Hara, and to the river Gozan, unto this day. 
The sons of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari. 
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel. 
And the children of Amram; Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam. The sons also of Aaron; Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar. 
Eleazar begat Phinehas, Phinehas begat Abishua, 
And Abishua begat Bukki, and Bu
594,time for thee, LORD, to work: for they have made void thy law. 
Therefore I love thy commandments above gold; yea, above fine gold. 
Therefore I esteem all thy precepts concerning all things to be right; and I hate every false way. 
Thy testimonies are wonderful: therefore doth my soul keep them. 
The entrance of thy words giveth light; it giveth understanding unto the simple. 
I opened my mouth, and panted: for I longed for thy commandments. 
Look thou upon me, and be merciful unto me, as thou usest to do unto those that love thy name. 
Order my steps in thy word: and let not any iniqui
539,aves after his resurrection, and went into the holy city, and appeared unto many. 
Now when the centurion, and they that were with him, watching Jesus, saw the earthquake, and those things that were done, they feared greatly, saying, Truly this was the Son of God. 
And many women were there beholding afar off, which followed Jesus from Galilee, ministering unto him: 
Among which was Mary Magdalene, and Mary the mother of James and Joses, and the mother of Zebedees children. 
When the even was come, there came a rich man of Arimathaea
581,olly, lest he be wise in his own conceit. 
He that sendeth a message by the hand of a fool cutteth off the feet, and drinketh damage. 
The legs of the lame are not equal: so is a parable in the mouth of fools. 
As he that bindeth a stone in a sling, so is he that giveth honour to a fool. 
As a thorn goeth up into the hand of a drunkard, so is a parable in the mouths of fools. 
The great God that formed all things both rewardeth the fool, and rewardeth transgressors. 
As a dog returneth to his vomit, so a fool returneth to his folly. 
Seest thou a man wise in his own conceit?
578,f Judah, from the twentieth year even unto the two and thirtieth year of Artaxerxes the king, that is, twelve years, I and my brethren have not eaten the bread of the governor. 
But the former governors that had been before me were chargeable unto the people, and had taken of them bread and wine, beside forty shekels of silver; yea, even their servants bare rule over the people: but so did not I, because of the fear of God. 
Yea, also I continued in the work of this wall, neither bought we any land: and all my servants were gathered thither unto the work. 
Moreover there 
628,heritance of the congregation of Jacob. 
And he was king in Jeshurun, when the heads of the people and the tribes of Israel were gathered together. 
Let Reuben live, and not die; and let not his men be few. 
And this is the blessing of Judah: and he said, Hear, LORD, the voice of Judah, and bring him unto his people: let his hands be sufficient for him; and be thou an help to him from his enemies. 
And of Levi he said, Let thy Thummim and thy Urim be with thy holy one, whom thou didst prove at Massah, and with whom thou didst strive at the waters of Meribah; 
Who said unto his father and to his mother, I have not seen hi
601,to him. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. Sing unto the LORD a new song, and his praise in the congregation of saints. 
Let Israel rejoice in him that made him: let the children of Zion be joyful in their King. 
Let them praise his name in the dance: let them sing praises unto him with the timbrel and harp. 
For the LORD taketh pleasure in his people: he will beautify the meek with salvation. 
Let the saints be joyful in glory: let them sing aloud upon their beds. 
Let the high praises of God be in their mouth, and a two-edged sword in their hand; 
To execute vengeance upon the heathen, 
482,d unto the men of Succoth, Give, I pray you, loaves of bread unto the people that follow me; for they be faint, and I am pursuing after Zebah and Zalmunna, kings of Midian. 
And the princes of Succoth said, Are the hands of Zebah and Zalmunna now in thine hand, that we should give bread unto thine army? 
And Gideon said, Therefore when the LORD hath delivered Zebah and Zalmunna into mine hand, then I will tear your flesh with the thorns of the wilderness and with briers. 
And h
663, Israel chose our fathers, and exalted the people when they dwelt as strangers in the land of Egypt, and with an high arm brought he them out of it. 
And about the time of forty years suffered he their manners in the wilderness. 
And when he had destroyed seven nations in the land of Chanaan, he divided their land to them by lot. 
And after that he gave unto them judges about the space of four hundred and fifty years, until Samuel the prophet. 
And afterward they desired a king: and God gave unto them Saul the son of Cis, a man of the tribe of Benjamin, by the space of forty years. 
And when he had removed him, he raised up unto them David to be their kin
515,ehind the very chiefest apostles. 
But though I be rude in speech, yet not in knowledge; but we have been throughly made manifest among you in all things. 
Have I committed an offence in abasing myself that ye might be exalted, because I have preached to you the gospel of God freely? 
I robbed other churches, taking wages of them, to do you service. 
And when I was present with you, and wanted, I was chargeable to no man: for that which was lacking to me the brethren which came from Macedonia supplied: and in 
621,er to hear the rebuke of the wise, than for a man to hear the song of fools. 
For as the crackling of thorns under a pot, so is the laughter of the fool: this also is vanity. 
Surely oppression maketh a wise man mad; and a gift destroyeth the heart. 
Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof: and the patient in spirit is better than the proud in spirit. 
Be not hasty in thy spirit to be angry: for anger resteth in the bosom of fools. 
Say not thou, What is the cause that the former days were better than these? for thou dost not enquire wisely concerning this. 
Wisdom is good with an inheritance: and 
675,him up another adversary, Rezon the son of Eliadah, which fled from his lord Hadadezer king of Zobah: 
And he gathered men unto him, and became captain over a band, when David slew them of Zobah: and they went to Damascus, and dwelt therein, and reigned in Damascus. 
And he was an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon, beside the mischief that Hadad did: and he abhorred Israel, and reigned over Syria. 
And Jeroboam the son of Nebat, an Ephrathite of Zereda, Solomon's servant, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow woman, even he lifted up his hand against the king. 
And this was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the king: Solomon built Millo, and re
582,d peace, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ. 
We give thanks to God and the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying always for you, 
Since we heard of your faith in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye have to all the saints, 
For the hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard before in the word of the truth of the gospel; 
Which is come unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth fruit, as it doth also in you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the grace of God in truth: 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who 
632, of God spake unto me in a dream, saying, Jacob: And I said, Here am I. 
And he said, Lift up now thine eyes, and see, all the rams which leap upon the cattle are ringstraked, speckled, and grisled: for I have seen all that Laban doeth unto thee. 
I am the God of Bethel, where thou anointedst the pillar, and where thou vowedst a vow unto me: now arise, get thee out from this land, and return unto the land of thy kindred. 
And Rachel and Leah answered and said unto him, Is there yet any portion or inheritance for us in our father's house? 
Are we not counted of him strangers? for he hath sold us, and hath quite devoured also 
643,of the seven; and abode with him. 
And the same man had four daughters, virgins, which did prophesy. 
And as we tarried there many days, there came down from Judaea a certain prophet, named Agabus. 
And when he was come unto us, he took Paul's girdle, and bound his own hands and feet, and said, Thus saith the Holy Ghost, So shall the Jews at Jerusalem bind the man that owneth this girdle, and shall deliver him into the hands of the Gentiles. 
And when we heard these things, both we, and they of that place, besought him not to go up to Jerusalem. 
Then Paul answered, What mean ye to weep and to break mine heart? for I am ready not to be
633,n your synagogues, and persecute them from city to city: 
That upon you may come all the righteous blood shed upon the earth, from the blood of righteous Abel unto the blood of Zacharias son of Barachias, whom ye slew between the temple and the altar. 
Verily I say unto you, All these things shall come upon this generation. 
O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, thou that killest the prophets, and stonest them which are sent unto thee, how often would I have gathered thy children together, even as a hen gathereth her chickens under her wings, and ye would not! 
Behold, your house is left unto you desolate. 
For I say unto you, Ye shall not
480, 
For ye are not come unto the mount that might be touched, and that burned with fire, nor unto blackness, and darkness, and tempest, 
And the sound of a trumpet, and the voice of words; which voice they that heard intreated that the word should not be spoken to them any more: 
(For they could not endure that which was commanded, And if so much as a beast touch the mountain, it shall be stoned, or thrust through with a dart: 
And so terrible was the sight, that Moses said, I 
513,rsmith did me much evil: the Lord reward him according to his works: 
Of whom be thou ware also; for he hath greatly withstood our words. 
At my first answer no man stood with me, but all men forsook me: I pray God that it may not be laid to their charge. 
Notwithstanding the Lord stood with me, and strengthened me; that by me the preaching might be fully known, and that all the Gentiles might hear: and I was delivered out of the mouth of the lion. 
And the Lord shall deliver me from every evil work, and wil
576,ghbour, and not suffer sin upon him. 
Thou shalt not avenge, nor bear any grudge against the children of thy people, but thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself: I am the LORD. 
Ye shall keep my statutes. Thou shalt not let thy cattle gender with a diverse kind: thou shalt not sow thy field with mingled seed: neither shall a garment mingled of linen and woollen come upon thee. 
And whosoever lieth carnally with a woman, that is a bondmaid, betrothed to an husband, and not at all redeemed, nor freedom given her; she shall be scourged; they shall not be put to death, bec
651,ork which thou gavest me to do. 
And now, O Father, glorify thou me with thine own self with the glory which I had with thee before the world was. 
I have manifested thy name unto the men which thou gavest me out of the world: thine they were, and thou gavest them me; and they have kept thy word. 
Now they have known that all things whatsoever thou hast given me are of thee. 
For I have given unto them the words which thou gavest me; and they have received them, and have known surely that I came out from thee, and they have believed that thou didst send me. 
I pray for them: I pray not for the world, but for them which thou hast given me; for 
597,bered of them, were forty and five thousand and six hundred and fifty. 
All that were numbered in the camp of Reuben were an hundred thousand and fifty and one thousand and four hundred and fifty, throughout their armies. And they shall set forth in the second rank. 
Then the tabernacle of the congregation shall set forward with the camp of the Levites in the midst of the camp: as they encamp, so shall they set forward, every man in his place by their standards. 
On the west side shall be the standard of the camp of Ephraim according to their armies: and the captain of the sons of Ephraim s
603, they shall be weary. Thus far are the words of Jeremiah. 
Zedekiah was one and twenty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned eleven years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Hamutal the daughter of Jeremiah of Libnah. 
And he did that which was evil in the eyes of the LORD, according to all that Jehoiakim had done. 
For through the anger of the LORD it came to pass in Jerusalem and Judah, till he had cast them out from his presence, that Zedekiah rebelled against the king of Babylon. 
And it came to pass in the ninth year of his reign, in the tenth month, in the tenth day of the mo
522,when I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall stretch it out upon the land of Egypt. 
And I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse them among the countries; and they shall know that I am the LORD. 
And it came to pass in the eleventh year, in the third month, in the first day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, and to his multitude; Whom art thou like in thy greatness? 
Behold, the Assyrian was 
548,swered and said to Laban, Because I was afraid: for I said, Peradventure thou wouldest take by force thy daughters from me. 
With whomsoever thou findest thy gods, let him not live: before our brethren discern thou what is thine with me, and take it to thee. For Jacob knew not that Rachel had stolen them. 
And Laban went into Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into the two maidservants' tents; but he found them not. Then went he out of Leah's tent, and entered into Rachel's tent. 
Now Rachel had taken the images, and put them in the came
715,out us, as the ox licketh up the grass of the field. And Balak the son of Zippor was king of the Moabites at that time. 
He sent messengers therefore unto Balaam the son of Beor to Pethor, which is by the river of the land of the children of his people, to call him, saying, Behold, there is a people come out from Egypt: behold, they cover the face of the earth, and they abide over against me: 
Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this people; for they are too mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail, that we may smite them, and that I may drive them out of the land: for I wot that he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom thou cursest is cursed. 
And the elders of Moab and the elders of Midian 
653, in vain: for your land shall not yield her increase, neither shall the trees of the land yield their fruits. 
And if ye walk contrary unto me, and will not hearken unto me; I will bring seven times more plagues upon you according to your sins. 
I will also send wild beasts among you, which shall rob you of your children, and destroy your cattle, and make you few in number; and your high ways shall be desolate. 
And if ye will not be reformed by me by these things, but will walk contrary unto me; 
Then will I also walk contrary unto you, and will punish you yet seven times for your sins. 
And I will bring a sword upon you, that shall avenge the 
576, wonder, and perish: for I work a work in your days, a work which ye shall in no wise believe, though a man declare it unto you. 
And when the Jews were gone out of the synagogue, the Gentiles besought that these words might be preached to them the next sabbath. 
Now when the congregation was broken up, many of the Jews and religious proselytes followed Paul and Barnabas: who, speaking to them, persuaded them to continue in the grace of God. 
And the next sabbath day came almost the whole city together to hear the word of God. 
But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they
568,op of the mountains. And Zebul said unto him, Thou seest the shadow of the mountains as if they were men. 
And Gaal spake again, and said, See there come people down by the middle of the land, and another company come along by the plain of Meonenim. 
Then said Zebul unto him, Where is now thy mouth, wherewith thou saidst, Who is Abimelech, that we should serve him? is not this the people that thou hast despised? go out, I pray now, and fight with them. 
And Gaal went out before the men of Shechem, and fought with Abimelech. 
And Abimelech chased him, and he fled
628,rneth away from his wickedness that he hath committed, and doeth that which is lawful and right, he shall save his soul alive. 
Because he considereth, and turneth away from all his transgressions that he hath committed, he shall surely live, he shall not die. 
Yet saith the house of Israel, The way of the LORD is not equal. O house of Israel, are not my ways equal? are not your ways unequal? 
Therefore I will judge you, O house of Israel, every one according to his ways, saith the Lord GOD. Repent, and turn yourselves from all your transgressions; so iniquity shall not be your ruin. 
Cast away from you all your transgre
493, an atonement for the soul that sinneth ignorantly, when he sinneth by ignorance before the LORD, to make an atonement for him; and it shall be forgiven him. 
Ye shall have one law for him that sinneth through ignorance, both for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the stranger that sojourneth among them. 
But the soul that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born in the land, or a stranger, the same reproacheth the LORD; and that soul shall be cut off from among 
705,is sons shall be all the service of the sons of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their service: and ye shall appoint unto them in charge all their burdens. 
This is the service of the families of the sons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest. 
As for the sons of Merari, thou shalt number them after their families, by the house of their fathers; 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old shalt thou number them, every one that entereth into the service, to do the work of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And this is the charge of their burden, according to all their serv
594,hich was the son of Juda, 
Which was the son of Joanna, which was the son of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was the son of Salathiel, which was the son of Neri, 
Which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam, which was the son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 
Which was the son of Jose, which was the son of Eliezer, which was the son of Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 
Which was the son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the son of Joseph, which was the son of Jonan, which was the son of E
673, he was called forth, Tertullus began to accuse him, saying, Seeing that by thee we enjoy great quietness, and that very worthy deeds are done unto this nation by thy providence, 
We accept it always, and in all places, most noble Felix, with all thankfulness. 
Notwithstanding, that I be not further tedious unto thee, I pray thee that thou wouldest hear us of thy clemency a few words. 
For we have found this man a pestilent fellow, and a mover of sedition among all the Jews throughout the world, and a ringleader of the sect of the Nazarenes: 
Who also hath gone about to profane the temple: whom we took, and would have judged according to our law. 
But the chief cap
524, if one prevail against him, two shall withstand him; and a threefold cord is not quickly broken. 
Better is a poor and a wise child than an old and foolish king, who will no more be admonished. 
For out of prison he cometh to reign; whereas also he that is born in his kingdom becometh poor. 
I considered all the living which walk under the sun, with the second child that shall stand up in his stead. 
There is no end of all the people, even of all that have been before them: they also that come after shall not rejoice 
634,prophets of the deceit of their own heart; 
Which think to cause my people to forget my name by their dreams which they tell every man to his neighbour, as their fathers have forgotten my name for Baal. 
The prophet that hath a dream, let him tell a dream; and he that hath my word, let him speak my word faithfully. What is the chaff to the wheat? saith the LORD. 
Is not my word like as a fire? saith the LORD; and like a hammer that breaketh the rock in pieces? 
Therefore, behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that steal my words every one from his neighbour. 
Behold, I am against the prophets, saith the LORD, that
595,David. 
Wherefore he saith also in another psalm, Thou shalt not suffer thine Holy One to see corruption. 
For David, after he had served his own generation by the will of God, fell on sleep, and was laid unto his fathers, and saw corruption: 
But he, whom God raised again, saw no corruption. 
Be it known unto you therefore, men and brethren, that through this man is preached unto you the forgiveness of sins: 
And by him all that believe are justified from all things, from which ye could not be justified by the law of Moses. 
Beware therefore, lest that come upon you, which is spoken of i
517,ster, I have brought unto thee my son, which hath a dumb spirit; 
And wheresoever he taketh him, he teareth him: and he foameth, and gnasheth with his teeth, and pineth away: and I spake to thy disciples that they should cast him out; and they could not. 
He answereth him, and saith, O faithless generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me. 
And they brought him unto him: and when he saw him, straightway the spirit tare him; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foam
621,f all the cities of Judah they came to seek the LORD. 
And Jehoshaphat stood in the congregation of Judah and Jerusalem, in the house of the LORD, before the new court, 
And said, O LORD God of our fathers, art not thou God in heaven? and rulest not thou over all the kingdoms of the heathen? and in thine hand is there not power and might, so that none is able to withstand thee? 
Art not thou our God, who didst drive out the inhabitants of this land before thy people Israel, and gavest it to the seed of Abraham thy friend for ever? 
And they dwelt therein, and have built thee a sanctuary therein for thy name, sayin
589,m: and Jesus saith unto them, Believe ye that I am able to do this? They said unto him, Yea, Lord. 
Then touched he their eyes, saying, According to your faith be it unto you. 
And their eyes were opened; and Jesus straitly charged them, saying, See that no man know it. 
But they, when they were departed, spread abroad his fame in all that country. 
As they went out, behold, they brought to him a dumb man possessed with a devil. 
And when the devil was cast out, the dumb spake: and the multitudes marvelled, saying, It was never so seen in Israel. 
But the Pharisees said, He casteth 
656,r them that love him and observe his commandments: 
Let thine ear now be attentive, and thine eyes open, that thou mayest hear the prayer of thy servant, which I pray before thee now, day and night, for the children of Israel thy servants, and confess the sins of the children of Israel, which we have sinned against thee: both I and my father's house have sinned. 
We have dealt very corruptly against thee, and have not kept the commandments, nor the statutes, nor the judgments, which thou commandedst thy servant Moses. 
Remember, I beseech thee, the word that thou commandedst thy servant Moses, saying, If ye transgress, I will scatter you abroad amo
536,put to death: 
There shall not an hand touch it, but he shall surely be stoned, or shot through; whether it be beast or man, it shall not live: when the trumpet soundeth long, they shall come up to the mount. 
And Moses went down from the mount unto the people, and sanctified the people; and they washed their clothes. 
And he said unto the people, Be ready against the third day: come not at your wives. 
And it came to pass on the third day in the morning, that there were thunders and lightnings, and a thick cloud upon the mount, a
576, through us thanksgiving to God. 
For the administration of this service not only supplieth the want of the saints, but is abundant also by many thanksgivings unto God; 
Whiles by the experiment of this ministration they glorify God for your professed subjection unto the gospel of Christ, and for your liberal distribution unto them, and unto all men; 
And by their prayer for you, which long after you for the exceeding grace of God in you. 
Thanks be unto God for his unspeakable gift. 
Now I Paul myself beseech you by the meekness and gentleness of Christ, who in presenc
588,r us into the hand of the Chaldeans, that they might put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon. 
So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of the LORD, to dwell in the land of Judah. 
But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had lef
703,derness, except thou make thyself altogether a prince over us? 
Moreover thou hast not brought us into a land that floweth with milk and honey, or given us inheritance of fields and vineyards: wilt thou put out the eyes of these men? we will not come up. 
And Moses was very wroth, and said unto the LORD, Respect not thou their offering: I have not taken one ass from them, neither have I hurt one of them. 
And Moses said unto Korah, Be thou and all thy company before the LORD, thou, and they, and Aaron, to morrow: 
And take every man his censer, and put incense in them, and bring ye before the LORD every man his censer, two hundred and fifty censers; thou also, and Aaron, each of you his censer.
535, of death. 
The flood breaketh out from the inhabitant; even the waters forgotten of the foot: they are dried up, they are gone away from men. 
As for the earth, out of it cometh bread: and under it is turned up as it were fire. 
The stones of it are the place of sapphires: and it hath dust of gold. 
There is a path which no fowl knoweth, and which the vulture's eye hath not seen: 
The lion's whelps have not trodden it, nor the fierce lion passed by it. 
He putteth forth his hand upon the rock; he overturneth the mountains by the
550,David; 
Who found favour before God, and desired to find a tabernacle for the God of Jacob. 
But Solomon built him an house. 
Howbeit the most High dwelleth not in temples made with hands; as saith the prophet, 
Heaven is my throne, and earth is my footstool: what house will ye build me? saith the Lord: or what is the place of my rest? 
Hath not my hand made all these things? 
Ye stiffnecked and uncircumcised in heart and ears, ye do always resist the Holy Ghost: as your fathers did, so do ye. 
Which of the prophets have not your fathers persec
514,, and is in kings' palaces. 
There be three things which go well, yea, four are comely in going: 
A lion which is strongest among beasts, and turneth not away for any; 
A greyhound; an he goat also; and a king, against whom there is no rising up. 
If thou hast done foolishly in lifting up thyself, or if thou hast thought evil, lay thine hand upon thy mouth. 
Surely the churning of milk bringeth forth butter, and the wringing of the nose bringeth forth blood: so the forcing of wrath bringeth forth strife. 
The
617,I will look upon it, that I may remember the everlasting covenant between God and every living creature of all flesh that is upon the earth. 
And God said unto Noah, This is the token of the covenant, which I have established between me and all flesh that is upon the earth. 
And the sons of Noah, that went forth of the ark, were Shem, and Ham, and Japheth: and Ham is the father of Canaan. 
These are the three sons of Noah: and of them was the whole earth overspread. 
And Noah began to be an husbandman, and he planted a vineyard: 
And he drank of the wine, and was drunken; and he was uncovered within his tent. 
555, a voice came from heaven, which said, Thou art my beloved Son; in thee I am well pleased. 
And Jesus himself began to be about thirty years of age, being (as was supposed) the son of Joseph, which was the son of Heli, 
Which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, which was the son of Melchi, which was the son of Janna, which was the son of Joseph, 
Which was the son of Mattathias, which was the son of Amos, which was the son of Naum, which was the son of Esli, which was the son of Nagge, 
Which was the son of Maath, which was the son of
612,new piece that filled it up taketh away from the old, and the rent is made worse. 
And no man putteth new wine into old bottles: else the new wine doth burst the bottles, and the wine is spilled, and the bottles will be marred: but new wine must be put into new bottles. 
And it came to pass, that he went through the corn fields on the sabbath day; and his disciples began, as they went, to pluck the ears of corn. 
And the Pharisees said unto him, Behold, why do they on the sabbath day that which is not lawful? 
And he said unto them, Have ye never read what David did, when he had need, and was an hungred, 
620,enty thousand men. 
Then David put garrisons in Syria of Damascus: and the Syrians became servants to David, and brought gifts. And the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went. 
And David took the shields of gold that were on the servants of Hadadezer, and brought them to Jerusalem. 
And from Betah, and from Berothai, cities of Hadadezer, king David took exceeding much brass. 
When Toi king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host of Hadadezer, 
Then Toi sent Joram his son unto king David, to salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadadezer, and smitten him: for Hadadezer had wa
484,nd a two-edged sword in their hand; 
To execute vengeance upon the heathen, and punishments upon the people; 
To bind their kings with chains, and their nobles with fetters of iron; 
To execute upon them the judgment written: this honour have all his saints. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD. Praise God in his sanctuary: praise him in the firmament of his power. 
Praise him for his mighty acts: praise him according to his excellent greatness. 
Praise him with the sound of t
711,at they should repent and turn to God, and do works meet for repentance. 
For these causes the Jews caught me in the temple, and went about to kill me. 
Having therefore obtained help of God, I continue unto this day, witnessing both to small and great, saying none other things than those which the prophets and Moses did say should come: 
That Christ should suffer, and that he should be the first that should rise from the dead, and should shew light unto the people, and to the Gentiles. 
And as he thus spake for himself, Festus said with a loud voice, Paul, thou art beside thyself; much learning doth make thee mad. 
But he said, I am not mad, most noble Festus; but speak forth the words of truth and so
495,ht. Wherefore they say, Is Saul also among the prophets? 
And David fled from Naioth in Ramah, and came and said before Jonathan, What have I done? what is mine iniquity? and what is my sin before thy father, that he seeketh my life? 
And he said unto him, God forbid; thou shalt not die: behold, my father will do nothing either great or small, but that he will shew it me: and why should my father hide this thing from me? it is not so. 
And David sware moreover, and said, Thy father certainl
578,ing, and drink thy water with trembling and with carefulness; 
And say unto the people of the land, Thus saith the Lord GOD of the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and of the land of Israel; They shall eat their bread with carefulness, and drink their water with astonishment, that her land may be desolate from all that is therein, because of the violence of all them that dwell therein. 
And the cities that are inhabited shall be laid waste, and the land shall be desolate; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, what is t
667,umpet give an uncertain sound, who shall prepare himself to the battle? 
So likewise ye, except ye utter by the tongue words easy to be understood, how shall it be known what is spoken? for ye shall speak into the air. 
There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and none of them is without signification. 
Therefore if I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be unto him that speaketh a barbarian, and he that speaketh shall be a barbarian unto me. 
Even so ye, forasmuch as ye are zealous of spiritual gifts, seek that ye may excel to the edifying of the church. 
Wherefore let him that speaketh in an unknown tongue pray that he may interpret
652,im with all speed, they departed. 
Now while Paul waited for them at Athens, his spirit was stirred in him, when he saw the city wholly given to idolatry. 
Therefore disputed he in the synagogue with the Jews, and with the devout persons, and in the market daily with them that met with him. 
Then certain philosophers of the Epicureans, and of the Stoicks, encountered him. And some said, What will this babbler say? other some, He seemeth to be a setter forth of strange gods: because he preached unto them Jesus, and the resurrection. 
And they took him, and brought him unto Areopagus, saying, May we know what this new doctrine, whereof thou speak
532,ed and fifty thousand and three thousand and six hundred. 
And he set threescore and ten thousand of them to be bearers of burdens, and fourscore thousand to be hewers in the mountain, and three thousand and six hundred overseers to set the people a work. 
Then Solomon began to build the house of the LORD at Jerusalem in mount Moriah, where the Lord appeared unto David his father, in the place that David had prepared in the threshingfloor of Ornan the Jebusite. 
And he began to build in the second day of the second month, in t
579,g, God make thee as Ephraim and as Manasseh: and he set Ephraim before Manasseh. 
And Israel said unto Joseph, Behold, I die: but God shall be with you, and bring you again unto the land of your fathers. 
Moreover I have given to thee one portion above thy brethren, which I took out of the hand of the Amorite with my sword and with my bow. 
And Jacob called unto his sons, and said, Gather yourselves together, that I may tell you that which shall befall you in the last days. 
Gather yourselves together, and hear, ye sons of Jacob; and hearken unto Israel your father. 
Reube
519, shall be, if he say unto thee, I will not go away from thee; because he loveth thee and thine house, because he is well with thee; 
Then thou shalt take an aul, and thrust it through his ear unto the door, and he shall be thy servant for ever. And also unto thy maidservant thou shalt do likewise. 
It shall not seem hard unto thee, when thou sendest him away free from thee; for he hath been worth a double hired servant to thee, in serving thee six years: and the LORD thy God shall bless thee in all that thou doest
495,eem at any time. 
And if a man purchase of the Levites, then the house that was sold, and the city of his possession, shall go out in the year of jubile: for the houses of the cities of the Levites are their possession among the children of Israel. 
But the field of the suburbs of their cities may not be sold; for it is their perpetual possession. 
And if thy brother be waxen poor, and fallen in decay with thee; then thou shalt relieve him: yea, though he be a stranger, or a sojourner; that
659,scribe of the law of the God of heaven, shall require of you, it be done speedily, 
Unto an hundred talents of silver, and to an hundred measures of wheat, and to an hundred baths of wine, and to an hundred baths of oil, and salt without prescribing how much. 
Whatsoever is commanded by the God of heaven, let it be diligently done for the house of the God of heaven: for why should there be wrath against the realm of the king and his sons? 
Also we certify you, that touching any of the priests and Levites, singers, porters, Nethinims, or ministers of this house of God, it shall not be lawful to impose toll, tribute, or custom, upon them. 
And thou, Ezr
630,r him in the ground, and a trap for him in the way. 
Terrors shall make him afraid on every side, and shall drive him to his feet. 
His strength shall be hungerbitten, and destruction shall be ready at his side. 
It shall devour the strength of his skin: even the firstborn of death shall devour his strength. 
His confidence shall be rooted out of his tabernacle, and it shall bring him to the king of terrors. 
It shall dwell in his tabernacle, because it is none of his: brimstone shall be scattered upon his habitation. 
His roots shall be dried up beneath, and above shall his branch be cut off. 
His remembrance shall perish
500,came, yet found they none. At the last came two false witnesses, 
And said, This fellow said, I am able to destroy the temple of God, and to build it in three days. 
And the high priest arose, and said unto him, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against thee? 
But Jesus held his peace, And the high priest answered and said unto him, I adjure thee by the living God, that thou tell us whether thou be the Christ, the Son of God. 
Jesus saith unto him, Thou hast said: neverthele
608,old king David. 
Nevertheless a lad saw them, and told Absalom: but they went both of them away quickly, and came to a man's house in Bahurim, which had a well in his court; whither they went down. 
And the woman took and spread a covering over the well's mouth, and spread ground corn thereon; and the thing was not known. 
And when Absalom's servants came to the woman to the house, they said, Where is Ahimaaz and Jonathan? And the woman said unto them, They be gone over the brook of water. And when they had sought and could not find them, they returned to Jerusalem. 
And it came to pass, after they we
679,and Jehiel, and Zechariah, and Azariah, and Michael, and Shephatiah: all these were the sons of Jehoshaphat king of Israel. 
And their father gave them great gifts of silver, and of gold, and of precious things, with fenced cities in Judah: but the kingdom gave he to Jehoram; because he was the firstborn. 
Now when Jehoram was risen up to the kingdom of his father, he strengthened himself, and slew all his brethren with the sword, and divers also of the princes of Israel. 
Jehoram was thirty and two years old when he began to reign, and he reigned eight years in Jerusalem. 
And he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, like as did the house of Ahab: for he had the dau
511,ter: because when I called, ye did not answer; when I spake, ye did not hear; but did evil before mine eyes, and did choose that wherein I delighted not. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, my servants shall eat, but ye shall be hungry: behold, my servants shall drink, but ye shall be thirsty: behold, my servants shall rejoice, but ye shall be ashamed: 
Behold, my servants shall sing for joy of heart, but ye shall cry for sorrow of heart, and shall howl for vexation of spirit. 
And ye shall leave y
684, over them, to do judgment and justice. 
And she gave the king an hundred and twenty talents of gold, and of spices great abundance, and precious stones: neither was there any such spice as the queen of Sheba gave king Solomon. 
And the servants also of Huram, and the servants of Solomon, which brought gold from Ophir, brought algum trees and precious stones. 
And the king made of the algum trees terraces to the house of the LORD, and to the king's palace, and harps and psalteries for singers: and there were none such seen before in the land of Judah. 
And king Solomon gave to the queen of Sheba all her desire, whatsoever she asked, beside that which she had brought unto the 
573,amp. 
And Moses was wroth with the officers of the host, with the captains over thousands, and captains over hundreds, which came from the battle. 
And Moses said unto them, Have ye saved all the women alive? 
Behold, these caused the children of Israel, through the counsel of Balaam, to commit trespass against the LORD in the matter of Peor, and there was a plague among the congregation of the LORD. 
Now therefore kill every male among the little ones, and kill every woman that hath known man by lying with him. 
But all the women children, that have not known a man 
713,om Jerusalem to ask him, Who art thou? 
And he confessed, and denied not; but confessed, I am not the Christ. 
And they asked him, What then? Art thou Elias? And he saith, I am not. Art thou that prophet? And he answered, No. 
Then said they unto him, Who art thou? that we may give an answer to them that sent us. What sayest thou of thyself? 
He said, I am the voice of one crying in the wilderness, Make straight the way of the Lord, as said the prophet Esaias. 
And they which were sent were of the Pharisees. 
And they asked him, and said unto him, Why baptizest thou then, if thou be not that Christ, nor Elias, neither that prophet? 
John answered them, saying, I baptize with water: but there standeth one
522,ehold the four wheels by the cherubims, one wheel by one cherub, and another wheel by another cherub: and the appearance of the wheels was as the colour of a beryl stone. 
And as for their appearances, they four had one likeness, as if a wheel had been in the midst of a wheel. 
When they went, they went upon their four sides; they turned not as they went, but to the place whither the head looked they followed it; they turned not as they went. 
And their whole body, and their backs, and their hands, and their wings, a
571,than the Philistines, though I do them a displeasure. 
And Samson went and caught three hundred foxes, and took firebrands, and turned tail to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst between two tails. 
And when he had set the brands on fire, he let them go into the standing corn of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks, and also the standing corn, with the vineyards and olives. 
Then the Philistines said, Who hath done this? And they answered, Samson, the son in law of the Timnite, because he had taken his wife, and given her to his companion. And the Phili
688,up and down with us? seeing I go whither I may, return thou, and take back thy brethren: mercy and truth be with thee. 
And Ittai answered the king, and said, As the LORD liveth, and as my lord the king liveth, surely in what place my lord the king shall be, whether in death or life, even there also will thy servant be. 
And David said to Ittai, Go and pass over. And Ittai the Gittite passed over, and all his men, and all the little ones that were with him. 
And all the country wept with a loud voice, and all the people passed over: the king also himself passed over the brook Kidron, and all the people passed over, toward the way of the wilderness. 
And lo Zadok also, and all the
718,n. Then the king said, Hang him thereon. 
So they hanged Haman on the gallows that he had prepared for Mordecai. Then was the king's wrath pacified. 
On that day did the king Ahasuerus give the house of Haman the Jews' enemy unto Esther the queen. And Mordecai came before the king; for Esther had told what he was unto her. 
And the king took off his ring, which he had taken from Haman, and gave it unto Mordecai. And Esther set Mordecai over the house of Haman. 
And Esther spake yet again before the king, and fell down at his feet, and besought him with tears to put away the mischief of Haman the Agagite, and his device that he had devised against the Jews. 
Then the king held out the golden sceptre toward Est
642,the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly departed from my God. 
For all his judgments were before me, and I did not put away his statutes from me. 
I was also upright before him, and I kept myself from mine iniquity. 
Therefore hath the LORD recompensed me according to my righteousness, according to the cleanness of my hands in his eyesight. 
With the merciful thou wilt shew thyself merciful; with an upright man thou wilt shew thyself upright; 
With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward thou wilt shew thyself froward. 
For thou wilt save the afflicted people; but wilt bring down high looks. 
For thou wilt light
686,nd was glad. 
Then said the Jews unto him, Thou art not yet fifty years old, and hast thou seen Abraham? 
Jesus said unto them, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Before Abraham was, I am. 
Then took they up stones to cast at him: but Jesus hid himself, and went out of the temple, going through the midst of them, and so passed by. 
And as Jesus passed by, he saw a man which was blind from his birth. 
And his disciples asked him, saying, Master, who did sin, this man, or his parents, that he was born blind? 
Jesus answered, Neither hath this man sinned, nor his parents: but that the works of God should be made manifest in him. 
I must work the works of him that sent me, while it is
610,ghteousness answer for me in time to come, when it shall come for my hire before thy face: every one that is not speckled and spotted among the goats, and brown among the sheep, that shall be counted stolen with me. 
And Laban said, Behold, I would it might be according to thy word. 
And he removed that day the he goats that were ringstraked and spotted, and all the she goats that were speckled and spotted, and every one that had some white in it, and all the brown among the sheep, and gave them into the hand of his sons. 
And he set three days' journey betwixt himself and Jacob: and Jacob fed the rest 
578, field, are they against her round about; because she hath been rebellious against me, saith the LORD. 
Thy way and thy doings have procured these things unto thee; this is thy wickedness, because it is bitter, because it reacheth unto thine heart. 
My bowels, my bowels! I am pained at my very heart; my heart maketh a noise in me; I cannot hold my peace, because thou hast heard, O my soul, the sound of the trumpet, the alarm of war. 
Destruction upon destruction is cried; for the whole land is spoiled: suddenly are my tents spoiled, and my curtains in a moment. 
How long 
700,, Peradventure thou wouldest take by force thy daughters from me. 
With whomsoever thou findest thy gods, let him not live: before our brethren discern thou what is thine with me, and take it to thee. For Jacob knew not that Rachel had stolen them. 
And Laban went into Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into the two maidservants' tents; but he found them not. Then went he out of Leah's tent, and entered into Rachel's tent. 
Now Rachel had taken the images, and put them in the camel's furniture, and sat upon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but found them not. 
And she said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I cannot rise up before thee; for the custom of women is upo
616,all manner of work, which the LORD had commanded to be made by the hand of Moses. 
And Moses said unto the children of Israel, See, the LORD hath called by name Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah; 
And he hath filled him with the spirit of God, in wisdom, in understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship; 
And to devise curious works, to work in gold, and in silver, and in brass, 
And in the cutting of stones, to set them, and in carving of wood, to make any manner of cunning work. 
And he hath put in his heart that he may teach, both he, and Aholiab, the son of 
495,o Gad came to David, and told him, and said unto him, Shall seven years of famine come unto thee in thy land? or wilt thou flee three months before thine enemies, while they pursue thee? or that there be three days' pestilence in thy land? now advise, and see what answer I shall return to him that sent me. 
And David said unto Gad, I am in a great strait: let us fall now into the hand of the LORD; for his mercies are great: and let me not fall into the hand of man. 
So the LORD sent a pesti
487,at it is good for a man so to be. 
Art thou bound unto a wife? seek not to be loosed. Art thou loosed from a wife? seek not a wife. 
But and if thou marry, thou hast not sinned; and if a virgin marry, she hath not sinned. Nevertheless such shall have trouble in the flesh: but I spare you. 
But this I say, brethren, the time is short: it remaineth, that both they that have wives be as though they had none; 
And they that weep, as though they wept not; and they that rejoice, as though
523,ss over him. 
This matter is by the decree of the watchers, and the demand by the word of the holy ones: to the intent that the living may know that the most High ruleth in the kingdom of men, and giveth it to whomsoever he will, and setteth up over it the basest of men. 
This dream I king Nebuchadnezzar have seen. Now thou, O Belteshazzar, declare the interpretation thereof, forasmuch as all the wise men of my kingdom are not able to make known unto me the interpretation: but thou art able; for the spirit of the holy
533,make reconciliation upon it. 
And he took all the fat that was upon the inwards, and the caul above the liver, and the two kidneys, and their fat, and Moses burned it upon the altar. 
But the bullock, and his hide, his flesh, and his dung, he burnt with fire without the camp; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And he brought the ram for the burnt offering: and Aaron and his sons laid their hands upon the head of the ram. 
And he killed it; and Moses sprinkled the blood upon the altar round about. 
And he cut the ram into pieces; and
542,rael out of the north country, and from all countries whither I had driven them; and they shall dwell in their own land. 
Mine heart within me is broken because of the prophets; all my bones shake; I am like a drunken man, and like a man whom wine hath overcome, because of the LORD, and because of the words of his holiness. 
For the land is full of adulterers; for because of swearing the land mourneth; the pleasant places of the wilderness are dried up, and their course is evil, and their force is not right. 
For both prophet and priest
552, every man his sack. 
And he searched, and began at the eldest, and left at the youngest: and the cup was found in Benjamin's sack. 
Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his ass, and returned to the city. 
And Judah and his brethren came to Joseph's house; for he was yet there: and they fell before him on the ground. 
And Joseph said unto them, What deed is this that ye have done? wot ye not that such a man as I can certainly divine? 
And Judah said, What shall we say unto my lord? what shall we speak? or how shall we clear ourselves
690,of the land of Canaan. 
Now an omer is the tenth part of an ephah. 
And all the congregation of the children of Israel journeyed from the wilderness of Sin, after their journeys, according to the commandment of the LORD, and pitched in Rephidim: and there was no water for the people to drink. 
Wherefore the people did chide with Moses, and said, Give us water that we may drink. And Moses said unto them, Why chide ye with me? wherefore do ye tempt the LORD? 
And the people thirsted there for water; and the people murmured against Moses, and said, Wherefore is this that thou hast brought us up out of Egypt, to kill us and our children and our cattle with thirst? 
And Moses cried unto
655,D commanded Moses to make with the children of Israel in the land of Moab, beside the covenant which he made with them in Horeb. 
And Moses called unto all Israel, and said unto them, Ye have seen all that the LORD did before your eyes in the land of Egypt unto Pharaoh, and unto all his servants, and unto all his land; 
The great temptations which thine eyes have seen, the signs, and those great miracles: 
Yet the LORD hath not given you an heart to perceive, and eyes to see, and ears to hear, unto this day. 
And I have led you forty years in the wilderness: your clothes are not waxen old upon you, and thy shoe is not waxen old upon thy foot. 
Ye 
530,and see wherein his great strength lieth, and by what means we may prevail against him, that we may bind him to afflict him; and we will give thee every one of us eleven hundred pieces of silver. 
And Delilah said to Samson, Tell me, I pray thee, wherein thy great strength lieth, and wherewith thou mightest be bound to afflict thee. 
And Samson said unto her, If they bind me with seven green withs that were never dried, then shall I be weak, and be as another man. 
Then the lords of the Philistines brought up to her seven gr
709,ittingly; for Manasseh was the firstborn. 
And he blessed Joseph, and said, God, before whom my fathers Abraham and Isaac did walk, the God which fed me all my life long unto this day, 
The Angel which redeemed me from all evil, bless the lads; and let my name be named on them, and the name of my fathers Abraham and Isaac; and let them grow into a multitude in the midst of the earth. 
And when Joseph saw that his father laid his right hand upon the head of Ephraim, it displeased him: and he held up his father's hand, to remove it from Ephraim's head unto Manasseh's head. 
And Joseph said unto his father, Not so, my father: for this is the firstborn; put thy right hand upon his head. 
And his father r
560, by my name: for I have created him for my glory, I have formed him; yea, I have made him. 
Bring forth the blind people that have eyes, and the deaf that have ears. 
Let all the nations be gathered together, and let the people be assembled: who among them can declare this, and shew us former things? let them bring forth their witnesses, that they may be justified: or let them hear, and say, It is truth. 
Ye are my witnesses, saith the LORD, and my servant whom I have chosen: that ye may know and believe me, and understand that I am he: before me there w
501, with axes, as hewers of wood. 
They shall cut down her forest, saith the LORD, though it cannot be searched; because they are more than the grasshoppers, and are innumerable. 
The daughter of Egypt shall be confounded; she shall be delivered into the hand of the people of the north. 
The LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saith; Behold, I will punish the multitude of No, and Pharaoh, and Egypt, with their gods, and their kings; even Pharaoh, and all them that trust in him: 
And I will deliver the
691,gments that remained to them twelve baskets. 
And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were with him: and he asked them, saying, Whom say the people that I am? 
They answering said, John the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and others say, that one of the old prophets is risen again. 
He said unto them, But whom say ye that I am? Peter answering said, The Christ of God. 
And he straitly charged them, and commanded them to tell no man that thing; 
Saying, The Son of man must suffer many things, and be rejected of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be slain, and be raised the third day. 
And he said to them all, If any man will come after me, let him deny hi
714,Shebaniah, Malluch, 
Harim, Meremoth, Obadiah, 
Daniel, Ginnethon, Baruch, 
Meshullam, Abijah, Mijamin, 
Maaziah, Bilgai, Shemaiah: these were the priests. 
And the Levites: both Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui of the sons of Henadad, Kadmiel; 
And their brethren, Shebaniah, Hodijah, Kelita, Pelaiah, Hanan, 
Micha, Rehob, Hashabiah, 
Zaccur, Sherebiah, Shebaniah, 
Hodijah, Bani, Beninu. 
The chief of the people; Parosh, Pahathmoab, Elam, Zatthu, Bani, 
Bunni, Azgad, Bebai, 
Adonijah, Bigvai, Adin, 
Ater, Hizkijah, Azzur, 
Hodijah, Hashum, Bezai, 
Hariph, Anathoth, Nebai, 
Magpiash, Meshullam, Hezir, 
Meshezabeel, Zadok, Jaddua, 
Pelatiah, Hanan, Anaiah, 
Hoshea, Hananiah, Hashub, 
Hallohesh, Pileha, Sho
575,ich was of the like work. Solomon made also an house for Pharaoh's daughter, whom he had taken to wife, like unto this porch. 
All these were of costly stones, according to the measures of hewed stones, sawed with saws, within and without, even from the foundation unto the coping, and so on the outside toward the great court. 
And the foundation was of costly stones, even great stones, stones of ten cubits, and stones of eight cubits. 
And above were costly stones, after the measures of hewed stones, and cedars. 
And the great court round about was with three rows of h
523,wered and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are these which hear the word of God, and do it. 
Now it came to pass on a certain day, that he went into a ship with his disciples: and he said unto them, Let us go over unto the other side of the lake. And they launched forth. 
But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of wind on the lake; and they were filled with water, and were in jeopardy. 
And they came to him, and awoke him, saying, Master, master, we perish. Then he arose, and rebuked th
690,o be forgotten in Zion, and hath despised in the indignation of his anger the king and the priest. 
The LORD hath cast off his altar, he hath abhorred his sanctuary, he hath given up into the hand of the enemy the walls of her palaces; they have made a noise in the house of the LORD, as in the day of a solemn feast. 
The LORD hath purposed to destroy the wall of the daughter of Zion: he hath stretched out a line, he hath not withdrawn his hand from destroying: therefore he made the rampart and the wall to lament; they languished together. 
Her gates are sunk into the ground; he hath destroyed and broken her bars: her king and her princes are among the Gentiles: the law is no more; 
622,e are gone away: and what have I more? and what is this that ye say unto me, What aileth thee? 
And the children of Dan said unto him, Let not thy voice be heard among us, lest angry fellows run upon thee, and thou lose thy life, with the lives of thy household. 
And the children of Dan went their way: and when Micah saw that they were too strong for him, he turned and went back unto his house. 
And they took the things which Micah had made, and the priest which he had, and came unto Laish, unto a people that were at quiet and secure: and they smote them with the edge of the sword, and burnt the city with fire. 
An
614,amascus, saith the LORD, whose name is The God of hosts. 
Woe to them that are at ease in Zion, and trust in the mountain of Samaria, which are named chief of the nations, to whom the house of Israel came! 
Pass ye unto Calneh, and see; and from thence go ye to Hamath the great: then go down to Gath of the Philistines: be they better than these kingdoms? or their border greater than your border? 
Ye that put far away the evil day, and cause the seat of violence to come near; 
That lie upon beds of ivory, and stretch themselves upon their couches, and eat the lambs out of the flock, and the calves out of the
613,eth the air: 
But I keep under my body, and bring it into subjection: lest that by any means, when I have preached to others, I myself should be a castaway. 
Moreover, brethren, I would not that ye should be ignorant, how that all our fathers were under the cloud, and all passed through the sea; 
And were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in the sea; 
And did all eat the same spiritual meat; 
And did all drink the same spiritual drink: for they drank of that spiritual Rock that followed them: and that Rock was Christ. 
But with many of them God was not well pleased: for they were overthrown in the w
592,nce shall be ministered unto you abundantly into the everlasting kingdom of our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ. 
Wherefore I will not be negligent to put you always in remembrance of these things, though ye know them, and be established in the present truth. 
Yea, I think it meet, as long as I am in this tabernacle, to stir you up by putting you in remembrance; 
Knowing that shortly I must put off this my tabernacle, even as our Lord Jesus Christ hath shewed me. 
Moreover I will endeavour that ye may be able after my decease to have these things always in remembrance. 
For we have not f
638,thousand times ten thousand, and thousands of thousands; 
Saying with a loud voice, Worthy is the Lamb that was slain to receive power, and riches, and wisdom, and strength, and honour, and glory, and blessing. 
And every creature which is in heaven, and on the earth, and under the earth, and such as are in the sea, and all that are in them, heard I saying, Blessing, and honour, and glory, and power, be unto him that sitteth upon the throne, and unto the Lamb for ever and ever. 
And the four beasts said, Amen. And the four and twenty elders fell down and worshipped him that liveth for ever and ever. 
And I saw when the Lamb opened
480,e are in our hearts to die and live with you. 
Great is my boldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of you: I am filled with comfort, I am exceeding joyful in all our tribulation. 
For, when we were come into Macedonia, our flesh had no rest, but we were troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were fears. 
Nevertheless God, that comforteth those that are cast down, comforted us by the coming of Titus; 
And not by his coming only, but by the consolati
596,ow that I am the LORD, when I have gotten me honour upon Pharaoh, upon his chariots, and upon his horsemen. 
And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel, removed and went behind them; and the pillar of the cloud went from before their face, and stood behind them: 
And it came between the camp of the Egyptians and the camp of Israel; and it was a cloud and darkness to them, but it gave light by night to these: so that the one came not near the other all the night. 
And Moses stretched out his hand over the sea; and the LORD caused the sea to go back by a strong east wind all 
504,
Even those that were numbered of them, throughout their families, by the house of their fathers, were two thousand and six hundred and thirty. 
These are they that were numbered of the families of the sons of Gershon, of all that might do service in the tabernacle of the congregation, whom Moses and Aaron did number according to the commandment of the LORD. 
And those that were numbered of the families of the sons of Merari, throughout their families, by the house of their fathers, 
From thirty yea
503, of them, by the hill of Moreh, in the valley. 
And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people that are with thee are too many for me to give the Midianites into their hands, lest Israel vaunt themselves against me, saying, Mine own hand hath saved me. 
Now therefore go to, proclaim in the ears of the people, saying, Whosoever is fearful and afraid, let him return and depart early from mount Gilead. And there returned of the people twenty and two thousand; and there remained ten thousand. 
And the LORD 
523,o go, they went, thither was their spirit to go; and the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
When those went, these went; and when those stood, these stood; and when those were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted up over against them: for the spirit of the living creature was in the wheels. 
And the likeness of the firmament upon the heads of the living creature was as the colour of the terrible crystal, stretched forth over their heads above.
652,lence, and did that which is not good among his people, lo, even he shall die in his iniquity. 
Yet say ye, Why? doth not the son bear the iniquity of the father? When the son hath done that which is lawful and right, and hath kept all my statutes, and hath done them, he shall surely live. 
The soul that sinneth, it shall die. The son shall not bear the iniquity of the father, neither shall the father bear the iniquity of the son: the righteousness of the righteous shall be upon him, and the wickedness of the wicked shall be upon him. 
But if the wicked will turn from all his sins that he hath committed, and keep all my statutes, and do that wh
629,e unto you that are rich! for ye have received your consolation. 
Woe unto you that are full! for ye shall hunger. Woe unto you that laugh now! for ye shall mourn and weep. 
Woe unto you, when all men shall speak well of you! for so did their fathers to the false prophets. 
But I say unto you which hear, Love your enemies, do good to them which hate you, 
Bless them that curse you, and pray for them which despitefully use you. 
And unto him that smiteth thee on the one cheek offer also the other; and him that taketh away thy cloak forbid not to take thy coat also. 
Give to every man that asketh of thee; and of him that ta
669,of the stranger that sojourneth in Israel, which separateth himself from me, and setteth up his idols in his heart, and putteth the stumblingblock of his iniquity before his face, and cometh to a prophet to enquire of him concerning me; I the LORD will answer him by myself: 
And I will set my face against that man, and will make him a sign and a proverb, and I will cut him off from the midst of my people; and ye shall know that I am the LORD. 
And if the prophet be deceived when he hath spoken a thing, I the LORD have deceived that prophet, and I will stretch out my hand upon him, and will destroy him from the midst of my people Israel. 
And they shall bear the
648,, that he died not. 
Then Saul went up from following the Philistines: and the Philistines went to their own place. 
So Saul took the kingdom over Israel, and fought against all his enemies on every side, against Moab, and against the children of Ammon, and against Edom, and against the kings of Zobah, and against the Philistines: and whithersoever he turned himself, he vexed them. 
And he gathered an host, and smote the Amalekites, and delivered Israel out of the hands of them that spoiled them. 
Now the sons of Saul were Jonathan, and Ishui, and Melchishua: and the names of his two daughters were these; the name of the firstborn Merab, an
707,LORD by the hand of Moses. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Make thee two trumpets of silver; of a whole piece shalt thou make them: that thou mayest use them for the calling of the assembly, and for the journeying of the camps. 
And when they shall blow with them, all the assembly shall assemble themselves to thee at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation. 
And if they blow but with one trumpet, then the princes, which are heads of the thousands of Israel, shall gather themselves unto thee. 
When ye blow an alarm, then the camps that lie on the east parts shall go forward. 
When ye blow an alarm the second time, then the camps that lie on the south side shall take their journey: th
635,d the best of the sheep and of the oxen, to sacrifice unto the LORD thy God; and the rest we have utterly destroyed. 
Then Samuel said unto Saul, Stay, and I will tell thee what the LORD hath said to me this night. And he said unto him, Say on. 
And Samuel said, When thou wast little in thine own sight, wast thou not made the head of the tribes of Israel, and the LORD anointed thee king over Israel? 
And the LORD sent thee on a journey, and said, Go and utterly destroy the sinners the Amalekites, and fight against them until they be consumed. 
Wherefore then didst thou not obey the voice of the LORD, but didst fly upon the spoi
486,hou also be tempted. 
Bear ye one another's burdens, and so fulfil the law of Christ. 
For if a man think himself to be something, when he is nothing, he deceiveth himself. 
But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he have rejoicing in himself alone, and not in another. 
For every man shall bear his own burden. 
Let him that is taught in the word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things. 
Be not deceived; God is not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that
675,ing much riches and honour: and he made himself treasuries for silver, and for gold, and for precious stones, and for spices, and for shields, and for all manner of pleasant jewels; 
Storehouses also for the increase of corn, and wine, and oil; and stalls for all manner of beasts, and cotes for flocks. 
Moreover he provided him cities, and possessions of flocks and herds in abundance: for God had given him substance very much. 
This same Hezekiah also stopped the upper watercourse of Gihon, and brought it straight down to the west side of the city of David. And Hezekiah prospered in all his works. 
Howbeit in the business of the ambassadors of the princes of Babylon,
597,ude: and they shall call it The valley of Hamongog. 
And seven months shall the house of Israel be burying of them, that they may cleanse the land. 
Yea, all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be to them a renown the day that I shall be glorified, saith the Lord GOD. 
And they shall sever out men of continual employment, passing through the land to bury with the passengers those that remain upon the face of the earth, to cleanse it: after the end of seven months shall they search. 
And the passengers that pass through the land, when any seeth a man's bone, then shall he se
584,nsel: they despised all my reproof. 
Therefore shall they eat of the fruit of their own way, and be filled with their own devices. 
For the turning away of the simple shall slay them, and the prosperity of fools shall destroy them. 
But whoso hearkeneth unto me shall dwell safely, and shall be quiet from fear of evil. 
My son, if thou wilt receive my words, and hide my commandments with thee; 
So that thou incline thine ear unto wisdom, and apply thine heart to understanding; 
Yea, if thou criest after knowledge, and liftest up thy voice for understanding; 
If thou seekest her 
486,t of the rock, and will cover thee with my hand while I pass by: 
And I will take away mine hand, and thou shalt see my back parts: but my face shall not be seen. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Hew thee two tables of stone like unto the first: and I will write upon these tables the words that were in the first tables, which thou brakest. 
And be ready in the morning, and come up in the morning unto mount Sinai, and present thyself there to me in the top of the mount. 
And no man sh
480,ith the well advised is wisdom. 
Wealth gotten by vanity shall be diminished: but he that gathereth by labour shall increase. 
Hope deferred maketh the heart sick: but when the desire cometh, it is a tree of life. 
Whoso despiseth the word shall be destroyed: but he that feareth the commandment shall be rewarded. 
The law of the wise is a fountain of life, to depart from the snares of death. 
Good understanding giveth favour: but the way of transgressors is hard. 
Every prude
508, that by the word of God the heavens were of old, and the earth standing out of the water and in the water: 
Whereby the world that then was, being overflowed with water, perished: 
But the heavens and the earth, which are now, by the same word are kept in store, reserved unto fire against the day of judgment and perdition of ungodly men. 
But, beloved, be not ignorant of this one thing, that one day is with the Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years as one day. 
The Lord is not slack concerning
579,ll bear; even I will carry, and will deliver you. 
To whom will ye liken me, and make me equal, and compare me, that we may be like? 
They lavish gold out of the bag, and weigh silver in the balance, and hire a goldsmith; and he maketh it a god: they fall down, yea, they worship. 
They bear him upon the shoulder, they carry him, and set him in his place, and he standeth; from his place shall he not remove: yea, one shall cry unto him, yet can he not answer, nor save him out of his trouble. 
Remember this, and shew yourselves men: bring it again to mind, O ye transgressors.
594,nd the dead shall be his own. 
If a man shall steal an ox, or a sheep, and kill it, or sell it; he shall restore five oxen for an ox, and four sheep for a sheep. 
If a thief be found breaking up, and be smitten that he die, there shall no blood be shed for him. 
If the sun be risen upon him, there shall be blood shed for him; for he should make full restitution; if he have nothing, then he shall be sold for his theft. 
If the theft be certainly found in his hand alive, whether it be ox, or ass, or sheep; he shall restore double. 
If a man shall cause a field or vineyard to be eaten, and 
560,t is not lawful for to put them into the treasury, because it is the price of blood. 
And they took counsel, and bought with them the potter's field, to bury strangers in. 
Wherefore that field was called, The field of blood, unto this day. 
Then was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet, saying, And they took the thirty pieces of silver, the price of him that was valued, whom they of the children of Israel did value; 
And gave them for the potter's field, as the Lord appointed me. 
And Jesus stood before the governor: and the governor as
507, people, and take with thee of the elders of Israel; and thy rod, wherewith thou smotest the river, take in thine hand, and go. 
Behold, I will stand before thee there upon the rock in Horeb; and thou shalt smite the rock, and there shall come water out of it, that the people may drink. And Moses did so in the sight of the elders of Israel. 
And he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because of the chiding of the children of Israel, and because they tempted the LORD, saying, Is the LORD a
564,der unto our neighbours sevenfold into their bosom their reproach, wherewith they have reproached thee, O Lord. 
So we thy people and sheep of thy pasture will give thee thanks for ever: we will shew forth thy praise to all generations. 
Give ear, O Shepherd of Israel, thou that leadest Joseph like a flock; thou that dwellest between the cherubims, shine forth. 
Before Ephraim and Benjamin and Manasseh stir up thy strength, and come and save us. 
Turn us again, O God, and cause thy face to shine; and we shall be saved. 
O LORD God of hosts, how long wilt tho
586, upon the altar: it is the food of the offering made by fire for a sweet savour: all the fat is the LORD's. 
It shall be a perpetual statute for your generations throughout all your dwellings, that ye eat neither fat nor blood. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Speak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a soul shall sin through ignorance against any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things which ought not to be done, and shall do against any of them: 
If the priest that is anointed do sin according to the sin of the people; then let him bring for his sin, which
560,rs cried out, Great is Diana of the Ephesians. 
And when the townclerk had appeased the people, he said, Ye men of Ephesus, what man is there that knoweth not how that the city of the Ephesians is a worshipper of the great goddess Diana, and of the image which fell down from Jupiter? 
Seeing then that these things cannot be spoken against, ye ought to be quiet, and to do nothing rashly. 
For ye have brought hither these men, which are neither robbers of churches, nor yet blasphemers of your goddess. 
Wherefore if Demetrius, and the craftsmen which are wi
485,my sabbaths: for their heart went after their idols. 
Nevertheless mine eye spared them from destroying them, neither did I make an end of them in the wilderness. 
But I said unto their children in the wilderness, Walk ye not in the statutes of your fathers, neither observe their judgments, nor defile yourselves with their idols: 
I am the LORD your God; walk in my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do them; 
And hallow my sabbaths; and they shall be a sign between me and you, t
686,me up out of Egypt. So the Kenites departed from among the Amalekites. 
And Saul smote the Amalekites from Havilah until thou comest to Shur, that is over against Egypt. 
And he took Agag the king of the Amalekites alive, and utterly destroyed all the people with the edge of the sword. 
But Saul and the people spared Agag, and the best of the sheep, and of the oxen, and of the fatlings, and the lambs, and all that was good, and would not utterly destroy them: but every thing that was vile and refuse, that they destroyed utterly. 
Then came the word of the LORD unto Samuel, saying, 
It repenteth me that I have set up Saul to be king: for he is turned back from following me, and 
508,nerations. 
I will sing of mercy and judgment: unto thee, O LORD, will I sing. 
I will behave myself wisely in a perfect way. O when wilt thou come unto me? I will walk within my house with a perfect heart. 
I will set no wicked thing before mine eyes: I hate the work of them that turn aside; it shall not cleave to me. 
A froward heart shall depart from me: I will not know a wicked person. 
Whoso privily slandereth his neighbour, him will I cut off: him that hath an high look and a proud heart will not 
502,multiply thee, as he hath sworn unto thy fathers; 
When thou shalt hearken to the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep all his commandments which I command thee this day, to do that which is right in the eyes of the LORD thy God. 
Ye are the children of the LORD your God: ye shall not cut yourselves, nor make any baldness between your eyes for the dead. 
For thou art an holy people unto the LORD thy God, and the LORD hath chosen thee to be a peculiar people unto himself, above all the nations that a
564,nites, according to the generations of his fathers. In the fortieth year of the reign of David they were sought for, and there were found among them mighty men of valour at Jazer of Gilead. 
And his brethren, men of valour, were two thousand and seven hundred chief fathers, whom king David made rulers over the Reubenites, the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh, for every matter pertaining to God, and affairs of the king. 
Now the children of Israel after their number, to wit, the chief fathers and captains of thousands and hundreds, and their officers t
645, utterly spoiled: for the LORD hath spoken this word. 
The earth mourneth and fadeth away, the world languisheth and fadeth away, the haughty people of the earth do languish. 
The earth also is defiled under the inhabitants thereof; because they have transgressed the laws, changed the ordinance, broken the everlasting covenant. 
Therefore hath the curse devoured the earth, and they that dwell therein are desolate: therefore the inhabitants of the earth are burned, and few men left. 
The new wine mourneth, the vine languisheth, all the merryhearted do sigh. 
The mirth of tabrets ceaseth, the noise of them that rejoice endeth, the joy of t
584,r, and all things made of wood. 
And Eleazar the priest said unto the men of war which went to the battle, This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD commanded Moses; 
Only the gold, and the silver, the brass, the iron, the tin, and the lead, 
Every thing that may abide the fire, ye shall make it go through the fire, and it shall be clean: nevertheless it shall be purified with the water of separation: and all that abideth not the fire ye shall make go through the water. 
And ye shall wash your clothes on the seventh day, and ye shall be clean, and afterward ye shall come 
565,ech you, be as I am; for I am as ye are: ye have not injured me at all. 
Ye know how through infirmity of the flesh I preached the gospel unto you at the first. 
And my temptation which was in my flesh ye despised not, nor rejected; but received me as an angel of God, even as Christ Jesus. 
Where is then the blessedness ye spake of? for I bear you record, that, if it had been possible, ye would have plucked out your own eyes, and have given them to me. 
Am I therefore become your enemy, because I tell you the truth? 
They zealously affect you, but not well; y
542,ubstance is increased in the land. 
But put forth thine hand now, and touch all that he hath, and he will curse thee to thy face. 
And the LORD said unto Satan, Behold, all that he hath is in thy power; only upon himself put not forth thine hand. So Satan went forth from the presence of the LORD. 
And there was a day when his sons and his daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest brother's house: 
And there came a messenger unto Job, and said, The oxen were plowing, and the asses feeding beside them: 
And the Sabeans fell 
648,o the dedication of the image that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up; and they stood before the image that Nebuchadnezzar had set up. 
Then an herald cried aloud, To you it is commanded, O people, nations, and languages, 
That at what time ye hear the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, dulcimer, and all kinds of musick, ye fall down and worship the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar the king hath set up: 
And whoso falleth not down and worshippeth shall the same hour be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace. 
Therefore at that time, when all the people heard the sound of the cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, 
565,ity that is set on an hill cannot be hid. 
Neither do men light a candle, and put it under a bushel, but on a candlestick; and it giveth light unto all that are in the house. 
Let your light so shine before men, that they may see your good works, and glorify your Father which is in heaven. 
Think not that I am come to destroy the law, or the prophets: I am not come to destroy, but to fulfil. 
For verily I say unto you, Till heaven and earth pass, one jot or one tittle shall in no wise pass from the law, till all be fulfilled. 
Whosoever therefore shall break 
687,Let no man therefore despise him: but conduct him forth in peace, that he may come unto me: for I look for him with the brethren. 
As touching our brother Apollos, I greatly desired him to come unto you with the brethren: but his will was not at all to come at this time; but he will come when he shall have convenient time. 
Watch ye, stand fast in the faith, quit you like men, be strong. 
Let all your things be done with charity. 
I beseech you, brethren, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that it is the firstfruits of Achaia, and that they have addicted themselves to the ministry of the saints,) 
That ye submit yourselves unto such, and to every one that helpeth with us, and labo
589,e snare is laid for him in the ground, and a trap for him in the way. 
Terrors shall make him afraid on every side, and shall drive him to his feet. 
His strength shall be hungerbitten, and destruction shall be ready at his side. 
It shall devour the strength of his skin: even the firstborn of death shall devour his strength. 
His confidence shall be rooted out of his tabernacle, and it shall bring him to the king of terrors. 
It shall dwell in his tabernacle, because it is none of his: brimstone shall be scattered upon his habitation. 
His roots shall be dried up beneath, and above
553,ery where against the people, and the law, and this place: and further brought Greeks also into the temple, and hath polluted this holy place. 
(For they had seen before with him in the city Trophimus an Ephesian, whom they supposed that Paul had brought into the temple.) 
And all the city was moved, and the people ran together: and they took Paul, and drew him out of the temple: and forthwith the doors were shut. 
And as they went about to kill him, tidings came unto the chief captain of the band, that all Jerusalem was in an uproar. 
Who immedia
639, not eat up; and thou shalt be only oppressed and crushed alway: 
So that thou shalt be mad for the sight of thine eyes which thou shalt see. 
The LORD shall smite thee in the knees, and in the legs, with a sore botch that cannot be healed, from the sole of thy foot unto the top of thy head. 
The LORD shall bring thee, and thy king which thou shalt set over thee, unto a nation which neither thou nor thy fathers have known; and there shalt thou serve other gods, wood and stone. 
And thou shalt become an astonishment, a proverb, and a byword, among all nations whither the LORD shall lead thee. 
Thou shalt carry much seed out into the
645, Jews, slew they; but on the spoil laid they not their hand. 
On that day the number of those that were slain in Shushan the palace was brought before the king. 
And the king said unto Esther the queen, The Jews have slain and destroyed five hundred men in Shushan the palace, and the ten sons of Haman; what have they done in the rest of the king's provinces? now what is thy petition? and it shall be granted thee: or what is thy request further? and it shall be done. 
Then said Esther, If it please the king, let it be granted to the Jews which are in Shushan to do to morrow also according unto this day's decree, and let Haman's ten sons b
613, us into the hand of the Chaldeans, that they might put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon. 
So Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, and all the people, obeyed not the voice of the LORD, to dwell in the land of Judah. 
But Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all nations, whither they had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah; 
Even men, and women, and children, and the king's daughters, and every person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with Gedaliah the son of
655,he bread of life: he that cometh to me shall never hunger; and he that believeth on me shall never thirst. 
But I said unto you, That ye also have seen me, and believe not. 
All that the Father giveth me shall come to me; and him that cometh to me I will in no wise cast out. 
For I came down from heaven, not to do mine own will, but the will of him that sent me. 
And this is the Father's will which hath sent me, that of all which he hath given me I should lose nothing, but should raise it up again at the last day. 
And this is the will of him that sent me, that every one which seeth the Son, and believeth on him, may have everlasting life: and I w
627, of the holy place into the utter court, but there they shall lay their garments wherein they minister; for they are holy; and shall put on other garments, and shall approach to those things which are for the people. 
Now when he had made an end of measuring the inner house, he brought me forth toward the gate whose prospect is toward the east, and measured it round about. 
He measured the east side with the measuring reed, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about. 
He measured the north side, five hundred reeds, with the measuring reed round about. 
He measured the south side, five hundred reeds, with th
531,laces whither thou goest, and will bring thee again into this land; for I will not leave thee, until I have done that which I have spoken to thee of. 
And Jacob awaked out of his sleep, and he said, Surely the LORD is in this place; and I knew it not. 
And he was afraid, and said, How dreadful is this place! this is none other but the house of God, and this is the gate of heaven. 
And Jacob rose up early in the morning, and took the stone that he had put for his pillows, and set it up for a pillar, and poured oil upon the top
677,alt speak unto all that are wise hearted, whom I have filled with the spirit of wisdom, that they may make Aaron's garments to consecrate him, that he may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And these are the garments which they shall make; a breastplate, and an ephod, and a robe, and a broidered coat, a mitre, and a girdle: and they shall make holy garments for Aaron thy brother, and his sons, that he may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And they shall take gold, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine linen. 
And they shall make the ephod of gold, of blue, and of purple, of scarlet, and fine twined linen, with cunning work. 
It shall have the two s
561,shall testify against them as a witness; for it shall not be forgotten out of the mouths of their seed: for I know their imagination which they go about, even now, before I have brought them into the land which I sware. 
Moses therefore wrote this song the same day, and taught it the children of Israel. 
And he gave Joshua the son of Nun a charge, and said, Be strong and of a good courage: for thou shalt bring the children of Israel into the land which I sware unto them: and I will be with thee. 
And it came to pass, when Moses had made an end of writing 
621,, and, lo, there were three flocks of sheep lying by it; for out of that well they watered the flocks: and a great stone was upon the well's mouth. 
And thither were all the flocks gathered: and they rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the sheep, and put the stone again upon the well's mouth in his place. 
And Jacob said unto them, My brethren, whence be ye? And they said, Of Haran are we. 
And he said unto them, Know ye Laban the son of Nahor? And they said, We know him. 
And he said unto them, Is he well? And they said, He is well: and, behold, Rachel his daughter cometh with the sheep. 
And he s
529,t could not be passed over. 
And he said unto me, Son of man, hast thou seen this? Then he brought me, and caused me to return to the brink of the river. 
Now when I had returned, behold, at the bank of the river were very many trees on the one side and on the other. 
Then said he unto me, These waters issue out toward the east country, and go down into the desert, and go into the sea: which being brought forth into the sea, the waters shall be healed. 
And it shall come to pass, that every thing that liveth, which moveth, 
702,cannot escape to the mountain, lest some evil take me, and I die: 
Behold now, this city is near to flee unto, and it is a little one: Oh, let me escape thither, (is it not a little one?) and my soul shall live. 
And he said unto him, See, I have accepted thee concerning this thing also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou hast spoken. 
Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do anything till thou be come thither. Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar. 
The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot entered into Zoar. 
Then the LORD rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and fire from the LORD out of heaven; 
And he overthrew those cities, and all the plain, and
716,e purer than snow, they were whiter than milk, they were more ruddy in body than rubies, their polishing was of sapphire: 
Their visage is blacker than a coal; they are not known in the streets: their skin cleaveth to their bones; it is withered, it is become like a stick. 
They that be slain with the sword are better than they that be slain with hunger: for these pine away, stricken through for want of the fruits of the field. 
The hands of the pitiful women have sodden their own children: they were their meat in the destruction of the daughter of my people. 
The LORD hath accomplished his fury; he hath poured out his fierce anger, and hath kindled a fire in Zion, and it hath devoured the foundations there
576,ation, but it is far off from us. 
For our transgressions are multiplied before thee, and our sins testify against us: for our transgressions are with us; and as for our iniquities, we know them; 
In transgressing and lying against the LORD, and departing away from our God, speaking oppression and revolt, conceiving and uttering from the heart words of falsehood. 
And judgment is turned away backward, and justice standeth afar off: for truth is fallen in the street, and equity cannot enter. 
Yea, truth faileth; and he that departeth from evil maketh himself a prey: and 
644,d up his voice, and wept at the grave of Abner; and all the people wept. 
And the king lamented over Abner, and said, Died Abner as a fool dieth? 
Thy hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into fetters: as a man falleth before wicked men, so fellest thou. And all the people wept again over him. 
And when all the people came to cause David to eat meat while it was yet day, David sware, saying, So do God to me, and more also, if I taste bread, or ought else, till the sun be down. 
And all the people took notice of it, and it pleased them: as whatsoever the king did pleased all the people. 
For all the people and all Israel understood tha
590,y ways. 
As I live, saith the Lord GOD, Sodom thy sister hath not done, she nor her daughters, as thou hast done, thou and thy daughters. 
Behold, this was the iniquity of thy sister Sodom, pride, fulness of bread, and abundance of idleness was in her and in her daughters, neither did she strengthen the hand of the poor and needy. 
And they were haughty, and committed abomination before me: therefore I took them away as I saw good. 
Neither hath Samaria committed half of thy sins; but thou hast multiplied thine abominations more than they, and hast justified thy sisters in all thine 
517, shall be healed, and it shall be known to you why his hand is not removed from you. 
Then said they, What shall be the trespass offering which we shall return to him? They answered, Five golden emerods, and five golden mice, according to the number of the lords of the Philistines: for one plague was on you all, and on your lords. 
Wherefore ye shall make images of your emerods, and images of your mice that mar the land; and ye shall give glory unto the God of Israel: peradventure he will lighten his hand from o
615,m in my hearing, O wheel. 
And every one had four faces: the first face was the face of a cherub, and the second face was the face of a man, and the third the face of a lion, and the fourth the face of an eagle. 
And the cherubims were lifted up. This is the living creature that I saw by the river of Chebar. 
And when the cherubims went, the wheels went by them: and when the cherubims lifted up their wings to mount up from the earth, the same wheels also turned not from beside them. 
When they stood, these stood; and when they were lifted up, these lifted up themselves also: for the spirit of the living crea
673,ore, and the poor shall not give less than half a shekel, when they give an offering unto the LORD, to make an atonement for your souls. 
And thou shalt take the atonement money of the children of Israel, and shalt appoint it for the service of the tabernacle of the congregation; that it may be a memorial unto the children of Israel before the LORD, to make an atonement for your souls. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Thou shalt also make a laver of brass, and his foot also of brass, to wash withal: and thou shalt put it between the tabernacle of the congregation and the altar, and thou shalt put water therein. 
For Aaron and his sons shall wash their hands
556,moon shall be dark, and the stars shall withdraw their shining: 
And the LORD shall utter his voice before his army: for his camp is very great: for he is strong that executeth his word: for the day of the LORD is great and very terrible; and who can abide it? 
Therefore also now, saith the LORD, turn ye even to me with all your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning: 
And rend your heart, and not your garments, and turn unto the LORD your God: for he is gracious and merciful, slow to anger, and of great kindness, and repenteth 
654, to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses. 
All those that were numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron and the chief of Israel numbered, after their families, and after the house of their fathers, 
From thirty years old and upward even unto fifty years old, every one that came to do the service of the ministry, and the service of the burden in the tabernacle of the congregation. 
Even those that were numbered of them, were eight thousand and five hundred and fourscore, 
According to the commandment of the LORD they were numbered by the hand of Moses, every one according to his service, and according to his burden: thus were they number
550, land of Judah and in the cities thereof, when I shall bring again their captivity; The LORD bless thee, O habitation of justice, and mountain of holiness. 
And there shall dwell in Judah itself, and in all the cities thereof together, husbandmen, and they that go forth with flocks. 
For I have satiated the weary soul, and I have replenished every sorrowful soul. 
Upon this I awaked, and beheld; and my sleep was sweet unto me. 
Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will sow the house of Israel and the house of Judah with the seed of man
695,htness. 
Quicken me, O LORD, for thy name's sake: for thy righteousness' sake bring my soul out of trouble. 
And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them that afflict my soul: for I am thy servant. 
Blessed be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war, and my fingers to fight: 
My goodness, and my fortress; my high tower, and my deliverer; my shield, and he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me. 
LORD, what is man, that thou takest knowledge of him! or the son of man, that thou makest account of him! 
Man is like to vanity: his days are as a shadow that passeth away. 
Bow thy heavens, O LORD, and come down: touch the mountains, and they shall smoke. 

681,ed linen, 
And a girdle of fine twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, of needlework; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
And they made the plate of the holy crown of pure gold, and wrote upon it a writing, like to the engravings of a signet, HOLINESS TO THE LORD. 
And they tied unto it a lace of blue, to fasten it on high upon the mitre; as the LORD commanded Moses. 
Thus was all the work of the tabernacle of the tent of the congregation finished: and the children of Israel did according to all that the LORD commanded Moses, so did they. 
And they brought the tabernacle unto Moses, the tent, and all his furniture, his taches, his boards, his bars, and his pillars, and
664, is not clean. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, which was the second day of the month, that David's place was empty: and Saul said unto Jonathan his son, Wherefore cometh not the son of Jesse to meat, neither yesterday, nor to day? 
And Jonathan answered Saul, David earnestly asked leave of me to go to Bethlehem: 
And he said, Let me go, I pray thee; for our family hath a sacrifice in the city; and my brother, he hath commanded me to be there: and now, if I have found favour in thine eyes, let me get away, I pray thee, and see my brethren. Therefore he cometh not unto the king's table. 
Then Saul's anger was kindled against Jonathan, and he said unto hi
687,shly in lifting up thyself, or if thou hast thought evil, lay thine hand upon thy mouth. 
Surely the churning of milk bringeth forth butter, and the wringing of the nose bringeth forth blood: so the forcing of wrath bringeth forth strife. 
The words of king Lemuel, the prophecy that his mother taught him. 
What, my son? and what, the son of my womb? and what, the son of my vows? 
Give not thy strength unto women, nor thy ways to that which destroyeth kings. 
It is not for kings, O Lemuel, it is not for kings to drink wine; nor for princes strong drink: 
Lest they drink, and forget the law, and pervert the judgment of any of the afflicted. 
Give strong drink unto him that is read
641, song, and his praise from the end of the earth, ye that go down to the sea, and all that is therein; the isles, and the inhabitants thereof. 
Let the wilderness and the cities thereof lift up their voice, the villages that Kedar doth inhabit: let the inhabitants of the rock sing, let them shout from the top of the mountains. 
Let them give glory unto the LORD, and declare his praise in the islands. 
The LORD shall go forth as a mighty man, he shall stir up jealousy like a man of war: he shall cry, yea, roar; he shall prevail against his enemies. 
I have long time holden my peace; I have been still, and refrained myself: now will I c
689,s at the ends, of wreathen work of pure gold. 
And they made two ouches of gold, and two gold rings; and put the two rings in the two ends of the breastplate. 
And they put the two wreathen chains of gold in the two rings on the ends of the breastplate. 
And the two ends of the two wreathen chains they fastened in the two ouches, and put them on the shoulderpieces of the ephod, before it. 
And they made two rings of gold, and put them on the two ends of the breastplate, upon the border of it, which was on the side of the ephod inward. 
And they made two other golden rings, and put them on the two sides of the ephod underneath, toward the forepart of it, over against the other coup
720,ath hath no power, but they shall be priests of God and of Christ, and shall reign with him a thousand years. 
And when the thousand years are expired, Satan shall be loosed out of his prison, 
And shall go out to deceive the nations which are in the four quarters of the earth, Gog, and Magog, to gather them together to battle: the number of whom is as the sand of the sea. 
And they went up on the breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints about, and the beloved city: and fire came down from God out of heaven, and devoured them. 
And the devil that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where the beast and the false prophet are, and shall be tormented day and night for ever 
583,od of Israel hath separated you from the congregation of Israel, to bring you near to himself to do the service of the tabernacle of the LORD, and to stand before the congregation to minister unto them? 
And he hath brought thee near to him, and all thy brethren the sons of Levi with thee: and seek ye the priesthood also? 
For which cause both thou and all thy company are gathered together against the LORD: and what is Aaron, that ye murmur against him? 
And Moses sent to call Dathan and Abiram, the sons of Eliab: which said, We will not come up: 
Is it a small thing that thou
494,, he delivered them into thine hand. 
For the eyes of the LORD run to and fro throughout the whole earth, to shew himself strong in the behalf of them whose heart is perfect toward him. Herein thou hast done foolishly: therefore from henceforth thou shalt have wars. 
Then Asa was wroth with the seer, and put him in a prison house; for he was in a rage with him because of this thing. And Asa oppressed some of the people the same time. 
And, behold, the acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they 
624,ar sin, and die. 
But the Levites shall do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation, and they shall bear their iniquity: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations, that among the children of Israel they have no inheritance. 
But the tithes of the children of Israel, which they offer as an heave offering unto the LORD, I have given to the Levites to inherit: therefore I have said unto them, Among the children of Israel they shall have no inheritance. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Thus speak unto the Levites, and say unto them, When ye take of the children of Israel the tithes which
482,no peace, saith the Lord GOD. 
Likewise, thou son of man, set thy face against the daughters of thy people, which prophesy out of their own heart; and prophesy thou against them, 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe to the women that sew pillows to all armholes, and make kerchiefs upon the head of every stature to hunt souls! Will ye hunt the souls of my people, and will ye save the souls alive that come unto you? 
And will ye pollute me among my people for handfuls of barley
719,d. 
And David the king came and sat before the LORD, and said, Who am I, O LORD God, and what is mine house, that thou hast brought me hitherto? 
And yet this was a small thing in thine eyes, O God; for thou hast also spoken of thy servant's house for a great while to come, and hast regarded me according to the estate of a man of high degree, O LORD God. 
What can David speak more to thee for the honour of thy servant? for thou knowest thy servant. 
O LORD, for thy servant's sake, and according to thine own heart, hast thou done all this greatness, in making known all these great things. 
O LORD, there is none like thee, neither is there any God beside thee, according to all that we have heard with our ears. 

660, unto the chief priests, 
And said unto them, What will ye give me, and I will deliver him unto you? And they covenanted with him for thirty pieces of silver. 
And from that time he sought opportunity to betray him. 
Now the first day of the feast of unleavened bread the disciples came to Jesus, saying unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare for thee to eat the passover? 
And he said, Go into the city to such a man, and say unto him, The Master saith, My time is at hand; I will keep the passover at thy house with my disciples. 
And the disciples did as Jesus had appointed them; and they made ready the passover. 
Now when the even was come, he sat dow
547,out of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear. 
These things did Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had the name among the three mighties. 
Behold, he was honourable among the thirty, but attained not to the first three: and David set him over his guard. 
Also the valiant men of the armies were, Asahel the brother of Joab, Elhanan the son of Dodo of Bethlehem, 
Shammoth the Harorite, Helez the Pelonite, 
Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite, Abiezer the Antothite, 
Sibbecai the Hushathite, Ilai the Ahohite, 
Maharai the Netophathite
651,w, behold, I have brought the firstfruits of the land, which thou, O LORD, hast given me. And thou shalt set it before the LORD thy God, and worship before the LORD thy God: 
And thou shalt rejoice in every good thing which the LORD thy God hath given unto thee, and unto thine house, thou, and the Levite, and the stranger that is among you. 
When thou hast made an end of tithing all the tithes of thine increase the third year, which is the year of tithing, and hast given it unto the Levite, the stranger, the fatherless, and the widow, that they may eat within thy gates, and be filled; 
Then thou shalt say before the LORD thy God, I have brough
691,g of Persia. 
And this house was finished on the third day of the month Adar, which was in the sixth year of the reign of Darius the king. 
And the children of Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the rest of the children of the captivity, kept the dedication of this house of God with joy. 
And offered at the dedication of this house of God an hundred bullocks, two hundred rams, four hundred lambs; and for a sin offering for all Israel, twelve he goats, according to the number of the tribes of Israel. 
And they set the priests in their divisions, and the Levites in their courses, for the service of God, which is at Jerusalem; as it is written in the book of Moses. 
And the chil
515, a few days, for the love he had to her. 
And Jacob said unto Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are fulfilled, that I may go in unto her. 
And Laban gathered together all the men of the place, and made a feast. 
And it came to pass in the evening, that he took Leah his daughter, and brought her to him; and he went in unto her. 
And Laban gave unto his daughter Leah Zilpah his maid for an handmaid. 
And it came to pass, that in the morning, behold, it was Leah: and he said to Laban, What is this thou hast don
665,for repentance: 
And think not to say within yourselves, We have Abraham to our father: for I say unto you, that God is able of these stones to raise up children unto Abraham. 
And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees: therefore every tree which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and cast into the fire. 
I indeed baptize you with water unto repentance. but he that cometh after me is mightier than I, whose shoes I am not worthy to bear: he shall baptize you with the Holy Ghost, and with fire: 
Whose fan is in his hand, and he will throughly purge his floor, and gather his wheat into the garner; but he will burn up the chaff with unque
496,de mouth, and draw out the tongue? are ye not children of transgression, a seed of falsehood. 
Enflaming yourselves with idols under every green tree, slaying the children in the valleys under the clifts of the rocks? 
Among the smooth stones of the stream is thy portion; they, they are thy lot: even to them hast thou poured a drink offering, thou hast offered a meat offering. Should I receive comfort in these? 
Upon a lofty and high mountain hast thou set thy bed: even thither wentest thou 
691,let them go. 
But afterward they turned, and caused the servants and the handmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into subjection for servants and for handmaids. 
Therefore the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 
Thus saith the LORD, the God of Israel; I made a covenant with your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondmen, saying, 
At the end of seven years let ye go every man his brother an Hebrew, which hath been sold unto thee; and when he hath served thee six years, thou shalt let him go free from thee: but your fathers hearkened not unto me, neither inclined their ear. 
And ye
564,e have heard his voice out of the midst of the fire: we have seen this day that God doth talk with man, and he liveth. 
Now therefore why should we die? for this great fire will consume us: if we hear the voice of the LORD our God any more, then we shall die. 
For who is there of all flesh, that hath heard the voice of the living God speaking out of the midst of the fire, as we have, and lived? 
Go thou near, and hear all that the LORD our God shall say: and speak thou unto us all that the LORD our God shall speak unto thee; and we will hear it, and do it. 

685, unto him marvellous things. 
The nations shall see and be confounded at all their might: they shall lay their hand upon their mouth, their ears shall be deaf. 
They shall lick the dust like a serpent, they shall move out of their holes like worms of the earth: they shall be afraid of the LORD our God, and shall fear because of thee. 
Who is a God like unto thee, that pardoneth iniquity, and passeth by the transgression of the remnant of his heritage? he retaineth not his anger for ever, because he delighteth in mercy. 
He will turn again, he will have compassion upon us; he will subdue our iniquities; and thou wilt cast all their sins into the depths of the sea. 
Thou wilt pe
709,he hath given us rest on every side. So they built and prospered. 
And Asa had an army of men that bare targets and spears, out of Judah three hundred thousand; and out of Benjamin, that bare shields and drew bows, two hundred and fourscore thousand: all these were mighty men of valour. 
And there came out against them Zerah the Ethiopian with an host of a thousand thousand, and three hundred chariots; and came unto Mareshah. 
Then Asa went out against him, and they set the battle in array in the valley of Zephathah at Mareshah. 
And Asa cried unto the LORD his God, and said, LORD, it is nothing with thee to help, whether with many, or with them that have no power: help us, O LORD our God; for we res
711,w the mystery of the kingdom of God: but unto them that are without, all these things are done in parables: 
That seeing they may see, and not perceive; and hearing they may hear, and not understand; lest at any time they should be converted, and their sins should be forgiven them. 
And he said unto them, Know ye not this parable? and how then will ye know all parables? 
The sower soweth the word. 
And these are they by the way side, where the word is sown; but when they have heard, Satan cometh immediately, and taketh away the word that was sown in their hearts. 
And these are they likewise which are sown on stony ground; who, when they have heard the word, immediately receive it with gladness; 
And h
634,Then he brought me, and caused me to return to the brink of the river. 
Now when I had returned, behold, at the bank of the river were very many trees on the one side and on the other. 
Then said he unto me, These waters issue out toward the east country, and go down into the desert, and go into the sea: which being brought forth into the sea, the waters shall be healed. 
And it shall come to pass, that every thing that liveth, which moveth, whithersoever the rivers shall come, shall live: and there shall be a very great multitude of fish, because these waters shall come thither: for they shall be healed; and every thing shall
519,Now therefore let us make a covenant with our God to put away all the wives, and such as are born of them, according to the counsel of my lord, and of those that tremble at the commandment of our God; and let it be done according to the law. 
Arise; for this matter belongeth unto thee: we also will be with thee: be of good courage, and do it. 
Then arose Ezra, and made the chief priests, the Levites, and all Israel, to swear that they should do according to this word. And they sware. 
Then Ezra rose up from before
525,unto me, I will surely hear their cry; 
And my wrath shall wax hot, and I will kill you with the sword; and your wives shall be widows, and your children fatherless. 
If thou lend money to any of my people that is poor by thee, thou shalt not be to him as an usurer, neither shalt thou lay upon him usury. 
If thou at all take thy neighbour's raiment to pledge, thou shalt deliver it unto him by that the sun goeth down: 
For that is his covering only, it is his raiment for his skin: wherein shall he sleep? and it shall com
703,es, which is over against Galilee. 
And when he went forth to land, there met him out of the city a certain man, which had devils long time, and ware no clothes, neither abode in any house, but in the tombs. 
When he saw Jesus, he cried out, and fell down before him, and with a loud voice said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son of God most high? I beseech thee, torment me not. 
(For he had commanded the unclean spirit to come out of the man. For oftentimes it had caught him: and he was kept bound with chains and in fetters; and he brake the bands, and was driven of the devil into the wilderness.) 
And Jesus asked him, saying, What is thy name? And he said, Legion: because many devils
706,of his years be many, and his soul be not filled with good, and also that he have no burial; I say, that an untimely birth is better than he. 
For he cometh in with vanity, and departeth in darkness, and his name shall be covered with darkness. 
Moreover he hath not seen the sun, nor known any thing: this hath more rest than the other. 
Yea, though he live a thousand years twice told, yet hath he seen no good: do not all go to one place? 
All the labour of man is for his mouth, and yet the appetite is not filled. 
For what hath the wise more than the fool? what hath the poor, that knoweth to walk before the living? 
Better is the sight of the eyes than the wandering of the desire: this is also van
563,righteous also shall hold on his way, and he that hath clean hands shall be stronger and stronger. 
But as for you all, do ye return, and come now: for I cannot find one wise man among you. 
My days are past, my purposes are broken off, even the thoughts of my heart. 
They change the night into day: the light is short because of darkness. 
If I wait, the grave is mine house: I have made my bed in the darkness. 
I have said to corruption, Thou art my father: to the worm, Thou art my mother, and my sister. 
And where is now my hope? as for my hope, who shall 
539,beat down his foes before his face, and plague them that hate him. 
But my faithfulness and my mercy shall be with him: and in my name shall his horn be exalted. 
I will set his hand also in the sea, and his right hand in the rivers. 
He shall cry unto me, Thou art my father, my God, and the rock of my salvation. 
Also I will make him my firstborn, higher than the kings of the earth. 
My mercy will I keep for him for evermore, and my covenant shall stand fast with him. 
His seed also will I make to endure for ever, and his throne as 
653,it shall bear his iniquity. 
And the flesh that toucheth any unclean thing shall not be eaten; it shall be burnt with fire: and as for the flesh, all that be clean shall eat thereof. 
But the soul that eateth of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace offerings, that pertain unto the LORD, having his uncleanness upon him, even that soul shall be cut off from his people. 
Moreover the soul that shall touch any unclean thing, as the uncleanness of man, or any unclean beast, or any abominable unclean thing, and eat of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which pertain unto the LORD, even that soul shall be cut off from his people. 
And the LO
689,hi were, Zoheth, and Benzoheth. 
The sons of Shelah the son of Judah were, Er the father of Lecah, and Laadah the father of Mareshah, and the families of the house of them that wrought fine linen, of the house of Ashbea, 
And Jokim, and the men of Chozeba, and Joash, and Saraph, who had the dominion in Moab, and Jashubilehem. And these are ancient things. 
These were the potters, and those that dwelt among plants and hedges: there they dwelt with the king for his work. 
The sons of Simeon were, Nemuel, and Jamin, Jarib, Zerah, and Shaul: 
Shallum his son, Mibsam his son, Mishma his son. 
And the sons of Mishma; Hamuel his son, Zacchur his son, Shimei his son. 
And Shimei had sixte
666,me forth and serve them. 
And if he shall come in the second watch, or come in the third watch, and find them so, blessed are those servants. 
And this know, that if the goodman of the house had known what hour the thief would come, he would have watched, and not have suffered his house to be broken through. 
Be ye therefore ready also: for the Son of man cometh at an hour when ye think not. 
Then Peter said unto him, Lord, speakest thou this parable unto us, or even to all? 
And the Lord said, Who then is that faithful and wise steward, whom his lord shall make ruler over his household, to give them their portion of meat in due season? 
Blessed is that serv
493, all ye people; give ear, all ye inhabitants of the world: 
Both low and high, rich and poor, together. 
My mouth shall speak of wisdom; and the meditation of my heart shall be of understanding. 
I will incline mine ear to a parable: I will open my dark saying upon the harp. 
Wherefore should I fear in the days of evil, when the iniquity of my heels shall compass me about? 
They that trust in their wealth, and boast themselves in the multitude of their riches; 
None of them can by any mea
513,ilt bring me to death, and to the house appointed for all living. 
Howbeit he will not stretch out his hand to the grave, though they cry in his destruction. 
Did not I weep for him that was in trouble? was not my soul grieved for the poor? 
When I looked for good, then evil came unto me: and when I waited for light, there came darkness. 
My bowels boiled, and rested not: the days of affliction prevented me. 
I went mourning without the sun: I stood up, and I cried in the congregation. 
I am a brother to dra
673,r armies under the hand of Moses and Aaron. 
And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by the commandment of the LORD: and these are their journeys according to their goings out. 
And they departed from Rameses in the first month, on the fifteenth day of the first month; on the morrow after the passover the children of Israel went out with an high hand in the sight of all the Egyptians. 
For the Egyptians buried all their firstborn, which the LORD had smitten among them: upon their gods also the LORD executed judgments. 
And the children of Israel removed from Rameses, and pitched in Succoth. 
And they departed from Succoth, and pitched in Etham,
645,ly. 
The right hand of the LORD is exalted: the right hand of the LORD doeth valiantly. 
I shall not die, but live, and declare the works of the LORD. 
The LORD hath chastened me sore: but he hath not given me over unto death. 
Open to me the gates of righteousness: I will go into them, and I will praise the LORD: 
This gate of the LORD, into which the righteous shall enter. 
I will praise thee: for thou hast heard me, and art become my salvation. 
The stone which the builders refused is become the head stone of the corner. 
This is the LORD's doing; it is marvellous in our eyes. 
This is the day which the LORD hath made; we will rejoice
530,of your wives, of your sons, and of your daughters, and bring them unto me. 
And all the people brake off the golden earrings which were in their ears, and brought them unto Aaron. 
And he received them at their hand, and fashioned it with a graving tool, after he had made it a molten calf: and they said, These be thy gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt. 
And when Aaron saw it, he built an altar before it; and Aaron made proclamation, and said, To morrow is a feast to the LORD. 
And they rose up ea
649,y have done in Zion in your sight, saith the LORD. 
Behold, I am against thee, O destroying mountain, saith the LORD, which destroyest all the earth: and I will stretch out mine hand upon thee, and roll thee down from the rocks, and will make thee a burnt mountain. 
And they shall not take of thee a stone for a corner, nor a stone for foundations; but thou shalt be desolate for ever, saith the LORD. 
Set ye up a standard in the land, blow the trumpet among the nations, prepare the nations against her, call together against her the kingdoms of Ararat, Minni, and Ashchenaz; appoint a captain against her; cause the horses to come up as the roug
641,, that he may be gracious unto you, and therefore will he be exalted, that he may have mercy upon you: for the LORD is a God of judgment: blessed are all they that wait for him. 
For the people shall dwell in Zion at Jerusalem: thou shalt weep no more: he will be very gracious unto thee at the voice of thy cry; when he shall hear it, he will answer thee. 
And though the Lord give you the bread of adversity, and the water of affliction, yet shall not thy teachers be removed into a corner any more, but thine eyes shall see thy teachers: 
And thine ears shall hear a word behind thee, saying, This is the way, walk ye in it, when ye turn 
584,nd that he turn not aside from the commandment, to the right hand, or to the left: to the end that he may prolong his days in his kingdom, he, and his children, in the midst of Israel. 
The priests the Levites, and all the tribe of Levi, shall have no part nor inheritance with Israel: they shall eat the offerings of the LORD made by fire, and his inheritance. 
Therefore shall they have no inheritance among their brethren: the LORD is their inheritance, as he hath said unto them. 
And this shall be the priest's due from the people, from them that offer a sacrifice, whether it be
711,d judgment is more acceptable to the LORD than sacrifice. 
An high look, and a proud heart, and the plowing of the wicked, is sin. 
The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; but of every one that is hasty only to want. 
The getting of treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed to and fro of them that seek death. 
The robbery of the wicked shall destroy them; because they refuse to do judgment. 
The way of man is froward and strange: but as for the pure, his work is right. 
It is better to dwell in a corner of the housetop, than with a brawling woman in a wide house. 
The soul of the wicked desireth evil: his neighbour findeth no favour in his eyes. 
When the scorner is punished, the 
528,the way of righteousness, in the midst of the paths of judgment: 
That I may cause those that love me to inherit substance; and I will fill their treasures. 
The LORD possessed me in the beginning of his way, before his works of old. 
I was set up from everlasting, from the beginning, or ever the earth was. 
When there were no depths, I was brought forth; when there were no fountains abounding with water. 
Before the mountains were settled, before the hills was I brought forth: 
While as yet he had not made the earth, nor 
489,pets and sound of cornet make a joyful noise before the LORD, the King. 
Let the sea roar, and the fulness thereof; the world, and they that dwell therein. 
Let the floods clap their hands: let the hills be joyful together 
Before the LORD; for he cometh to judge the earth: with righteousness shall he judge the world, and the people with equity. 
The LORD reigneth; let the people tremble: he sitteth between the cherubims; let the earth be moved. 
The LORD is great in Zion; and he is h
483,Harim, Adna; of Meraioth, Helkai; 
Of Iddo, Zechariah; of Ginnethon, Meshullam; 
Of Abijah, Zichri; of Miniamin, of Moadiah, Piltai: 
Of Bilgah, Shammua; of Shemaiah, Jehonathan; 
And of Joiarib, Mattenai; of Jedaiah, Uzzi; 
Of Sallai, Kallai; of Amok, Eber; 
Of Hilkiah, Hashabiah; of Jedaiah, Nethaneel. 
The Levites in the days of Eliashib, Joiada, and Johanan, and Jaddua, were recorded chief of the fathers: also the priests, to the reign of Darius the Persian. 
The sons of Lev
649, 
And they possessed his land, and the land of Og king of Bashan, two kings of the Amorites, which were on this side Jordan toward the sunrising; 
From Aroer, which is by the bank of the river Arnon, even unto mount Sion, which is Hermon, 
And all the plain on this side Jordan eastward, even unto the sea of the plain, under the springs of Pisgah. 
And Moses called all Israel, and said unto them, Hear, O Israel, the statutes and judgments which I speak in your ears this day, that ye may learn them, and keep, and do them. 
The LORD our God made a covenant with us in Horeb. 
The LORD made not this covenant with our fathers, but with us, even us
628,w when they saw the boldness of Peter and John, and perceived that they were unlearned and ignorant men, they marvelled; and they took knowledge of them, that they had been with Jesus. 
And beholding the man which was healed standing with them, they could say nothing against it. 
But when they had commanded them to go aside out of the council, they conferred among themselves, 
Saying, What shall we do to these men? for that indeed a notable miracle hath been done by them is manifest to all them that dwell in Jerusalem; and we cannot deny it. 
But that it spread no further among the people, let us straitly threaten them, 
518,children. 
As they were increased, so they sinned against me: therefore will I change their glory into shame. 
They eat up the sin of my people, and they set their heart on their iniquity. 
And there shall be, like people, like priest: and I will punish them for their ways, and reward them their doings. 
For they shall eat, and not have enough: they shall commit whoredom, and shall not increase: because they have left off to take heed to the LORD. 
Whoredom and wine and new wine take away the heart. 
My people as
714,s delivered into the hands of men, and they shall kill him; and after that he is killed, he shall rise the third day. 
But they understood not that saying, and were afraid to ask him. 
And he came to Capernaum: and being in the house he asked them, What was it that ye disputed among yourselves by the way? 
But they held their peace: for by the way they had disputed among themselves, who should be the greatest. 
And he sat down, and called the twelve, and saith unto them, If any man desire to be first, the same shall be last of all, and servant of all. 
And he took a child, and set him in the midst of them: and when he had taken him in his arms, he said unto them, 
Whosoever shall receive one of such child
716,ll stand, and her bonds wherewith she bound her soul shall stand. 
But if her husband disallowed her on the day that he heard it; then he shall make her vow which she vowed, and that which she uttered with her lips, wherewith she bound her soul, of none effect: and the LORD shall forgive her. 
But every vow of a widow, and of her that is divorced, wherewith they have bound their souls, shall stand against her. 
And if she vowed in her husband's house, or bound her soul by a bond with an oath; 
And her husband heard it, and held his peace at her, and disallowed her not: then all her vows shall stand, and every bond wherewith she bound her soul shall stand. 
But if her husband hath utterly made them void on t
500,ay, and there be a great forsaking in the midst of the land. 
But yet in it shall be a tenth, and it shall return, and shall be eaten: as a teil tree, and as an oak, whose substance is in them, when they cast their leaves: so the holy seed shall be the substance thereof. 
And it came to pass in the days of Ahaz the son of Jotham, the son of Uzziah, king of Judah, that Rezin the king of Syria, and Pekah the son of Remaliah, king of Israel, went up toward Jerusalem to war against it, but could not
602,st down the pieces of silver in the temple, and departed, and went and hanged himself. 
And the chief priests took the silver pieces, and said, It is not lawful for to put them into the treasury, because it is the price of blood. 
And they took counsel, and bought with them the potter's field, to bury strangers in. 
Wherefore that field was called, The field of blood, unto this day. 
Then was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet, saying, And they took the thirty pieces of silver, the price of him that was valued, whom they of the children of Israel did value; 
And gave them for 
481,ry of thy great goodness, and shall sing of thy righteousness. 
The LORD is gracious, and full of compassion; slow to anger, and of great mercy. 
The LORD is good to all: and his tender mercies are over all his works. 
All thy works shall praise thee, O LORD; and thy saints shall bless thee. 
They shall speak of the glory of thy kingdom, and talk of thy power; 
To make known to the sons of men his mighty acts, and the glorious majesty of his kingdom. 
Thy kingdom is an everlas
564,r: for the galleries were higher than these, than the lower, and than the middlemost of the building. 
For they were in three stories, but had not pillars as the pillars of the courts: therefore the building was straitened more than the lowest and the middlemost from the ground. 
And the wall that was without over against the chambers, toward the utter court on the forepart of the chambers, the length thereof was fifty cubits. 
For the length of the chambers that were in the utter court was fifty cubits: and, lo, before the temple were an hundred cubits. 
An
601,d the son of Bedad, which smote Midian in the field of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Avith. 
And when Hadad was dead, Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead. 
And when Samlah was dead, Shaul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in his stead. 
And when Shaul was dead, Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his stead. 
And when Baalhanan was dead, Hadad reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was Pai; and his wife's name was Mehetabel, the daughter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab. 
Hadad died also. And the dukes of Edom were; duke Timnah, duke Aliah, duke Jetheth
602,. 
To whom then will ye liken me, or shall I be equal? saith the Holy One. 
Lift up your eyes on high, and behold who hath created these things, that bringeth out their host by number: he calleth them all by names by the greatness of his might, for that he is strong in power; not one faileth. 
Why sayest thou, O Jacob, and speakest, O Israel, My way is hid from the LORD, and my judgment is passed over from my God? 
Hast thou not known? hast thou not heard, that the everlasting God, the LORD, the Creator of the ends of the earth, fainteth not, neither is weary? there is no searching of his unders
676,oodness toward the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed on them according to his mercies, and according to the multitude of his lovingkindnesses. 
For he said, Surely they are my people, children that will not lie: so he was their Saviour. 
In all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his presence saved them: in his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and he bare them, and carried them all the days of old. 
But they rebelled, and vexed his holy Spirit: therefore he was turned to be their enemy, and he fought against them. 
Then he remembered the days of old, Moses, and his people, saying, Where is he that brought them up out of the sea with the she
664,book of the law. 
There was not a word of all that Moses commanded, which Joshua read not before all the congregation of Israel, with the women, and the little ones, and the strangers that were conversant among them. 
And it came to pass, when all the kings which were on this side Jordan, in the hills, and in the valleys, and in all the coasts of the great sea over against Lebanon, the Hittite, and the Amorite, the Canaanite, the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite, heard thereof; 
That they gathered themselves together, to fight with Joshua and with Israel, with one accord. 
And when the inhabitants of Gibeon heard what Joshua had done unto Jericho an
553,he devil. And in those days he did eat nothing: and when they were ended, he afterward hungered. 
And the devil said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, command this stone that it be made bread. 
And Jesus answered him, saying, It is written, That man shall not live by bread alone, but by every word of God. 
And the devil, taking him up into an high mountain, shewed unto him all the kingdoms of the world in a moment of time. 
And the devil said unto him, All this power will I give thee, and the glory of them: for that is delivered unto me; and to
487,ve a binding of woven work round about the hole of it, as it were the hole of an habergeon, that it be not rent. 
And beneath upon the hem of it thou shalt make pomegranates of blue, and of purple, and of scarlet, round about the hem thereof; and bells of gold between them round about: 
A golden bell and a pomegranate, a golden bell and a pomegranate, upon the hem of the robe round about. 
And it shall be upon Aaron to minister: and his sound shall be heard when he goeth in unto the
614, all the chief of the priests, and the people, transgressed very much after all the abominations of the heathen; and polluted the house of the LORD which he had hallowed in Jerusalem. 
And the LORD God of their fathers sent to them by his messengers, rising up betimes, and sending; because he had compassion on his people, and on his dwelling place: 
But they mocked the messengers of God, and despised his words, and misused his prophets, until the wrath of the LORD arose against his people, till there was no remedy. 
Therefore he brought upon them the king of the Chaldees, who slew their young men with the s
605,they, doth hear? 
But thou, O LORD, shalt laugh at them; thou shalt have all the heathen in derision. 
Because of his strength will I wait upon thee: for God is my defence. 
The God of my mercy shall prevent me: God shall let me see my desire upon mine enemies. 
Slay them not, lest my people forget: scatter them by thy power; and bring them down, O Lord our shield. 
For the sin of their mouth and the words of their lips let them even be taken in their pride: and for cursing and lying which they speak. 
Consume them in wrath, consume them, that they may not be: and let them know that God ruleth in J
553,ed them. 
And in Shushan the palace the Jews slew and destroyed five hundred men. 
And Parshandatha, and Dalphon, and Aspatha, 
And Poratha, and Adalia, and Aridatha, 
And Parmashta, and Arisai, and Aridai, and Vajezatha, 
The ten sons of Haman the son of Hammedatha, the enemy of the Jews, slew they; but on the spoil laid they not their hand. 
On that day the number of those that were slain in Shushan the palace was brought before the king. 
And the king said unto Esther the queen, The Jews have slain and destroyed five hundred men in Shushan the 
487,d to let them go. 
Their Redeemer is strong; the LORD of hosts is his name: he shall throughly plead their cause, that he may give rest to the land, and disquiet the inhabitants of Babylon. 
A sword is upon the Chaldeans, saith the LORD, and upon the inhabitants of Babylon, and upon her princes, and upon her wise men. 
A sword is upon the liars; and they shall dote: a sword is upon her mighty men; and they shall be dismayed. 
A sword is upon their horses, and upon their chariots, an
566,hou shalt say unto them, Whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers which sojourn among you, that offereth a burnt offering or sacrifice, 
And bringeth it not unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer it unto the LORD; even that man shall be cut off from among his people. 
And whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers that sojourn among you, that eateth any manner of blood; I will even set my face against that soul that eateth blood, and will cut him off from among his people. 
For the life
558,marry to whom they think best; only to the family of the tribe of their father shall they marry. 
So shall not the inheritance of the children of Israel remove from tribe to tribe: for every one of the children of Israel shall keep himself to the inheritance of the tribe of his fathers. 
And every daughter, that possesseth an inheritance in any tribe of the children of Israel, shall be wife unto one of the family of the tribe of her father, that the children of Israel may enjoy every man the inheritance of his fathers. 
Neither shall the inheritance re
543,. 
Now therefore be content, look upon me; for it is evident unto you if I lie. 
Return, I pray you, let it not be iniquity; yea, return again, my righteousness is in it. 
Is there iniquity in my tongue? cannot my taste discern perverse things? 
Is there not an appointed time to man upon earth? are not his days also like the days of an hireling? 
As a servant earnestly desireth the shadow, and as an hireling looketh for the reward of his work: 
So am I made to possess months of vanity, and wearisome nights are appointed to me. 
When I li
515,ording to this word. And they sware. 
Then Ezra rose up from before the house of God, and went into the chamber of Johanan the son of Eliashib: and when he came thither, he did eat no bread, nor drink water: for he mourned because of the transgression of them that had been carried away. 
And they made proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem unto all the children of the captivity, that they should gather themselves together unto Jerusalem; 
And that whosoever would not come within three days, according to t
484,hat is by the river, even unto Gilead, there was not one city too strong for us: the LORD our God delivered all unto us: 
Only unto the land of the children of Ammon thou camest not, nor unto any place of the river Jabbok, nor unto the cities in the mountains, nor unto whatsoever the LORD our God forbad us. 
Then we turned, and went up the way to Bashan: and Og the king of Bashan came out against us, he and all his people, to battle at Edrei. 
And the LORD said unto me, Fear him 
699,, I come: in the volume of the book it is written of me, 
I delight to do thy will, O my God: yea, thy law is within my heart. 
I have preached righteousness in the great congregation: lo, I have not refrained my lips, O LORD, thou knowest. 
I have not hid thy righteousness within my heart; I have declared thy faithfulness and thy salvation: I have not concealed thy lovingkindness and thy truth from the great congregation. 
Withhold not thou thy tender mercies from me, O LORD: let thy lovingkindness and thy truth continually preserve me. 
For innumerable evils have compassed me about: mine iniquities have taken hold upon me, so that I am not able to look up; they are more than the hairs of 
717,children of Judah, because they have shed innocent blood in their land. 
But Judah shall dwell for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to generation. 
For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the LORD dwelleth in Zion. 
The words of Amos, who was among the herdmen of Tekoa, which he saw concerning Israel in the days of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the days of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the earthquake. 
And he said, The LORD will roar from Zion, and utter his voice from Jerusalem; and the habitations of the shepherds shall mourn, and the top of Carmel shall wither. 
Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Damascus, and for four, I will not turn away
702,ss of the land, then I said, O Lord GOD, forgive, I beseech thee: by whom shall Jacob arise? for he is small. 
The LORD repented for this: It shall not be, saith the LORD. 
Thus hath the Lord GOD shewed unto me: and, behold, the Lord GOD called to contend by fire, and it devoured the great deep, and did eat up a part. 
Then said I, O Lord GOD, cease, I beseech thee: by whom shall Jacob arise? for he is small. 
The LORD repented for this: This also shall not be, saith the Lord GOD. 
Thus he shewed me: and, behold, the LORD stood upon a wall made by a plumbline, with a plumbline in his hand. 
And the LORD said unto me, Amos, what seest thou? And I said, A plumbline. Then said the LORD, Behold, I
678,on, Seest thou this woman? I entered into thine house, thou gavest me no water for my feet: but she hath washed my feet with tears, and wiped them with the hairs of her head. 
Thou gavest me no kiss: but this woman since the time I came in hath not ceased to kiss my feet. 
My head with oil thou didst not anoint: but this woman hath anointed my feet with ointment. 
Wherefore I say unto thee, Her sins, which are many, are forgiven; for she loved much: but to whom little is forgiven, the same loveth little. 
And he said unto her, Thy sins are forgiven. 
And they that sat at meat with him began to say within themselves, Who is this that forgiveth sins also? 
And he said to 
676,here is nothing covered, that shall not be revealed; and hid, that shall not be known. 
What I tell you in darkness, that speak ye in light: and what ye hear in the ear, that preach ye upon the housetops. 
And fear not them which kill the body, but are not able to kill the soul: but rather fear him which is able to destroy both soul and body in hell. 
Are not two sparrows sold for a farthing? and one of them shall not fall on the ground without your Father. 
But the very hairs of your head are all numbered. 
Fear ye not therefore, ye are of more value than many sparrows. 
Whosoever therefore shall confess me before men, him will I confess also before my Father which i
711,And Jeroboam's wife arose, and departed, and came to Tirzah: and when she came to the threshold of the door, the child died; 
And they buried him; and all Israel mourned for him, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake by the hand of his servant Ahijah the prophet. 
And the rest of the acts of Jeroboam, how he warred, and how he reigned, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel. 
And the days which Jeroboam reigned were two and twenty years: and he slept with his fathers, and Nadab his son reigned in his stead. 
And Rehoboam the son of Solomon reigned in Judah. Rehoboam was forty and one years old when he began to reign, and he reigned seventeen years in J
701,bitter, that thou hast forsaken the LORD thy God, and that my fear is not in thee, saith the Lord GOD of hosts. 
For of old time I have broken thy yoke, and burst thy bands; and thou saidst, I will not transgress; when upon every high hill and under every green tree thou wanderest, playing the harlot. 
Yet I had planted thee a noble vine, wholly a right seed: how then art thou turned into the degenerate plant of a strange vine unto me? 
For though thou wash thee with nitre, and take thee much soap, yet thine iniquity is marked before me, saith the Lord GOD. 
How canst thou say, I am not polluted, I have not gone after Baalim? see thy way in the valley, know what thou hast done: thou art a swi
492,n earth shall be loosed in heaven. 
Then charged he his disciples that they should tell no man that he was Jesus the Christ. 
From that time forth began Jesus to shew unto his disciples, how that he must go unto Jerusalem, and suffer many things of the elders and chief priests and scribes, and be killed, and be raised again the third day. 
Then Peter took him, and began to rebuke him, saying, Be it far from thee, Lord: this shall not be unto thee. 
But he turned, and said unto Peter, Get
631,ains. 
And of the children of Benjamin, the kindred of Saul, three thousand: for hitherto the greatest part of them had kept the ward of the house of Saul. 
And of the children of Ephraim twenty thousand and eight hundred, mighty men of valour, famous throughout the house of their fathers. 
And of the half tribe of Manasseh eighteen thousand, which were expressed by name, to come and make David king. 
And of the children of Issachar, which were men that had understanding of the times, to know what Israel ought to do; the heads of them were two hundred; and all their brethren were at their commandment. 
Of Zebulun, such as w
493,nto her, What aileth thee? And she answered, I am indeed a widow woman, and mine husband is dead. 
And thy handmaid had two sons, and they two strove together in the field, and there was none to part them, but the one smote the other, and slew him. 
And, behold, the whole family is risen against thine handmaid, and they said, Deliver him that smote his brother, that we may kill him, for the life of his brother whom he slew; and we will destroy the heir also: and so they shall quench my co
617,ns: but the rebellious dwell in a dry land. 
O God, when thou wentest forth before thy people, when thou didst march through the wilderness; Selah: 
The earth shook, the heavens also dropped at the presence of God: even Sinai itself was moved at the presence of God, the God of Israel. 
Thou, O God, didst send a plentiful rain, whereby thou didst confirm thine inheritance, when it was weary. 
Thy congregation hath dwelt therein: thou, O God, hast prepared of thy goodness for the poor. 
The Lord gave the word: great was the company of those that published it. 
Kings of armies did flee apace: and she that tarried
513,in mine hand, for now would I kill thee. 
And the ass said unto Balaam, Am not I thine ass, upon which thou hast ridden ever since I was thine unto this day? was I ever wont to do so unto thee? and he said, Nay. 
Then the LORD opened the eyes of Balaam, and he saw the angel of the LORD standing in the way, and his sword drawn in his hand: and he bowed down his head, and fell flat on his face. 
And the angel of the LORD said unto him, Wherefore hast thou smitten thine ass these three times? behold, I went out
671, their fruits ye shall know them. 
Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into the kingdom of heaven; but he that doeth the will of my Father which is in heaven. 
Many will say to me in that day, Lord, Lord, have we not prophesied in thy name? and in thy name have cast out devils? and in thy name done many wonderful works? 
And then will I profess unto them, I never knew you: depart from me, ye that work iniquity. 
Therefore whosoever heareth these sayings of mine, and doeth them, I will liken him unto a wise man, which built his house upon a rock: 
And the rain descended, and the floods came, and the winds blew, and beat upon that house; and i
527, grace in your hearts to the Lord. 
And whatsoever ye do in word or deed, do all in the name of the Lord Jesus, giving thanks to God and the Father by him. 
Wives, submit yourselves unto your own husbands, as it is fit in the Lord. 
Husbands, love your wives, and be not bitter against them. 
Children, obey your parents in all things: for this is well pleasing unto the Lord. 
Fathers, provoke not your children to anger, lest they be discouraged. 
Servants, obey in all things your masters according to the flesh; not with ey
625, that he died, he died unto sin once: but in that he liveth, he liveth unto God. 
Likewise reckon ye also yourselves to be dead indeed unto sin, but alive unto God through Jesus Christ our Lord. 
Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, that ye should obey it in the lusts thereof. 
Neither yield ye your members as instruments of unrighteousness unto sin: but yield yourselves unto God, as those that are alive from the dead, and your members as instruments of righteousness unto God. 
For sin shall not have dominion over you: for ye are not under the law, but under grace. 
What then? shall we sin, because we are 
698, of the evil of your doings, and because of the abominations which ye have committed; therefore is your land a desolation, and an astonishment, and a curse, without an inhabitant, as at this day. 
Because ye have burned incense, and because ye have sinned against the LORD, and have not obeyed the voice of the LORD, nor walked in his law, nor in his statutes, nor in his testimonies; therefore this evil is happened unto you, as at this day. 
Moreover Jeremiah said unto all the people, and to all the women, Hear the word of the LORD, all Judah that are in the land of Egypt: 
Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying; Ye and your wives have both spoken with your mouths, and fulfi
513,he people, even as there shall be false teachers among you, who privily shall bring in damnable heresies, even denying the Lord that bought them, and bring upon themselves swift destruction. 
And many shall follow their pernicious ways; by reason of whom the way of truth shall be evil spoken of. 
And through covetousness shall they with feigned words make merchandise of you: whose judgment now of a long time lingereth not, and their damnation slumbereth not. 
For if God spared not the angels that sinned, but
688, 
Then the priest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the head or beard. 
And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold, it be not in sight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and there be in it no yellow hair, and the scall be not in sight deeper than the skin; 
He shall be shaven, but the scall shall h
517, father blessed him: and Esau said in his heart, The days of mourning for my father are at hand; then will I slay my brother Jacob. 
And these words of Esau her elder son were told to Rebekah: and she sent and called Jacob her younger son, and said unto him, Behold, thy brother Esau, as touching thee, doth comfort himself, purposing to kill thee. 
Now therefore, my son, obey my voice; arise, flee thou to Laban my brother to Haran; 
And tarry with him a few days, until thy brother's fury turn away; 
Until thy bro
646,n Bethel; and his sons came and told him all the works that the man of God had done that day in Bethel: the words which he had spoken unto the king, them they told also to their father. 
And their father said unto them, What way went he? For his sons had seen what way the man of God went, which came from Judah. 
And he said unto his sons, Saddle me the ass. So they saddled him the ass: and he rode thereon, 
And went after the man of God, and found him sitting under an oak: and he said unto him, Art thou the man of God that camest from Judah? And he said, I am. 
Then he said unto him, Come home with me, and eat bread. 
And he said, I may n
662,od for Israel is, that they might be saved. 
For I bear them record that they have a zeal of God, but not according to knowledge. 
For they being ignorant of God's righteousness, and going about to establish their own righteousness, have not submitted themselves unto the righteousness of God. 
For Christ is the end of the law for righteousness to every one that believeth. 
For Moses describeth the righteousness which is of the law, That the man which doeth those things shall live by them. 
But the righteousness which is of faith speaketh on this wise, Say not in thine heart, Who shall ascend into heaven? (that is, to bring Christ down from above:) 
Or, W
662,r quarters of the earth, Gog, and Magog, to gather them together to battle: the number of whom is as the sand of the sea. 
And they went up on the breadth of the earth, and compassed the camp of the saints about, and the beloved city: and fire came down from God out of heaven, and devoured them. 
And the devil that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire and brimstone, where the beast and the false prophet are, and shall be tormented day and night for ever and ever. 
And I saw a great white throne, and him that sat on it, from whose face the earth and the heaven fled away; and there was found no place for them. 
And I saw the dead, small and great, 
505,he Levites; they shall go in, for they are holy: but all the people shall keep the watch of the LORD. 
And the Levites shall compass the king round about, every man with his weapons in his hand; and whosoever else cometh into the house, he shall be put to death: but be ye with the king when he cometh in, and when he goeth out. 
So the Levites and all Judah did according to all things that Jehoiada the priest had commanded, and took every man his men that were to come in on the sabbath, with them that
604,of the house, the old man, saying, Bring forth the man that came into thine house, that we may know him. 
And the man, the master of the house, went out unto them, and said unto them, Nay, my brethren, nay, I pray you, do not so wickedly; seeing that this man is come into mine house, do not this folly. 
Behold, here is my daughter a maiden, and his concubine; them I will bring out now, and humble ye them, and do with them what seemeth good unto you: but unto this man do not so vile a thing. 
But the men would not hearken to him: so the man took his concubine, and brought her forth unto them; and t
503,been a staff of reed to the house of Israel. 
When they took hold of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and rend all their shoulder: and when they leaned upon thee, thou brakest, and madest all their loins to be at a stand. 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword upon thee, and cut off man and beast out of thee. 
And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and waste; and they shall know that I am the LORD: because he hath said, The river is mine, and I have made it. 
Behold, t
558,e priest shall see the plague: and, behold, if it be in sight deeper than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair; then the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a leprosy upon the head or beard. 
And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold, it be not in sight deeper than the skin, and that there is no black hair in it; then the priest shall shut up him that hath the plague of the scall seven days: 
And in the seventh day the priest shall look on the plague: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and ther
702,er in mine hand, yet would I not put forth mine hand against the king's son: for in our hearing the king charged thee and Abishai and Ittai, saying, Beware that none touch the young man Absalom. 
Otherwise I should have wrought falsehood against mine own life: for there is no matter hid from the king, and thou thyself wouldest have set thyself against me. 
Then said Joab, I may not tarry thus with thee. And he took three darts in his hand, and thrust them through the heart of Absalom, while he was yet alive in the midst of the oak. 
And ten young men that bare Joab's armour compassed about and smote Absalom, and slew him. 
And Joab blew the trumpet, and the people returned from pursuing after 
488,shall divide the land unto you: Eleazar the priest, and Joshua the son of Nun. 
And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land by inheritance. 
And the names of the men are these: Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb the son of Jephunneh. 
And of the tribe of the children of Simeon, Shemuel the son of Ammihud. 
Of the tribe of Benjamin, Elidad the son of Chislon. 
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Dan, Bukki the son of Jogli. 
The prince of the children of Josep
672,iting the words of this law in a book, until they were finished, 
That Moses commanded the Levites, which bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, saying, 
Take this book of the law, and put it in the side of the ark of the covenant of the LORD your God, that it may be there for a witness against thee. 
For I know thy rebellion, and thy stiff neck: behold, while I am yet alive with you this day, ye have been rebellious against the LORD; and how much more after my death? 
Gather unto me all the elders of your tribes, and your officers, that I may speak these words in their ears, and call heaven and earth to record against them. 
For I know that after my death ye w
509,have surnamed thee, though thou hast not known me. 
I am the LORD, and there is none else, there is no God beside me: I girded thee, though thou hast not known me: 
That they may know from the rising of the sun, and from the west, that there is none beside me. I am the LORD, and there is none else. 
I form the light, and create darkness: I make peace, and create evil: I the LORD do all these things. 
Drop down, ye heavens, from above, and let the skies pour down righteousness: let the earth open, and let
685, I will lead him also, and restore comforts unto him and to his mourners. 
I create the fruit of the lips; Peace, peace to him that is far off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him. 
But the wicked are like the troubled sea, when it cannot rest, whose waters cast up mire and dirt. 
There is no peace, saith my God, to the wicked. 
Cry aloud, spare not, lift up thy voice like a trumpet, and shew my people their transgression, and the house of Jacob their sins. 
Yet they seek me daily, and delight to know my ways, as a nation that did righteousness, and forsook not the ordinance of their God: they ask of me the ordinances of justice; they take delight in a
684,ese things ye shall do unto the LORD in your set feasts, beside your vows, and your freewill offerings, for your burnt offerings, and for your meat offerings, and for your drink offerings, and for your peace offerings. 
And Moses told the children of Israel according to all that the LORD commanded Moses. 
And Moses spake unto the heads of the tribes concerning the children of Israel, saying, This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded. 
If a man vow a vow unto the LORD, or swear an oath to bind his soul with a bond; he shall not break his word, he shall do according to all that proceedeth out of his mouth. 
If a woman also vow a vow unto the LORD, and bind herself by a bo
685,is falsehood, and there is no breath in them. 
They are vanity, and the work of errors: in the time of their visitation they shall perish. 
The portion of Jacob is not like them: for he is the former of all things; and Israel is the rod of his inheritance: The LORD of hosts is his name. 
Gather up thy wares out of the land, O inhabitant of the fortress. 
For thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will sling out the inhabitants of the land at this once, and will distress them, that they may find it so. 
Woe is me for my hurt! my wound is grievous; but I said, Truly this is a grief, and I must bear it. 
My tabernacle is spoiled, and all my cords are broken: my children are gone forth of
605,of words; which voice they that heard intreated that the word should not be spoken to them any more: 
(For they could not endure that which was commanded, And if so much as a beast touch the mountain, it shall be stoned, or thrust through with a dart: 
And so terrible was the sight, that Moses said, I exceedingly fear and quake:) 
But ye are come unto mount Sion, and unto the city of the living God, the heavenly Jerusalem, and to an innumerable company of angels, 
To the general assembly and church of the firstborn, which are written in heaven, and to God the Judge of all, and to the spirits of jus
562,itance with thee. 
At the end of three years thou shalt bring forth all the tithe of thine increase the same year, and shalt lay it up within thy gates: 
And the Levite, (because he hath no part nor inheritance with thee,) and the stranger, and the fatherless, and the widow, which are within thy gates, shall come, and shall eat and be satisfied; that the LORD thy God may bless thee in all the work of thine hand which thou doest. 
At the end of every seven years thou shalt make a release. 
And this is the manner of the release: Every creditor that lendeth o
701,hand. 
Yet ye say, Wherefore? Because the LORD hath been witness between thee and the wife of thy youth, against whom thou hast dealt treacherously: yet is she thy companion, and the wife of thy covenant. 
And did not he make one? Yet had he the residue of the spirit. And wherefore one? That he might seek a godly seed. Therefore take heed to your spirit, and let none deal treacherously against the wife of his youth. 
For the LORD, the God of Israel, saith that he hateth putting away: for one covereth violence with his garment, saith the LORD of hosts: therefore take heed to your spirit, that ye deal not treacherously. 
Ye have wearied the LORD with your words. Yet ye say, Wherein have we wear
559,thou say unto Joab, Let not this thing displease thee, for the sword devoureth one as well as another: make thy battle more strong against the city, and overthrow it: and encourage thou him. 
And when the wife of Uriah heard that Uriah her husband was dead, she mourned for her husband. 
And when the mourning was past, David sent and fetched her to his house, and she became his wife, and bare him a son. But the thing that David had done displeased the LORD. 
And the LORD sent Nathan unto David. And he came unto him, and said unto him, There were two men 
537,hat now at this time your abundance may be a supply for their want, that their abundance also may be a supply for your want: that there may be equality: 
As it is written, He that had gathered much had nothing over; and he that had gathered little had no lack. 
But thanks be to God, which put the same earnest care into the heart of Titus for you. 
For indeed he accepted the exhortation; but being more forward, of his own accord he went unto you. 
And we have sent with him the brother, whose praise is in the gospel throughout all th
708,God had done with them, and how he had opened the door of faith unto the Gentiles. 
And there they abode long time with the disciples. 
And certain men which came down from Judaea taught the brethren, and said, Except ye be circumcised after the manner of Moses, ye cannot be saved. 
When therefore Paul and Barnabas had no small dissension and disputation with them, they determined that Paul and Barnabas, and certain other of them, should go up to Jerusalem unto the apostles and elders about this question. 
And being brought on their way by the church, they passed through Phenice and Samaria, declaring the conversion of the Gentiles: and they caused great joy unto all the brethren. 
And when they wer
504,it, and all the instruments thereof, both the altar and all the vessels thereof, and had anointed them, and sanctified them; 
That the princes of Israel, heads of the house of their fathers, who were the princes of the tribes, and were over them that were numbered, offered: 
And they brought their offering before the LORD, six covered wagons, and twelve oxen; a wagon for two of the princes, and for each one an ox: and they brought them before the tabernacle. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 

671,hen said the LORD, Doest thou well to be angry? 
So Jonah went out of the city, and sat on the east side of the city, and there made him a booth, and sat under it in the shadow, till he might see what would become of the city. 
And the LORD God prepared a gourd, and made it to come up over Jonah, that it might be a shadow over his head, to deliver him from his grief. So Jonah was exceeding glad of the gourd. 
But God prepared a worm when the morning rose the next day, and it smote the gourd that it withered. 
And it came to pass, when the sun did arise, that God prepared a vehement east wind; and the sun beat upon the head of Jonah, that he fainted, and wished in
651,
And the king arising from the banquet of wine in his wrath went into the palace garden: and Haman stood up to make request for his life to Esther the queen; for he saw that there was evil determined against him by the king. 
Then the king returned out of the palace garden into the place of the banquet of wine; and Haman was fallen upon the bed whereon Esther was. Then said the king, Will he force the queen also before me in the house? As the word went out of king's mouth, they covered Haman's face. 
And Harbonah, one of the chamberlains, said before the king, Behold also, the gallows fifty cubits high, which Haman had made for Mordecai, who s
566,no man gave unto him. 
And when he came to himself, he said, How many hired servants of my father's have bread enough and to spare, and I perish with hunger! 
I will arise and go to my father, and will say unto him, Father, I have sinned against heaven, and before thee, 
And am no more worthy to be called thy son: make me as one of thy hired servants. 
And he arose, and came to his father. But when he was yet a great way off, his father saw him, and had compassion, and ran, and fell on his neck, and kissed him. 
And the son said unto him, Father, I have sinned
696, the sword: for wrath bringeth the punishments of the sword, that ye may know there is a judgment. 
Then answered Zophar the Naamathite, and said, 
Therefore do my thoughts cause me to answer, and for this I make haste. 
I have heard the check of my reproach, and the spirit of my understanding causeth me to answer. 
Knowest thou not this of old, since man was placed upon earth, 
That the triumphing of the wicked is short, and the joy of the hypocrite but for a moment? 
Though his excellency mount up to the heavens, and his head reach unto the clouds; 
Yet he shall perish for ever like his own dung: they which have seen him shall say, Where is he? 
He shall fly away as a dream, and shall 
700,shalt sanctify them, that they may be most holy: whatsoever toucheth them shall be holy. 
And thou shalt anoint Aaron and his sons, and consecrate them, that they may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, This shall be an holy anointing oil unto me throughout your generations. 
Upon man's flesh shall it not be poured, neither shall ye make any other like it, after the composition of it: it is holy, and it shall be holy unto you. 
Whosoever compoundeth any like it, or whosoever putteth any of it upon a stranger, shall even be cut off from his people. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Take unto thee sweet spices, stacte, and onycha, an
712,nto the end, the same shall be saved. 
But when ye shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of by Daniel the prophet, standing where it ought not, (let him that readeth understand,) then let them that be in Judaea flee to the mountains: 
And let him that is on the housetop not go down into the house, neither enter therein, to take any thing out of his house: 
And let him that is in the field not turn back again for to take up his garment. 
But woe to them that are with child, and to them that give suck in those days! 
And pray ye that your flight be not in the winter. 
For in those days shall be affliction, such as was not from the beginning of the creation which God created unto this time, neith
717,h, Lord GOD! surely thou hast greatly deceived this people and Jerusalem, saying, Ye shall have peace; whereas the sword reacheth unto the soul. 
At that time shall it be said to this people and to Jerusalem, A dry wind of the high places in the wilderness toward the daughter of my people, not to fan, nor to cleanse, 
Even a full wind from those places shall come unto me: now also will I give sentence against them. 
Behold, he shall come up as clouds, and his chariots shall be as a whirlwind: his horses are swifter than eagles. Woe unto us! for we are spoiled. 
O Jerusalem, wash thine heart from wickedness, that thou mayest be saved. How long shall thy vain thoughts lodge within thee? 
For a voice declareth 
533,he brethren heard of us, they came to meet us as far as Appii forum, and The three taverns: whom when Paul saw, he thanked God, and took courage. 
And when we came to Rome, the centurion delivered the prisoners to the captain of the guard: but Paul was suffered to dwell by himself with a soldier that kept him. 
And it came to pass, that after three days Paul called the chief of the Jews together: and when they were come together, he said unto them, Men and brethren, though I have committed nothing against the people, or customs
719,dianites and the Amalekites and all the children of the east lay along in the valley like grasshoppers for multitude; and their camels were without number, as the sand by the sea side for multitude. 
And when Gideon was come, behold, there was a man that told a dream unto his fellow, and said, Behold, I dreamed a dream, and, lo, a cake of barley bread tumbled into the host of Midian, and came unto a tent, and smote it that it fell, and overturned it, that the tent lay along. 
And his fellow answered and said, This is nothing else save the sword of Gideon the son of Joash, a man of Israel: for into his hand hath God delivered Midian, and all the host. 
And it was so, when Gideon heard the telling of the dream, 
683,behold, and visit this vine; 
And the vineyard which thy right hand hath planted, and the branch that thou madest strong for thyself. 
It is burned with fire, it is cut down: they perish at the rebuke of thy countenance. 
Let thy hand be upon the man of thy right hand, upon the son of man whom thou madest strong for thyself. 
So will not we go back from thee: quicken us, and we will call upon thy name. 
Turn us again, O LORD God of hosts, cause thy face to shine; and we shall be saved. 
Sing aloud unto God our strength: make a joyful noise unto the God of Jacob. 
Take a psalm, and bring hither the timbrel, the pleasant harp with the psaltery. 
Blow up the trumpet in the new 
581,nding unto the simple. 
I opened my mouth, and panted: for I longed for thy commandments. 
Look thou upon me, and be merciful unto me, as thou usest to do unto those that love thy name. 
Order my steps in thy word: and let not any iniquity have dominion over me. 
Deliver me from the oppression of man: so will I keep thy precepts. 
Make thy face to shine upon thy servant; and teach me thy statutes. 
Rivers of waters run down mine eyes, because they keep not thy law. 
Righteous art thou, O LORD, and upright are thy judgments. 
Thy testimonies that thou hast commanded are right
583,l them that hate thee. 
And thou shalt consume all the people which the LORD thy God shall deliver thee; thine eye shall have no pity upon them: neither shalt thou serve their gods; for that will be a snare unto thee. 
If thou shalt say in thine heart, These nations are more than I; how can I dispossess them? 
Thou shalt not be afraid of them: but shalt well remember what the LORD thy God did unto Pharaoh, and unto all Egypt; 
The great temptations which thine eyes saw, and the signs, and the wonders, and the mighty hand, and the stretched out arm, whereby the LORD thy God bro
697,or his people. 
And the king of Israel went to his house heavy and displeased, and came to Samaria. 
And it came to pass after these things, that Naboth the Jezreelite had a vineyard, which was in Jezreel, hard by the palace of Ahab king of Samaria. 
And Ahab spake unto Naboth, saying, Give me thy vineyard, that I may have it for a garden of herbs, because it is near unto my house: and I will give thee for it a better vineyard than it; or, if it seem good to thee, I will give thee the worth of it in money. 
And Naboth said to Ahab, The LORD forbid it me, that I should give the inheritance of my fathers unto thee. 
And Ahab came into his house heavy and displeased because of the word which
508,ten, so thou shalt eat them: the unclean and the clean shall eat of them alike. 
Only be sure that thou eat not the blood: for the blood is the life; and thou mayest not eat the life with the flesh. 
Thou shalt not eat it; thou shalt pour it upon the earth as water. 
Thou shalt not eat it; that it may go well with thee, and with thy children after thee, when thou shalt do that which is right in the sight of the LORD. 
Only thy holy things which thou hast, and thy vows, thou shalt take, and go unto the p
566, unto him in Jerusalem; Shammuah, and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, 
Ibhar also, and Elishua, and Nepheg, and Japhia, 
And Elishama, and Eliada, and Eliphalet. 
But when the Philistines heard that they had anointed David king over Israel, all the Philistines came up to seek David; and David heard of it, and went down to the hold. 
The Philistines also came and spread themselves in the valley of Rephaim. 
And David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up to the Philistines? wilt thou deliver them into mine hand? And the LORD said unto David, Go up: for I
567,ed out of the womb? 
When I made the cloud the garment thereof, and thick darkness a swaddlingband for it, 
And brake up for it my decreed place, and set bars and doors, 
And said, Hitherto shalt thou come, but no further: and here shall thy proud waves be stayed? 
Hast thou commanded the morning since thy days; and caused the dayspring to know his place; 
That it might take hold of the ends of the earth, that the wicked might be shaken out of it? 
It is turned as clay to the seal; and they stand as a garment. 
And from the wicked their light is withholden, and
507,ere fell at that time of the Ephraimites forty and two thousand. 
And Jephthah judged Israel six years. Then died Jephthah the Gileadite, and was buried in one of the cities of Gilead. 
And after him Ibzan of Bethlehem judged Israel. 
And he had thirty sons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent abroad, and took in thirty daughters from abroad for his sons. And he judged Israel seven years. 
Then died Ibzan, and was buried at Bethlehem. 
And after him Elon, a Zebulonite, judged Israel; and he judged Israe
560,if robbers by night, (how art thou cut off!) would they not have stolen till they had enough? if the grapegatherers came to thee, would they not leave some grapes? 
How are the things of Esau searched out! how are his hidden things sought up! 
All the men of thy confederacy have brought thee even to the border: the men that were at peace with thee have deceived thee, and prevailed against thee; that they eat thy bread have laid a wound under thee: there is none understanding in him. 
Shall I not in that day, saith the LORD, even destroy the wise men out 
662,our, or of his brother; because it is called the LORD's release. 
Of a foreigner thou mayest exact it again: but that which is thine with thy brother thine hand shall release; 
Save when there shall be no poor among you; for the LORD shall greatly bless thee in the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance to possess it: 
Only if thou carefully hearken unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to observe to do all these commandments which I command thee this day. 
For the LORD thy God blesseth thee, as he promised thee: and thou shalt lend unto many nations, but thou shalt not borrow; and thou shalt reign over many nations, but they shall not 
487,hat I am not wicked; and there is none that can deliver out of thine hand. 
Thine hands have made me and fashioned me together round about; yet thou dost destroy me. 
Remember, I beseech thee, that thou hast made me as the clay; and wilt thou bring me into dust again? 
Hast thou not poured me out as milk, and curdled me like cheese? 
Thou hast clothed me with skin and flesh, and hast fenced me with bones and sinews. 
Thou hast granted me life and favour, and thy visitation hath pres
652,d in the synagogues of the Jews: and they had also John to their minister. 
And when they had gone through the isle unto Paphos, they found a certain sorcerer, a false prophet, a Jew, whose name was Barjesus: 
Which was with the deputy of the country, Sergius Paulus, a prudent man; who called for Barnabas and Saul, and desired to hear the word of God. 
But Elymas the sorcerer (for so is his name by interpretation) withstood them, seeking to turn away the deputy from the faith. 
Then Saul, (who also is called Paul,) filled with the Holy Ghost, set his eyes on him. 
And said, O full of all subtilty and all mischief, thou child of the devil, thou 
569,d of the LORD, ye scornful men, that rule this people which is in Jerusalem. 
Because ye have said, We have made a covenant with death, and with hell are we at agreement; when the overflowing scourge shall pass through, it shall not come unto us: for we have made lies our refuge, and under falsehood have we hid ourselves: 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, I lay in Zion for a foundation a stone, a tried stone, a precious corner stone, a sure foundation: he that believeth shall not make haste. 
Judgment also will I lay to the line, and righteousness to th
674,d Judah shall not vex Ephraim. 
But they shall fly upon the shoulders of the Philistines toward the west; they shall spoil them of the east together: they shall lay their hand upon Edom and Moab; and the children of Ammon shall obey them. 
And the LORD shall utterly destroy the tongue of the Egyptian sea; and with his mighty wind shall he shake his hand over the river, and shall smite it in the seven streams, and make men go over dryshod. 
And there shall be an highway for the remnant of his people, which shall be left, from Assyria; like as it was to Israel in the day that he came up out of the land of Egypt. 
And in that day thou shalt say, O LORD, I will praise t
481,nd they said, The LORD, he is the God; the LORD, he is the God. 
And Elijah said unto them, Take the prophets of Baal; let not one of them escape. And they took them: and Elijah brought them down to the brook Kishon, and slew them there. 
And Elijah said unto Ahab, Get thee up, eat and drink; for there is a sound of abundance of rain. 
So Ahab went up to eat and to drink. And Elijah went up to the top of Carmel; and he cast himself down upon the earth, and put his face between
545,ad some white in it, and all the brown among the sheep, and gave them into the hand of his sons. 
And he set three days' journey betwixt himself and Jacob: and Jacob fed the rest of Laban's flocks. 
And Jacob took him rods of green poplar, and of the hazel and chesnut tree; and pilled white strakes in them, and made the white appear which was in the rods. 
And he set the rods which he had pilled before the flocks in the gutters in the watering troughs when the flocks came to drink, that they should conceive when they came to drink. 
And th
625,also. 
These words spake Jesus in the treasury, as he taught in the temple: and no man laid hands on him; for his hour was not yet come. 
Then said Jesus again unto them, I go my way, and ye shall seek me, and shall die in your sins: whither I go, ye cannot come. 
Then said the Jews, Will he kill himself? because he saith, Whither I go, ye cannot come. 
And he said unto them, Ye are from beneath; I am from above: ye are of this world; I am not of this world. 
I said therefore unto you, that ye shall die in your sins: for if ye believe not that I am he, ye shall die in your sins. 
Then said they unto him, Who art thou?
612,ree rows of great stones, and a row of new timber: and let the expenses be given out of the king's house: 
And also let the golden and silver vessels of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took forth out of the temple which is at Jerusalem, and brought unto Babylon, be restored, and brought again unto the temple which is at Jerusalem, every one to his place, and place them in the house of God. 
Now therefore, Tatnai, governor beyond the river, Shetharboznai, and your companions the Apharsachites, which are beyond the river, be ye far from thence: 
Let the work of this house of God alone; let the govern
699,ll be kept in prison, that your words may be proved, whether there be any truth in you: or else by the life of Pharaoh surely ye are spies. 
And he put them all together into ward three days. 
And Joseph said unto them the third day, This do, and live; for I fear God: 
If ye be true men, let one of your brethren be bound in the house of your prison: go ye, carry corn for the famine of your houses: 
But bring your youngest brother unto me; so shall your words be verified, and ye shall not die. And they did so. 
And they said one to another, We are verily guilty concerning our brother, in that we saw the anguish of his soul, when he besought us, and we would not hear; therefore is this distre
505,annot be reckoned up in order unto thee: if I would declare and speak of them, they are more than can be numbered. 
Sacrifice and offering thou didst not desire; mine ears hast thou opened: burnt offering and sin offering hast thou not required. 
Then said I, Lo, I come: in the volume of the book it is written of me, 
I delight to do thy will, O my God: yea, thy law is within my heart. 
I have preached righteousness in the great congregation: lo, I have not refrained my lips, O LORD, thou knowest. 
I
665,erish? 
But Gedaliah the son of Ahikam said unto Johanan the son of Kareah, Thou shalt not do this thing: for thou speakest falsely of Ishmael. 
Now it came to pass in the seventh month, that Ishmael the son of Nethaniah the son of Elishama, of the seed royal, and the princes of the king, even ten men with him, came unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam to Mizpah; and there they did eat bread together in Mizpah. 
Then arose Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and the ten men that were with him, and smote Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan with the sword, and slew him, whom the king of Babylon had made governor over the land. 
Ishmael also slew all the Jews t
652,dren of Reuben and children of Gad; ye have no part in the LORD: so shall your children make our children cease from fearing the LORD. 
Therefore we said, Let us now prepare to build us an altar, not for burnt offering, nor for sacrifice: 
But that it may be a witness between us, and you, and our generations after us, that we might do the service of the LORD before him with our burnt offerings, and with our sacrifices, and with our peace offerings; that your children may not say to our children in time to come, Ye have no part in the LORD. 
Therefore said we, that it shall be, when they should so say to us or to our generations in time to come,
499,id. I said, I will confess my transgressions unto the LORD; and thou forgavest the iniquity of my sin. Selah. 
For this shall every one that is godly pray unto thee in a time when thou mayest be found: surely in the floods of great waters they shall not come nigh unto him. 
Thou art my hiding place; thou shalt preserve me from trouble; thou shalt compass me about with songs of deliverance. Selah. 
I will instruct thee and teach thee in the way which thou shalt go: I will guide thee with mine ey
641, elder and thy younger: and I will give them unto thee for daughters, but not by thy covenant. 
And I will establish my covenant with thee; and thou shalt know that I am the LORD: 
That thou mayest remember, and be confounded, and never open thy mouth any more because of thy shame, when I am pacified toward thee for all that thou hast done, saith the Lord GOD. 
And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 
Son of man, put forth a riddle, and speak a parable unto the house of Israel; 
And say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; A great eagle with great wings, longwinged, full of feathers, which had divers colours, came unto Lebanon, and took 
536, them, they set them before the council: and the high priest asked them, 
Saying, Did not we straitly command you that ye should not teach in this name? and, behold, ye have filled Jerusalem with your doctrine, and intend to bring this man's blood upon us. 
Then Peter and the other apostles answered and said, We ought to obey God rather than men. 
The God of our fathers raised up Jesus, whom ye slew and hanged on a tree. 
Him hath God exalted with his right hand to be a Prince and a Saviour, for to give repentance to Israel, and f
506,clean things in Assyria. 
They shall not offer wine offerings to the LORD, neither shall they be pleasing unto him: their sacrifices shall be unto them as the bread of mourners; all that eat thereof shall be polluted: for their bread for their soul shall not come into the house of the LORD. 
What will ye do in the solemn day, and in the day of the feast of the LORD? 
For, lo, they are gone because of destruction: Egypt shall gather them up, Memphis shall bury them: the pleasant places for their silver
487,ar, and wring off his head, and burn it on the altar; and the blood thereof shall be wrung out at the side of the altar: 
And he shall pluck away his crop with his feathers, and cast it beside the altar on the east part, by the place of the ashes: 
And he shall cleave it with the wings thereof, but shall not divide it asunder: and the priest shall burn it upon the altar, upon the wood that is upon the fire: it is a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour unto th
655,shall pass through Macedonia: for I do pass through Macedonia. 
And it may be that I will abide, yea, and winter with you, that ye may bring me on my journey whithersoever I go. 
For I will not see you now by the way; but I trust to tarry a while with you, if the Lord permit. 
But I will tarry at Ephesus until Pentecost. 
For a great door and effectual is opened unto me, and there are many adversaries. 
Now if Timotheus come, see that he may be with you without fear: for he worketh the work of the Lord, as I also do. 
Let no man therefore despise him: but conduct him forth in peace, that he may come unto me: for I look for him with the brethren. 

591,d it shall be granted thee: or what is thy request further? and it shall be done. 
Then said Esther, If it please the king, let it be granted to the Jews which are in Shushan to do to morrow also according unto this day's decree, and let Haman's ten sons be hanged upon the gallows. 
And the king commanded it so to be done: and the decree was given at Shushan; and they hanged Haman's ten sons. 
For the Jews that were in Shushan gathered themselves together on the fourteenth day also of the month Adar, and slew three hundred men at Shushan; but on the prey they laid not their hand. 
But
704,unto you. 
But woe unto you, Pharisees! for ye tithe mint and rue and all manner of herbs, and pass over judgment and the love of God: these ought ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone. 
Woe unto you, Pharisees! for ye love the uppermost seats in the synagogues, and greetings in the markets. 
Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye are as graves which appear not, and the men that walk over them are not aware of them. 
Then answered one of the lawyers, and said unto him, Master, thus saying thou reproachest us also. 
And he said, Woe unto you also, ye lawyers! for ye lade men with burdens grievous to be borne, and ye yourselves touch not the burdens with one of your f
673,forth her first child, the voice of the daughter of Zion, that bewaileth herself, that spreadeth her hands, saying, Woe is me now! for my soul is wearied because of murderers. 
Run ye to and fro through the streets of Jerusalem, and see now, and know, and seek in the broad places thereof, if ye can find a man, if there be any that executeth judgment, that seeketh the truth; and I will pardon it. 
And though they say, The LORD liveth; surely they swear falsely. 
O LORD, are not thine eyes upon the truth? thou hast stricken them, but they have not grieved; thou hast consumed them, but they have refused to receive correction: they have made their faces harder than a r
668, he may be ashamed. 
Yet count him not as an enemy, but admonish him as a brother. 
Now the Lord of peace himself give you peace always by all means. The Lord be with you all. 
The salutation of Paul with mine own hand, which is the token in every epistle: so I write. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the commandment of God our Saviour, and Lord Jesus Christ, which is our hope; 
Unto Timothy, my own son in the faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God our Father and Jesus Christ our Lord. 
As I besought thee to abide still at Ephesus, when I went into Macedonia, that thou mightest charge some that th
567,e hand of the Egyptians, and out of the hand of Pharaoh, who hath delivered the people from under the hand of the Egyptians. 
Now I know that the LORD is greater than all gods: for in the thing wherein they dealt proudly he was above them. 
And Jethro, Moses' father in law, took a burnt offering and sacrifices for God: and Aaron came, and all the elders of Israel, to eat bread with Moses' father in law before God. 
And it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses sat to judge the people: and the people stood by Moses from the morning unto the evening. 
And when Mo
682, air have nests; but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head. 
And he said unto another, Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me first to go and bury my father. 
Jesus said unto him, Let the dead bury their dead: but go thou and preach the kingdom of God. 
And another also said, Lord, I will follow thee; but let me first go bid them farewell, which are at home at my house. 
And Jesus said unto him, No man, having put his hand to the plough, and looking back, is fit for the kingdom of God. 
After these things the LORD appointed other seventy also, and sent them two and two before his face into every city and place, whither he himself would come. 
Therefore said he unto
653,t it out to husbandmen, and went into a far country: 
And when the time of the fruit drew near, he sent his servants to the husbandmen, that they might receive the fruits of it. 
And the husbandmen took his servants, and beat one, and killed another, and stoned another. 
Again, he sent other servants more than the first: and they did unto them likewise. 
But last of all he sent unto them his son, saying, They will reverence my son. 
But when the husbandmen saw the son, they said among themselves, This is the heir; come, let us kill him, and let us seize on his inheritance. 
And they caught him, and cast him out of the vineyard, and slew him. 
Wh
666,ll weep and mourn over her; for no man buyeth their merchandise any more: 
The merchandise of gold, and silver, and precious stones, and of pearls, and fine linen, and purple, and silk, and scarlet, and all thyine wood, and all manner vessels of ivory, and all manner vessels of most precious wood, and of brass, and iron, and marble, 
And cinnamon, and odours, and ointments, and frankincense, and wine, and oil, and fine flour, and wheat, and beasts, and sheep, and horses, and chariots, and slaves, and souls of men. 
And the fruits that thy soul lusted after are departed from thee, and all things which were dainty and goodly are departed from thee, and thou sh
690,and said with a loud voice, As thou hast said, so must we do. 
But the people are many, and it is a time of much rain, and we are not able to stand without, neither is this a work of one day or two: for we are many that have transgressed in this thing. 
Let now our rulers of all the congregation stand, and let all them which have taken strange wives in our cities come at appointed times, and with them the elders of every city, and the judges thereof, until the fierce wrath of our God for this matter be turned from us. 
Only Jonathan the son of Asahel and Jahaziah the son of Tikvah were employed about this matter: and Meshullam and Shabbethai the Levite helped them. 
And the childre
500,s; for even their sons and their daughters they have burnt in the fire to their gods. 
What thing soever I command you, observe to do it: thou shalt not add thereto, nor diminish from it. 
If there arise among you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and giveth thee a sign or a wonder, 
And the sign or the wonder come to pass, whereof he spake unto thee, saying, Let us go after other gods, which thou hast not known, and let us serve them; 
Thou shalt not hearken unto the words of that prophet, or 
654,son, Mishma his son. 
And the sons of Mishma; Hamuel his son, Zacchur his son, Shimei his son. 
And Shimei had sixteen sons and six daughters: but his brethren had not many children, neither did all their family multiply, like to the children of Judah. 
And they dwelt at Beersheba, and Moladah, and Hazarshual, 
And at Bilhah, and at Ezem, and at Tolad, 
And at Bethuel, and at Hormah, and at Ziklag, 
And at Bethmarcaboth, and Hazarsusim, and at Bethbirei, and at Shaaraim. These were their cities unto the reign of David. 
And their villages were, Etam, and Ain, Rimmon, and Tochen, and Ashan, five cities: 
And all their villages that were round abou
680,hereon he resteth; yet his eyes are upon their ways. 
They are exalted for a little while, but are gone and brought low; they are taken out of the way as all other, and cut off as the tops of the ears of corn. 
And if it be not so now, who will make me a liar, and make my speech nothing worth? 
Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 
Dominion and fear are with him, he maketh peace in his high places. 
Is there any number of his armies? and upon whom doth not his light arise? 
How then can man be justified with God? or how can he be clean that is born of a woman? 
Behold even to the moon, and it shineth not; yea, the stars are not pure in his sight. 
How much less man
508,od, and hast promised this goodness unto thy servant: 
Now therefore let it please thee to bless the house of thy servant, that it may be before thee for ever: for thou blessest, O LORD, and it shall be blessed for ever. 
Now after this it came to pass, that David smote the Philistines, and subdued them, and took Gath and her towns out of the hand of the Philistines. 
And he smote Moab; and the Moabites became David's servants, and brought gifts. 
And David smote Hadarezer king of Zobah unto Hamath, as 
646,in pieces of them, commanded the soldiers to go down, and to take him by force from among them, and to bring him into the castle. 
And the night following the Lord stood by him, and said, Be of good cheer, Paul: for as thou hast testified of me in Jerusalem, so must thou bear witness also at Rome. 
And when it was day, certain of the Jews banded together, and bound themselves under a curse, saying that they would neither eat nor drink till they had killed Paul. 
And they were more than forty which had made this conspiracy. 
And they came to the chief priests and elders, and said, We have bound ourselves under a great curse, that we will e
649,n acceptable time: O God, in the multitude of thy mercy hear me, in the truth of thy salvation. 
Deliver me out of the mire, and let me not sink: let me be delivered from them that hate me, and out of the deep waters. 
Let not the waterflood overflow me, neither let the deep swallow me up, and let not the pit shut her mouth upon me. 
Hear me, O LORD; for thy lovingkindness is good: turn unto me according to the multitude of thy tender mercies. 
And hide not thy face from thy servant; for I am in trouble: hear me speedily. 
Draw nigh unto my soul, and redeem it: deliver me because of mine enemies. 
Thou hast known my reproach, and my shame, a
597,eir hands on him, and took him. 
And one of them that stood by drew a sword, and smote a servant of the high priest, and cut off his ear. 
And Jesus answered and said unto them, Are ye come out, as against a thief, with swords and with staves to take me? 
I was daily with you in the temple teaching, and ye took me not: but the scriptures must be fulfilled. 
And they all forsook him, and fled. 
And there followed him a certain young man, having a linen cloth cast about his naked body; and the young men laid hold on him: 
And he left the linen cloth, and fled from them naked. 
And they led Je
581,The word that the LORD spake to Jeremiah the prophet, how Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon should come and smite the land of Egypt. 
Declare ye in Egypt, and publish in Migdol, and publish in Noph and in Tahpanhes: say ye, Stand fast, and prepare thee; for the sword shall devour round about thee. 
Why are thy valiant men swept away? they stood not, because the LORD did drive them. 
He made many to fall, yea, one fell upon another: and they said, Arise, and let us go again to our own people, and to the land of our nativity, from the oppressing sword. 
They did cry there, Pharao
503,h were over the treasures of the house of the LORD. 
Of the Amramites, and the Izharites, the Hebronites, and the Uzzielites: 
And Shebuel the son of Gershom, the son of Moses, was ruler of the treasures. 
And his brethren by Eliezer; Rehabiah his son, and Jeshaiah his son, and Joram his son, and Zichri his son, and Shelomith his son. 
Which Shelomith and his brethren were over all the treasures of the dedicated things, which David the king, and the chief fathers, the captains over thousands and hu
500,ses spake unto the LORD, saying, 
Let the LORD, the God of the spirits of all flesh, set a man over the congregation, 
Which may go out before them, and which may go in before them, and which may lead them out, and which may bring them in; that the congregation of the LORD be not as sheep which have no shepherd. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, Take thee Joshua the son of Nun, a man in whom is the spirit, and lay thine hand upon him; 
And set him before Eleazar the priest, and before all the congr
487, well's mouth; then we water the sheep. 
And while he yet spake with them, Rachel came with her father's sheep; for she kept them. 
And it came to pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban his mother's brother, and the sheep of Laban his mother's brother, that Jacob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and watered the flock of Laban his mother's brother. 
And Jacob kissed Rachel, and lifted up his voice, and wept. 
And Jacob told Rachel that he was her fath
515,e east side of the valley, to seek pasture for their flocks. 
And they found fat pasture and good, and the land was wide, and quiet, and peaceable; for they of Ham had dwelt there of old. 
And these written by name came in the days of Hezekiah king of Judah, and smote their tents, and the habitations that were found there, and destroyed them utterly unto this day, and dwelt in their rooms: because there was pasture there for their flocks. 
And some of them, even of the sons of Simeon, five hundred men, went to
526, have swallowed her up: certainly this is the day that we looked for; we have found, we have seen it. 
The LORD hath done that which he had devised; he hath fulfilled his word that he had commanded in the days of old: he hath thrown down, and hath not pitied: and he hath caused thine enemy to rejoice over thee, he hath set up the horn of thine adversaries. 
Their heart cried unto the LORD, O wall of the daughter of Zion, let tears run down like a river day and night: give thyself no rest; let not the apple of thine eye c
548,; and my mouth shall shew forth thy praise. 
For thou desirest not sacrifice; else would I give it: thou delightest not in burnt offering. 
The sacrifices of God are a broken spirit: a broken and a contrite heart, O God, thou wilt not despise. 
Do good in thy good pleasure unto Zion: build thou the walls of Jerusalem. 
Then shalt thou be pleased with the sacrifices of righteousness, with burnt offering and whole burnt offering: then shall they offer bullocks upon thine altar. 
Why boastest thou thyself in mischief, O mighty man? the goodness 
677,down dead. 
The mother of Sisera looked out at a window, and cried through the lattice, Why is his chariot so long in coming? why tarry the wheels of his chariots? 
Her wise ladies answered her, yea, she returned answer to herself, 
Have they not sped? have they not divided the prey; to every man a damsel or two; to Sisera a prey of divers colours, a prey of divers colours of needlework, of divers colours of needlework on both sides, meet for the necks of them that take the spoil? 
So let all thine enemies perish, O LORD: but let them that love him be as the sun when he goeth forth in his might. And the land had rest forty years. 
And the children of Israel did evil in
573,wake? I will seek it yet again. 
Be not thou envious against evil men, neither desire to be with them. 
For their heart studieth destruction, and their lips talk of mischief. 
Through wisdom is an house builded; and by understanding it is established: 
And by knowledge shall the chambers be filled with all precious and pleasant riches. 
A wise man is strong; yea, a man of knowledge increaseth strength. 
For by wise counsel thou shalt make thy war: and in multitude of counsellors there is safety. 
Wisdom is too high for a fool: he openeth not his mouth in the gate. 
H
619,aste ground; and to cause the bud of the tender herb to spring forth? 
Hath the rain a father? or who hath begotten the drops of dew? 
Out of whose womb came the ice? and the hoary frost of heaven, who hath gendered it? 
The waters are hid as with a stone, and the face of the deep is frozen. 
Canst thou bind the sweet influences of Pleiades, or loose the bands of Orion? 
Canst thou bring forth Mazzaroth in his season? or canst thou guide Arcturus with his sons? 
Knowest thou the ordinances of heaven? canst thou set the dominion thereof in the earth? 
Canst thou lift up thy voice to the clouds, that abundance of 
509, Amen. 
Paul, an apostle, (not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead;) 
And all the brethren which are with me, unto the churches of Galatia: 
Grace be to you and peace from God the Father, and from our Lord Jesus Christ, 
Who gave himself for our sins, that he might deliver us from this present evil world, according to the will of God and our Father: 
To whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen. 
I marvel that ye are so soon removed from him that call
609, heaps. 
He shall not be rich, neither shall his substance continue, neither shall he prolong the perfection thereof upon the earth. 
He shall not depart out of darkness; the flame shall dry up his branches, and by the breath of his mouth shall he go away. 
Let not him that is deceived trust in vanity: for vanity shall be his recompence. 
It shall be accomplished before his time, and his branch shall not be green. 
He shall shake off his unripe grape as the vine, and shall cast off his flower as the olive. 
For the congregation of hypocrites shall be desolate, and fire shall consume the tabernacles of 
677,by the hand of Moses. 
And it came to pass on the eighth day, that Moses called Aaron and his sons, and the elders of Israel; 
And he said unto Aaron, Take thee a young calf for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering, without blemish, and offer them before the LORD. 
And unto the children of Israel thou shalt speak, saying, Take ye a kid of the goats for a sin offering; and a calf and a lamb, both of the first year, without blemish, for a burnt offering; 
Also a bullock and a ram for peace offerings, to sacrifice before the LORD; and a meat offering mingled with oil: for to day the LORD will appear unto you. 
And they brought that which Moses commanded before t
558, in the days of my youth, when the secret of God was upon my tabernacle; 
When the Almighty was yet with me, when my children were about me; 
When I washed my steps with butter, and the rock poured me out rivers of oil; 
When I went out to the gate through the city, when I prepared my seat in the street! 
The young men saw me, and hid themselves: and the aged arose, and stood up. 
The princes refrained talking, and laid their hand on their mouth. 
The nobles held their peace, and their tongue cleaved to the roof of their mouth. 
When the ear heard me, 
507,re thee: 
Let my prayer come before thee: incline thine ear unto my cry; 
For my soul is full of troubles: and my life draweth nigh unto the grave. 
I am counted with them that go down into the pit: I am as a man that hath no strength: 
Free among the dead, like the slain that lie in the grave, whom thou rememberest no more: and they are cut off from thy hand. 
Thou hast laid me in the lowest pit, in darkness, in the deeps. 
Thy wrath lieth hard upon me, and thou hast afflicted me with all thy waves. S
644,the LORD sware unto your fathers to give them, as the days of heaven upon the earth. 
For if ye shall diligently keep all these commandments which I command you, to do them, to love the LORD your God, to walk in all his ways, and to cleave unto him; 
Then will the LORD drive out all these nations from before you, and ye shall possess greater nations and mightier than yourselves. 
Every place whereon the soles of your feet shall tread shall be yours: from the wilderness and Lebanon, from the river, the river Euphrates, even unto the uttermost sea shall your coast be. 
There shall no man be able to stand before you: for the LORD your God 
519,salem, and there he died. 
Now the children of Judah had fought against Jerusalem, and had taken it, and smitten it with the edge of the sword, and set the city on fire. 
And afterward the children of Judah went down to fight against the Canaanites, that dwelt in the mountain, and in the south, and in the valley. 
And Judah went against the Canaanites that dwelt in Hebron: (now the name of Hebron before was Kirjatharba:) and they slew Sheshai, and Ahiman, and Talmai. 
And from thence he went against the inhabitant
519,t I will utterly take them away. 
But I will have mercy upon the house of Judah, and will save them by the LORD their God, and will not save them by bow, nor by sword, nor by battle, by horses, nor by horsemen. 
Now when she had weaned Loruhamah, she conceived, and bare a son. 
Then said God, Call his name Loammi: for ye are not my people, and I will not be your God. 
Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of the sea, which cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to pass, that in 
623,t inhabitant. 
Yea, ten acres of vineyard shall yield one bath, and the seed of an homer shall yield an ephah. 
Woe unto them that rise up early in the morning, that they may follow strong drink; that continue until night, till wine inflame them! 
And the harp, and the viol, the tabret, and pipe, and wine, are in their feasts: but they regard not the work of the LORD, neither consider the operation of his hands. 
Therefore my people are gone into captivity, because they have no knowledge: and their honourable men are famished, and their multitude dried up with thirst. 
Therefore hell hath enlarged herself, and opene
519,ting on the breastplate of faith and love; and for an helmet, the hope of salvation. 
For God hath not appointed us to wrath, but to obtain salvation by our Lord Jesus Christ, 
Who died for us, that, whether we wake or sleep, we should live together with him. 
Wherefore comfort yourselves together, and edify one another, even as also ye do. 
And we beseech you, brethren, to know them which labour among you, and are over you in the Lord, and admonish you; 
And to esteem them very highly in love for their work's sak
609,ngs which are before, 
I press toward the mark for the prize of the high calling of God in Christ Jesus. 
Let us therefore, as many as be perfect, be thus minded: and if in any thing ye be otherwise minded, God shall reveal even this unto you. 
Nevertheless, whereto we have already attained, let us walk by the same rule, let us mind the same thing. 
Brethren, be followers together of me, and mark them which walk so as ye have us for an ensample. 
(For many walk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that they are the enemies of the cross of Christ: 
Whose end is destruction, who
497,me and stood before the king. 
And the king said unto them, I have dreamed a dream, and my spirit was troubled to know the dream. 
Then spake the Chaldeans to the king in Syriack, O king, live for ever: tell thy servants the dream, and we will shew the interpretation. 
The king answered and said to the Chaldeans, The thing is gone from me: if ye will not make known unto me the dream, with the interpretation thereof, ye shall be cut in pieces, and your houses shall be made a dunghill. 
But if 
669,which walk so as ye have us for an ensample. 
(For many walk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that they are the enemies of the cross of Christ: 
Whose end is destruction, whose God is their belly, and whose glory is in their shame, who mind earthly things.) 
For our conversation is in heaven; from whence also we look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ: 
Who shall change our vile body, that it may be fashioned like unto his glorious body, according to the working whereby he is able even to subdue all things unto himself. 
Therefore, my brethren dearly beloved and longed for, my joy and crown, so stand fast in the Lord, my dearly
587,o the king: and he said, Thy servant went out into the midst of the battle; and, behold, a man turned aside, and brought a man unto me, and said, Keep this man: if by any means he be missing, then shall thy life be for his life, or else thou shalt pay a talent of silver. 
And as thy servant was busy here and there, he was gone. And the king of Israel said unto him, So shall thy judgment be; thyself hast decided it. 
And he hasted, and took the ashes away from his face; and the king of Israel discerned him that he was of the prophets. 
And he said unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Bec
670,seven years; and the seven empty ears blasted with the east wind shall be seven years of famine. 
This is the thing which I have spoken unto Pharaoh: What God is about to do he sheweth unto Pharaoh. 
Behold, there come seven years of great plenty throughout all the land of Egypt: 
And there shall arise after them seven years of famine; and all the plenty shall be forgotten in the land of Egypt; and the famine shall consume the land; 
And the plenty shall not be known in the land by reason of that famine following; for it shall be very grievous. 
And for that the dream was doubled unto Pharaoh twice; it is because the thing is established by God, and God will sho
661,: so shall ye reconcile the house. 
In the first month, in the fourteenth day of the month, ye shall have the passover, a feast of seven days; unleavened bread shall be eaten. 
And upon that day shall the prince prepare for himself and for all the people of the land a bullock for a sin offering. 
And seven days of the feast he shall prepare a burnt offering to the LORD, seven bullocks and seven rams without blemish daily the seven days; and a kid of the goats daily for a sin offering. 
And he shall prepare a meat offering of an ephah for a bullock, and an ephah for a ram, and an hin of oil for an ephah. 
In the seventh month, in the fifteenth day of the
585,ed out arm; if they come and pray in this house; 
Then hear thou from the heavens, even from thy dwelling place, and do according to all that the stranger calleth to thee for; that all people of the earth may know thy name, and fear thee, as doth thy people Israel, and may know that this house which I have built is called by thy name. 
If thy people go out to war against their enemies by the way that thou shalt send them, and they pray unto thee toward this city which thou hast chosen, and the house which I have built for thy name; 
Then hear thou from the heavens their prayer a
614,n my bonds: 
Which in time past was to thee unprofitable, but now profitable to thee and to me: 
Whom I have sent again: thou therefore receive him, that is, mine own bowels: 
Whom I would have retained with me, that in thy stead he might have ministered unto me in the bonds of the gospel: 
But without thy mind would I do nothing; that thy benefit should not be as it were of necessity, but willingly. 
For perhaps he therefore departed for a season, that thou shouldest receive him for ever; 
Not now as a servant, but above a servant, a brother beloved, specially to me, but how much more unto thee, both in th
589,e? 
And Jesus said, Somebody hath touched me: for I perceive that virtue is gone out of me. 
And when the woman saw that she was not hid, she came trembling, and falling down before him, she declared unto him before all the people for what cause she had touched him, and how she was healed immediately. 
And he said unto her, Daughter, be of good comfort: thy faith hath made thee whole; go in peace. 
While he yet spake, there cometh one from the ruler of the synagogue's house, saying to him, Thy daughter is dead; trouble not the Master. 
But when Jesus heard it, he answered him, sayin
539,ers also of the princes of Israel. 
Jehoram was thirty and two years old when he began to reign, and he reigned eight years in Jerusalem. 
And he walked in the way of the kings of Israel, like as did the house of Ahab: for he had the daughter of Ahab to wife: and he wrought that which was evil in the eyes of the LORD. 
Howbeit the LORD would not destroy the house of David, because of the covenant that he had made with David, and as he promised to give a light to him and to his sons for ever. 
In his days the Edomites revolted from un
631, father, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest me: arise, I pray thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may bless me. 
And Isaac said unto his son, How is it that thou hast found it so quickly, my son? And he said, Because the LORD thy God brought it to me. 
And Isaac said unto Jacob, Come near, I pray thee, that I may feel thee, my son, whether thou be my very son Esau or not. 
And Jacob went near unto Isaac his father; and he felt him, and said, The voice is Jacob's voice, but the hands are the hands of Esau. 
And he discerned him not, because his hands were hairy, as his brother Esau's ha
489,ave ye brought us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness? for there is no bread, neither is there any water; and our soul loatheth this light bread. 
And the LORD sent fiery serpents among the people, and they bit the people; and much people of Israel died. 
Therefore the people came to Moses, and said, We have sinned, for we have spoken against the LORD, and against thee; pray unto the LORD, that he take away the serpents from us. And Moses prayed for the people. 
And the LORD said
635, 
But he went out, and began to publish it much, and to blaze abroad the matter, insomuch that Jesus could no more openly enter into the city, but was without in desert places: and they came to him from every quarter. 
And again he entered into Capernaum after some days; and it was noised that he was in the house. 
And straightway many were gathered together, insomuch that there was no room to receive them, no, not so much as about the door: and he preached the word unto them. 
And they come unto him, bringing one sick of the palsy, which was borne of four. 
And when they could not come nigh unto him for the press, they uncover
714, of his house in Tirzah. 
And Zimri went in and smote him, and killed him, in the twenty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah, and reigned in his stead. 
And it came to pass, when he began to reign, as soon as he sat on his throne, that he slew all the house of Baasha: he left him not one that pisseth against a wall, neither of his kinsfolks, nor of his friends. 
Thus did Zimri destroy all the house of Baasha, according to the word of the LORD, which he spake against Baasha by Jehu the prophet. 
For all the sins of Baasha, and the sins of Elah his son, by which they sinned, and by which they made Israel to sin, in provoking the LORD God of Israel to anger with their vanities. 
Now the rest of the acts of
689,e feared, shall overtake you there in the land of Egypt, and the famine, whereof ye were afraid, shall follow close after you there in Egypt; and there ye shall die. 
So shall it be with all the men that set their faces to go into Egypt to sojourn there; they shall die by the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence: and none of them shall remain or escape from the evil that I will bring upon them. 
For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; As mine anger and my fury hath been poured forth upon the inhabitants of Jerusalem; so shall my fury be poured forth upon you, when ye shall enter into Egypt: and ye shall be an execration, and an astonishment, and a curse, and a 
715,natus and Achaicus: for that which was lacking on your part they have supplied. 
For they have refreshed my spirit and your's: therefore acknowledge ye them that are such. 
The churches of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you much in the Lord, with the church that is in their house. 
All the brethren greet you. Greet ye one another with an holy kiss. 
The salutation of me Paul with mine own hand. 
If any man love not the Lord Jesus Christ, let him be Anathema Maranatha. 
The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you. 
My love be with you all in Christ Jesus. Amen. 
Paul, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the will of God, and Timothy our brother, unto the church of God which is at Corinth, with all
711,ke haste; thy destroyers and they that made thee waste shall go forth of thee. 
Lift up thine eyes round about, and behold: all these gather themselves together, and come to thee. As I live, saith the LORD, thou shalt surely clothe thee with them all, as with an ornament, and bind them on thee, as a bride doeth. 
For thy waste and thy desolate places, and the land of thy destruction, shall even now be too narrow by reason of the inhabitants, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away. 
The children which thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the other, shall say again in thine ears, The place is too strait for me: give place to me that I may dwell. 
Then shalt thou say in thine heart, Who hath b
646,oncerning the land of Israel, and say unto the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I have spoken in my jealousy and in my fury, because ye have borne the shame of the heathen: 
Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; I have lifted up mine hand, Surely the heathen that are about you, they shall bear their shame. 
But ye, O mountains of Israel, ye shall shoot forth your branches, and yield your fruit to my people of Israel; for they are at hand to come. 
For, behold, I am for you, and I will turn unto you, and ye shall be tilled and sown: 
And I will multiply men upon you, all the hous
577,hither every man his ox, and every man his sheep, and slay them here, and eat; and sin not against the LORD in eating with the blood. And all the people brought every man his ox with him that night, and slew them there. 
And Saul built an altar unto the LORD: the same was the first altar that he built unto the LORD. 
And Saul said, Let us go down after the Philistines by night, and spoil them until the morning light, and let us not leave a man of them. And they said, Do whatsoever seemeth good unto thee. Then said the priest, Let us draw near hither unto God. 
And Saul a
687,thers increased greatly. 
And they went to the entrance of Gedor, even unto the east side of the valley, to seek pasture for their flocks. 
And they found fat pasture and good, and the land was wide, and quiet, and peaceable; for they of Ham had dwelt there of old. 
And these written by name came in the days of Hezekiah king of Judah, and smote their tents, and the habitations that were found there, and destroyed them utterly unto this day, and dwelt in their rooms: because there was pasture there for their flocks. 
And some of them, even of the sons of Simeon, five hundred men, went to mount Seir, having for their captains Pelatiah, and Neariah, and Rephaiah, and Uzziel, the so
632,all do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread down our enemies. 
Hold not thy peace, O God of my praise; 
For the mouth of the wicked and the mouth of the deceitful are opened against me: they have spoken against me with a lying tongue. 
They compassed me about also with words of hatred; and fought against me without a cause. 
For my love they are my adversaries: but I give myself unto prayer. 
And they have rewarded me evil for good, and hatred for my love. 
Set thou a wicked man over him: and let Satan stand at his right hand. 
When he shall be judged, let him be condemned: and let his prayer become sin. 
Let his days be
489,y have no delight in it. 
Therefore I am full of the fury of the LORD; I am weary with holding in: I will pour it out upon the children abroad, and upon the assembly of young men together: for even the husband with the wife shall be taken, the aged with him that is full of days. 
And their houses shall be turned unto others, with their fields and wives together: for I will stretch out my hand upon the inhabitants of the land, saith the LORD. 
For from the least of them even unto the g
682,an an old and foolish king, who will no more be admonished. 
For out of prison he cometh to reign; whereas also he that is born in his kingdom becometh poor. 
I considered all the living which walk under the sun, with the second child that shall stand up in his stead. 
There is no end of all the people, even of all that have been before them: they also that come after shall not rejoice in him. Surely this also is vanity and vexation of spirit. 
Keep thy foot when thou goest to the house of God, and be more ready to hear, than to give the sacrifice of fools: for they consider not that they do evil. 
Be not rash with thy mouth, and let not thine heart be hasty to utter any th
542,ted seven days. 
So Saul died for his transgression which he committed against the LORD, even against the word of the LORD, which he kept not, and also for asking counsel of one that had a familiar spirit, to enquire of it; 
And enquired not of the LORD: therefore he slew him, and turned the kingdom unto David the son of Jesse. 
Then all Israel gathered themselves to David unto Hebron, saying, Behold, we are thy bone and thy flesh. 
And moreover in time past, even when Saul was king, thou wast he that leddest out and broughtest in Israe
707,y the word of the LORD. 
And the king answered and said unto the man of God, Intreat now the face of the LORD thy God, and pray for me, that my hand may be restored me again. And the man of God besought the LORD, and the king's hand was restored him again, and became as it was before. 
And the king said unto the man of God, Come home with me, and refresh thyself, and I will give thee a reward. 
And the man of God said unto the king, If thou wilt give me half thine house, I will not go in with thee, neither will I eat bread nor drink water in this place: 
For so was it charged me by the word of the LORD, saying, Eat no bread, nor drink water, nor turn again by the same way that thou camest. 
So he w
671,ear with thine ears all that I say unto thee concerning all the ordinances of the house of the LORD, and all the laws thereof; and mark well the entering in of the house, with every going forth of the sanctuary. 
And thou shalt say to the rebellious, even to the house of Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD; O ye house of Israel, let it suffice you of all your abominations, 
In that ye have brought into my sanctuary strangers, uncircumcised in heart, and uncircumcised in flesh, to be in my sanctuary, to pollute it, even my house, when ye offer my bread, the fat and the blood, and they have broken my covenant because of all your abominations. 
And ye have not kept the 
569,thee; 
And the light of a candle shall shine no more at all in thee; and the voice of the bridegroom and of the bride shall be heard no more at all in thee: for thy merchants were the great men of the earth; for by thy sorceries were all nations deceived. 
And in her was found the blood of prophets, and of saints, and of all that were slain upon the earth. 
And after these things I heard a great voice of much people in heaven, saying, Alleluia; Salvation, and glory, and honour, and power, unto the Lord our God: 
For true and righteous are his judgments: for he ha
551, 
As ye also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you a faithful minister of Christ; 
Who also declared unto us your love in the Spirit. 
For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to pray for you, and to desire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his will in all wisdom and spiritual understanding; 
That ye might walk worthy of the Lord unto all pleasing, being fruitful in every good work, and increasing in the knowledge of God; 
Strengthened with all might, according to his glorious power, unto a
715, years: 
And offer a sacrifice of thanksgiving with leaven, and proclaim and publish the free offerings: for this liketh you, O ye children of Israel, saith the Lord GOD. 
And I also have given you cleanness of teeth in all your cities, and want of bread in all your places: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD. 
And also I have withholden the rain from you, when there were yet three months to the harvest: and I caused it to rain upon one city, and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained upon, and the piece whereupon it rained not withered. 
So two or three cities wandered unto one city, to drink water; but they were not satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith th
540,on: 
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the other for a burnt offering, and make an atonement for him, for that he sinned by the dead, and shall hallow his head that same day. 
And he shall consecrate unto the LORD the days of his separation, and shall bring a lamb of the first year for a trespass offering: but the days that were before shall be lost, because his separation was defiled. 
And this is the law of the Nazarite, when the days of his separation are fulfilled: he shall be brought unto the door of the 
691,en unto me, as a wise masterbuilder, I have laid the foundation, and another buildeth thereon. But let every man take heed how he buildeth thereupon. 
For other foundation can no man lay than that is laid, which is Jesus Christ. 
Now if any man build upon this foundation gold, silver, precious stones, wood, hay, stubble; 
Every man's work shall be made manifest: for the day shall declare it, because it shall be revealed by fire; and the fire shall try every man's work of what sort it is. 
If any man's work abide which he hath built thereupon, he shall receive a reward. 
If any man's work shall be burned, he shall suffer loss: but he himself shall be saved; yet so as by fire. 
Know y
652, own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ask ye now among the heathen, who hath heard such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible thing. 
Will a man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall the cold flowing waters that come from another place be forsaken? 
Because my people hath forgotten me, they have burned incense to vanity, and they have caused them to stumble in their ways from the ancient paths, to walk in paths, in a way not cast up; 
To make their land desolate, and a perpetual hissing; every one that passeth thereby shall
530,f Goshen. 
And Pharaoh spake unto Joseph, saying, Thy father and thy brethren are come unto thee: 
The land of Egypt is before thee; in the best of the land make thy father and brethren to dwell; in the land of Goshen let them dwell: and if thou knowest any men of activity among them, then make them rulers over my cattle. 
And Joseph brought in Jacob his father, and set him before Pharaoh: and Jacob blessed Pharaoh. 
And Pharaoh said unto Jacob, How old art thou? 
And Jacob said unto Pharaoh, The days of the years of my pilg
492,belonged to Judah, to bring up thence the ark of God the LORD, that dwelleth between the cherubims, whose name is called on it. 
And they carried the ark of God in a new cart out of the house of Abinadab: and Uzza and Ahio drave the cart. 
And David and all Israel played before God with all their might, and with singing, and with harps, and with psalteries, and with timbrels, and with cymbals, and with trumpets. 
And when they came unto the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put forth his ha
708,Oh, not so, my LORD: 
Behold now, thy servant hath found grace in thy sight, and thou hast magnified thy mercy, which thou hast shewed unto me in saving my life; and I cannot escape to the mountain, lest some evil take me, and I die: 
Behold now, this city is near to flee unto, and it is a little one: Oh, let me escape thither, (is it not a little one?) and my soul shall live. 
And he said unto him, See, I have accepted thee concerning this thing also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou hast spoken. 
Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do anything till thou be come thither. Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar. 
The sun was risen upon the earth when Lot entered in
658,th Isaac and Jacob, the heirs with him of the same promise: 
For he looked for a city which hath foundations, whose builder and maker is God. 
Through faith also Sara herself received strength to conceive seed, and was delivered of a child when she was past age, because she judged him faithful who had promised. 
Therefore sprang there even of one, and him as good as dead, so many as the stars of the sky in multitude, and as the sand which is by the sea shore innumerable. 
These all died in faith, not having received the promises, but having seen them afar off, and were persuaded of them, and embraced them, and confessed that they were strangers and p
719,y fire: every one that toucheth them shall be holy. 
And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
This is the offering of Aaron and of his sons, which they shall offer unto the LORD in the day when he is anointed; the tenth part of an ephah of fine flour for a meat offering perpetual, half of it in the morning, and half thereof at night. 
In a pan it shall be made with oil; and when it is baken, thou shalt bring it in: and the baken pieces of the meat offering shalt thou offer for a sweet savour unto the LORD. 
And the priest of his sons that is anointed in his stead shall offer it: it is a statute for ever unto the LORD; it shall be wholly burnt. 
For every meat offering for the priest shall be wholly burnt: it sh
620, all his ways, and hatred in the house of his God. 
They have deeply corrupted themselves, as in the days of Gibeah: therefore he will remember their iniquity, he will visit their sins. 
I found Israel like grapes in the wilderness; I saw your fathers as the firstripe in the fig tree at her first time: but they went to Baalpeor, and separated themselves unto that shame; and their abominations were according as they loved. 
As for Ephraim, their glory shall fly away like a bird, from the birth, and from the womb, and from the conception. 
Though they bring up their children, yet will I bereave them, that there sha
555,rother's eye, but perceivest not the beam that is in thine own eye? 
Either how canst thou say to thy brother, Brother, let me pull out the mote that is in thine eye, when thou thyself beholdest not the beam that is in thine own eye? Thou hypocrite, cast out first the beam out of thine own eye, and then shalt thou see clearly to pull out the mote that is in thy brother's eye. 
For a good tree bringeth not forth corrupt fruit; neither doth a corrupt tree bring forth good fruit. 
For every tree is known by his own fruit. For of thorns men do not gathe
622, and nations, and tongues, and kings. 
And there was given me a reed like unto a rod: and the angel stood, saying, Rise, and measure the temple of God, and the altar, and them that worship therein. 
But the court which is without the temple leave out, and measure it not; for it is given unto the Gentiles: and the holy city shall they tread under foot forty and two months. 
And I will give power unto my two witnesses, and they shall prophesy a thousand two hundred and threescore days, clothed in sackcloth. 
These are the two olive trees, and the two candlesticks standing before the God of the earth. 
And if any man 
548, shall no man living be justified. 
For the enemy hath persecuted my soul; he hath smitten my life down to the ground; he hath made me to dwell in darkness, as those that have been long dead. 
Therefore is my spirit overwhelmed within me; my heart within me is desolate. 
I remember the days of old; I meditate on all thy works; I muse on the work of thy hands. 
I stretch forth my hands unto thee: my soul thirsteth after thee, as a thirsty land. Selah. 
Hear me speedily, O LORD: my spirit faileth: hide not thy face from me, lest I be like unto 
664,unto the LORD with my voice; with my voice unto the LORD did I make my supplication. 
I poured out my complaint before him; I shewed before him my trouble. 
When my spirit was overwhelmed within me, then thou knewest my path. In the way wherein I walked have they privily laid a snare for me. 
I looked on my right hand, and beheld, but there was no man that would know me: refuge failed me; no man cared for my soul. 
I cried unto thee, O LORD: I said, Thou art my refuge and my portion in the land of the living. 
Attend unto my cry; for I am brought very low: deliver me from my persecutors; for they are stronger than I. 
Bring my soul out of prison, that I ma
517,n prayer and supplication, with the women, and Mary the mother of Jesus, and with his brethren. 
And in those days Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples, and said, (the number of names together were about an hundred and twenty,) 
Men and brethren, this scripture must needs have been fulfilled, which the Holy Ghost by the mouth of David spake before concerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus. 
For he was numbered with us, and had obtained part of this ministry. 
Now this man purchased a fiel
512,ame was Shimei, the son of Gera: he came forth, and cursed still as he came. 
And he cast stones at David, and at all the servants of king David: and all the people and all the mighty men were on his right hand and on his left. 
And thus said Shimei when he cursed, Come out, come out, thou bloody man, and thou man of Belial: 
The LORD hath returned upon thee all the blood of the house of Saul, in whose stead thou hast reigned; and the LORD hath delivered the kingdom into the hand of Absalom thy son: and, be
672,n before the house of God, there assembled unto him out of Israel a very great congregation of men and women and children: for the people wept very sore. 
And Shechaniah the son of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam, answered and said unto Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, and have taken strange wives of the people of the land: yet now there is hope in Israel concerning this thing. 
Now therefore let us make a covenant with our God to put away all the wives, and such as are born of them, according to the counsel of my lord, and of those that tremble at the commandment of our God; and let it be done according to the law. 
Arise; for this matter belongeth unto 
586,and in great wrath; and I will bring them again unto this place, and I will cause them to dwell safely: 
And they shall be my people, and I will be their God: 
And I will give them one heart, and one way, that they may fear me for ever, for the good of them, and of their children after them: 
And I will make an everlasting covenant with them, that I will not turn away from them, to do them good; but I will put my fear in their hearts, that they shall not depart from me. 
Yea, I will rejoice over them to do them good, and I will plant them in this land assuredly with my whole hear
611, assembly to the LORD thy God: thou shalt do no work therein. 
Seven weeks shalt thou number unto thee: begin to number the seven weeks from such time as thou beginnest to put the sickle to the corn. 
And thou shalt keep the feast of weeks unto the LORD thy God with a tribute of a freewill offering of thine hand, which thou shalt give unto the LORD thy God, according as the LORD thy God hath blessed thee: 
And thou shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and thy maidservant, and the Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the fatherle
588,ber, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, and his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the sixth day eight bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first year without blemish: 
And their meat offering and their drink offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the manner: 
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his meat offering, and his drink offering. 
And on the seventh day seven bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the
600, than they whom the children of Israel slew with the sword. 
Then spake Joshua to the LORD in the day when the LORD delivered up the Amorites before the children of Israel, and he said in the sight of Israel, Sun, stand thou still upon Gibeon; and thou, Moon, in the valley of Ajalon. 
And the sun stood still, and the moon stayed, until the people had avenged themselves upon their enemies. Is not this written in the book of Jasher? So the sun stood still in the midst of heaven, and hasted not to go down about a whole day. 
And there was no day like that before it or after it, that the LORD hear
552,they. 
Then all the multitude kept silence, and gave audience to Barnabas and Paul, declaring what miracles and wonders God had wrought among the Gentiles by them. 
And after they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Men and brethren, hearken unto me: 
Simeon hath declared how God at the first did visit the Gentiles, to take out of them a people for his name. 
And to this agree the words of the prophets; as it is written, 
After this I will return, and will build again the tabernacle of David, which is fallen down; and I will build again
692,. 
From the uttermost part of the earth have we heard songs, even glory to the righteous. But I said, My leanness, my leanness, woe unto me! the treacherous dealers have dealt treacherously; yea, the treacherous dealers have dealt very treacherously. 
Fear, and the pit, and the snare, are upon thee, O inhabitant of the earth. 
And it shall come to pass, that he who fleeth from the noise of the fear shall fall into the pit; and he that cometh up out of the midst of the pit shall be taken in the snare: for the windows from on high are open, and the foundations of the earth do shake. 
The earth is utterly broken down, the earth is clean dissolved, the earth is moved exceedingly. 
The ea
599,riest, which stood above the people, and said unto them, Thus saith God, Why transgress ye the commandments of the LORD, that ye cannot prosper? because ye have forsaken the LORD, he hath also forsaken you. 
And they conspired against him, and stoned him with stones at the commandment of the king in the court of the house of the LORD. 
Thus Joash the king remembered not the kindness which Jehoiada his father had done to him, but slew his son. And when he died, he said, The LORD look upon it, and require it. 
And it came to pass at the end of the year, that the host of Syria came up against hi
662, against me, and makest me to possess the iniquities of my youth. 
Thou puttest my feet also in the stocks, and lookest narrowly unto all my paths; thou settest a print upon the heels of my feet. 
And he, as a rotten thing, consumeth, as a garment that is moth eaten. 
Man that is born of a woman is of few days and full of trouble. 
He cometh forth like a flower, and is cut down: he fleeth also as a shadow, and continueth not. 
And doth thou open thine eyes upon such an one, and bringest me into judgment with thee? 
Who can bring a clean thing out of an unclean? not one. 
Seeing his days are determined, the number of his months are with thee, thou hast ap
506, and the law of the LORD is with us? Lo, certainly in vain made he it; the pen of the scribes is in vain. 
The wise men are ashamed, they are dismayed and taken: lo, they have rejected the word of the LORD; and what wisdom is in them? 
Therefore will I give their wives unto others, and their fields to them that shall inherit them: for every one from the least even unto the greatest is given to covetousness, from the prophet even unto the priest every one dealeth falsely. 
For they have healed the hurt
686,ns gathered together: the LORD of hosts mustereth the host of the battle. 
They come from a far country, from the end of heaven, even the LORD, and the weapons of his indignation, to destroy the whole land. 
Howl ye; for the day of the LORD is at hand; it shall come as a destruction from the Almighty. 
Therefore shall all hands be faint, and every man's heart shall melt: 
And they shall be afraid: pangs and sorrows shall take hold of them; they shall be in pain as a woman that travaileth: they shall be amazed one at another; their faces shall be as flames. 
Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, cruel both with wrath and fierce anger, to lay the land desolate: and he shall destroy
670, and all manner of disease among the people. 
And his fame went throughout all Syria: and they brought unto him all sick people that were taken with divers diseases and torments, and those which were possessed with devils, and those which were lunatick, and those that had the palsy; and he healed them. 
And there followed him great multitudes of people from Galilee, and from Decapolis, and from Jerusalem, and from Judaea, and from beyond Jordan. 
And seeing the multitudes, he went up into a mountain: and when he was set, his disciples came unto him: 
And he opened his mouth, and taught them, saying, 
Blessed are the poor in spirit: for theirs is the kingdom of h
484,ORD, for their iniquity, and the land of the Chaldeans, and will make it perpetual desolations. 
And I will bring upon that land all my words which I have pronounced against it, even all that is written in this book, which Jeremiah hath prophesied against all the nations. 
For many nations and great kings shall serve themselves of them also: and I will recompense them according to their deeds, and according to the works of their own hands. 
For thus saith the LORD God of Israel u
656,y is at hand: let us therefore cast off the works of darkness, and let us put on the armour of light. 
Let us walk honestly, as in the day; not in rioting and drunkenness, not in chambering and wantonness, not in strife and envying. 
But put ye on the Lord Jesus Christ, and make not provision for the flesh, to fulfil the lusts thereof. 
Him that is weak in the faith receive ye, but not to doubtful disputations. 
For one believeth that he may eat all things: another, who is weak, eateth herbs. 
Let not him that eateth despise him that eateth not; and let not him which eateth not judge him that eateth: for God hath received him. 
Who art thou that ju
613,ther thee to thy fathers, and thou shalt be gathered to thy grave in peace, neither shall thine eyes see all the evil that I will bring upon this place, and upon the inhabitants of the same. So they brought the king word again. 
Then the king sent and gathered together all the elders of Judah and Jerusalem. 
And the king went up into the house of the LORD, and all the men of Judah, and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and the priests, and the Levites, and all the people, great and small: and he read in their ears all the words of the book of the covenant that was found in the house of the LORD. 
And the king 
553, be granted thee: or what is thy request further? and it shall be done. 
Then said Esther, If it please the king, let it be granted to the Jews which are in Shushan to do to morrow also according unto this day's decree, and let Haman's ten sons be hanged upon the gallows. 
And the king commanded it so to be done: and the decree was given at Shushan; and they hanged Haman's ten sons. 
For the Jews that were in Shushan gathered themselves together on the fourteenth day also of the month Adar, and slew three hundred men at Shushan; but on the prey th
653,can bear. 
Behold, thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the earth; and from thy face shall I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive and a vagabond in the earth; and it shall come to pass, that every one that findeth me shall slay me. 
And the LORD said unto him, Therefore whosoever slayeth Cain, vengeance shall be taken on him sevenfold. And the LORD set a mark upon Cain, lest any finding him should kill him. 
And Cain went out from the presence of the LORD, and dwelt in the land of Nod, on the east of Eden. 
And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name 
584,oth living, and in his wrath. 
The righteous shall rejoice when he seeth the vengeance: he shall wash his feet in the blood of the wicked. 
So that a man shall say, Verily there is a reward for the righteous: verily he is a God that judgeth in the earth. 
Deliver me from mine enemies, O my God: defend me from them that rise up against me. 
Deliver me from the workers of iniquity, and save me from bloody men. 
For, lo, they lie in wait for my soul: the mighty are gathered against me; not for my transgression, nor for my sin, O LORD. 
They run and prepare themselves without my fa
569, with death, and with the beasts of the earth. 
And when he had opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the souls of them that were slain for the word of God, and for the testimony which they held: 
And they cried with a loud voice, saying, How long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and avenge our blood on them that dwell on the earth? 
And white robes were given unto every one of them; and it was said unto them, that they should rest yet for a little season, until their fellowservants also and their brethren, that should be killed as they were, sh
710,gainst Jerusalem to battle; and the city shall be taken, and the houses rifled, and the women ravished; and half of the city shall go forth into captivity, and the residue of the people shall not be cut off from the city. 
Then shall the LORD go forth, and fight against those nations, as when he fought in the day of battle. 
And his feet shall stand in that day upon the mount of Olives, which is before Jerusalem on the east, and the mount of Olives shall cleave in the midst thereof toward the east and toward the west, and there shall be a very great valley; and half of the mountain shall remove toward the north, and half of it toward the south. 
And ye shall flee to the valley of the mountains; for th
684,ot repent, Thou art a priest for ever after the order of Melchizedek. 
The Lord at thy right hand shall strike through kings in the day of his wrath. 
He shall judge among the heathen, he shall fill the places with the dead bodies; he shall wound the heads over many countries. 
He shall drink of the brook in the way: therefore shall he lift up the head. 
Praise ye the LORD. I will praise the LORD with my whole heart, in the assembly of the upright, and in the congregation. 
The works of the LORD are great, sought out of all them that have pleasure therein. 
His work is honourable and glorious: and his righteousness endureth for ever. 
He hath made his wonderful works to be re
541, that they went through the midst of the sea on the dry land; and their persecutors thou threwest into the deeps, as a stone into the mighty waters. 
Moreover thou leddest them in the day by a cloudy pillar; and in the night by a pillar of fire, to give them light in the way wherein they should go. 
Thou camest down also upon mount Sinai, and spakest with them from heaven, and gavest them right judgments, and true laws, good statutes and commandments: 
And madest known unto them thy holy sabbath, and commandedst them precepts, statutes
536, all generations. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LORD: for it is good to sing praises unto our God; for it is pleasant; and praise is comely. 
The LORD doth build up Jerusalem: he gathereth together the outcasts of Israel. 
He healeth the broken in heart, and bindeth up their wounds. 
He telleth the number of the stars; he calleth them all by their names. 
Great is our Lord, and of great power: his understanding is infinite. 
The LORD lifteth up the meek: he casteth the wicked down to the ground. 
Sing unto the LORD with thank
609,itfully: for he shall come up, and shall become strong with a small people. 
He shall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the province; and he shall do that which his fathers have not done, nor his fathers' fathers; he shall scatter among them the prey, and spoil, and riches: yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong holds, even for a time. 
And he shall stir up his power and his courage against the king of the south with a great army; and the king of the south shall be stirred up to battle with a very great and mighty army; but he shall not stand: for they shall forecast de
663,ell straightway all along on the earth, and was sore afraid, because of the words of Samuel: and there was no strength in him; for he had eaten no bread all the day, nor all the night. 
And the woman came unto Saul, and saw that he was sore troubled, and said unto him, Behold, thine handmaid hath obeyed thy voice, and I have put my life in my hand, and have hearkened unto thy words which thou spakest unto me. 
Now therefore, I pray thee, hearken thou also unto the voice of thine handmaid, and let me set a morsel of bread before thee; and eat, that thou mayest have strength, when thou goest on thy way. 
But he refused, and said, I will not eat. But his ser
606,on high are open, and the foundations of the earth do shake. 
The earth is utterly broken down, the earth is clean dissolved, the earth is moved exceedingly. 
The earth shall reel to and fro like a drunkard, and shall be removed like a cottage; and the transgression thereof shall be heavy upon it; and it shall fall, and not rise again. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that the LORD shall punish the host of the high ones that are on high, and the kings of the earth upon the earth. 
And they shall be gathered together, as prisoners are gathered in the pit, and shall be shut up in the prison, an
675, the Medes, 
And all the kings of the north, far and near, one with another, and all the kingdoms of the world, which are upon the face of the earth: and the king of Sheshach shall drink after them. 
Therefore thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Drink ye, and be drunken, and spue, and fall, and rise no more, because of the sword which I will send among you. 
And it shall be, if they refuse to take the cup at thine hand to drink, then shalt thou say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Ye shall certainly drink. 
For, lo, I begin to bring evil on the city which is called by my name, and should ye be utterly unpunished? Ye shal
520,butter and honey shall every one eat that is left in the land. 
And it shall come to pass in that day, that every place shall be, where there were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, it shall even be for briers and thorns. 
With arrows and with bows shall men come thither; because all the land shall become briers and thorns. 
And on all hills that shall be digged with the mattock, there shall not come thither the fear of briers and thorns: but it shall be for the sending forth of oxen, and for the treading 
546,? I will call unto the LORD, and he shall send thunder and rain; that ye may perceive and see that your wickedness is great, which ye have done in the sight of the LORD, in asking you a king. 
So Samuel called unto the LORD; and the LORD sent thunder and rain that day: and all the people greatly feared the LORD and Samuel. 
And all the people said unto Samuel, Pray for thy servants unto the LORD thy God, that we die not: for we have added unto all our sins this evil, to ask us a king. 
And Samuel said unto the people, Fear not: ye have done
481,together in the house of God, within the temple, and let us shut the doors of the temple: for they will come to slay thee; yea, in the night will they come to slay thee. 
And I said, Should such a man as I flee? and who is there, that, being as I am, would go into the temple to save his life? I will not go in. 
And, lo, I perceived that God had not sent him; but that he pronounced this prophecy against me: for Tobiah and Sanballat had hired him. 
Therefore was he hired, that I
536,unto him, What is this dream that thou hast dreamed? Shall I and thy mother and thy brethren indeed come to bow down ourselves to thee to the earth? 
And his brethren envied him; but his father observed the saying. 
And his brethren went to feed their father's flock in Shechem. 
And Israel said unto Joseph, Do not thy brethren feed the flock in Shechem? come, and I will send thee unto them. And he said to him, Here am I. 
And he said to him, Go, I pray thee, see whether it be well with thy brethren, and well with the flocks; and b
621,I cast out devils, and I do cures to day and to morrow, and the third day I shall be perfected. 
Nevertheless I must walk to day, and to morrow, and the day following: for it cannot be that a prophet perish out of Jerusalem. 
O Jerusalem, Jerusalem, which killest the prophets, and stonest them that are sent unto thee; how often would I have gathered thy children together, as a hen doth gather her brood under her wings, and ye would not! 
Behold, your house is left unto you desolate: and verily I say unto you, Ye shall not see me, until the time come when ye shall say, Blessed is he that cometh in the name of the L
606,servants the prophets, rising early and sending them; but ye have not hearkened, nor inclined your ear to hear. 
They said, Turn ye again now every one from his evil way, and from the evil of your doings, and dwell in the land that the LORD hath given unto you and to your fathers for ever and ever: 
And go not after other gods to serve them, and to worship them, and provoke me not to anger with the works of your hands; and I will do you no hurt. 
Yet ye have not hearkened unto me, saith the LORD; that ye might provoke me to anger with the works of your hands to your own hurt. 
Therefore thus saith t
518,efore ye are cursed, and there shall none of you be freed from being bondmen, and hewers of wood and drawers of water for the house of my God. 
And they answered Joshua, and said, Because it was certainly told thy servants, how that the LORD thy God commanded his servant Moses to give you all the land, and to destroy all the inhabitants of the land from before you, therefore we were sore afraid of our lives because of you, and have done this thing. 
And now, behold, we are in thine hand: as it seemeth good and ri
696, dungeon; and he is like to die for hunger in the place where he is: for there is no more bread in the city. 
Then the king commanded Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, saying, Take from hence thirty men with thee, and take up Jeremiah the prophet out of the dungeon, before he die. 
So Ebedmelech took the men with him, and went into the house of the king under the treasury, and took thence old cast clouts and old rotten rags, and let them down by cords into the dungeon to Jeremiah. 
And Ebedmelech the Ethiopian said unto Jeremiah, Put now these old cast clouts and rotten rags under thine armholes under the cords. And Jeremiah did so. 
So they drew up Jeremiah with cords, and took him up out of th
536,r own tongue to fall upon themselves: all that see them shall flee away. 
And all men shall fear, and shall declare the work of God; for they shall wisely consider of his doing. 
The righteous shall be glad in the LORD, and shall trust in him; and all the upright in heart shall glory. 
Praise waiteth for thee, O God, in Sion: and unto thee shall the vow be performed. 
O thou that hearest prayer, unto thee shall all flesh come. 
Iniquities prevail against me: as for our transgressions, thou shalt purge them away. 
Blessed is the ma
554, done this thing: and my lord is wise, according to the wisdom of an angel of God, to know all things that are in the earth. 
And the king said unto Joab, Behold now, I have done this thing: go therefore, bring the young man Absalom again. 
And Joab fell to the ground on his face, and bowed himself, and thanked the king: and Joab said, To day thy servant knoweth that I have found grace in thy sight, my lord, O king, in that the king hath fulfilled the request of his servant. 
So Joab arose and went to Geshur, and brought Absalom to Jerusalem. 
And 
579, lion in the way; a lion is in the streets. 
As the door turneth upon his hinges, so doth the slothful upon his bed. 
The slothful hideth his hand in his bosom; it grieveth him to bring it again to his mouth. 
The sluggard is wiser in his own conceit than seven men that can render a reason. 
He that passeth by, and meddleth with strife belonging not to him, is like one that taketh a dog by the ears. 
As a mad man who casteth firebrands, arrows, and death, 
So is the man that deceiveth his neighbour, and saith, Am not I in sport? 
Where no wood is, there the fire goeth out:
521,arvellous things against the God of gods, and shall prosper till the indignation be accomplished: for that that is determined shall be done. 
Neither shall he regard the God of his fathers, nor the desire of women, nor regard any god: for he shall magnify himself above all. 
But in his estate shall he honour the God of forces: and a god whom his fathers knew not shall he honour with gold, and silver, and with precious stones, and pleasant things. 
Thus shall he do in the most strong holds with a strange god, whom he
593, not cure him. 
Then Jesus answered and said, O faithless and perverse generation, how long shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him hither to me. 
And Jesus rebuked the devil; and he departed out of him: and the child was cured from that very hour. 
Then came the disciples to Jesus apart, and said, Why could not we cast him out? 
And Jesus said unto them, Because of your unbelief: for verily I say unto you, If ye have faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye shall say unto this mountain, Remove hence to yonder place; and it shall remove; and nothing shall be impossible u
495,pour it out upon the children abroad, and upon the assembly of young men together: for even the husband with the wife shall be taken, the aged with him that is full of days. 
And their houses shall be turned unto others, with their fields and wives together: for I will stretch out my hand upon the inhabitants of the land, saith the LORD. 
For from the least of them even unto the greatest of them every one is given to covetousness; and from the prophet even unto the priest every one dealeth 
598,ace be unto you. 
But they were terrified and affrighted, and supposed that they had seen a spirit. 
And he said unto them, Why are ye troubled? and why do thoughts arise in your hearts? 
Behold my hands and my feet, that it is I myself: handle me, and see; for a spirit hath not flesh and bones, as ye see me have. 
And when he had thus spoken, he shewed them his hands and his feet. 
And while they yet believed not for joy, and wondered, he said unto them, Have ye here any meat? 
And they gave him a piece of a broiled fish, and of an honeycomb. 
And he took it, and did eat before them. 
And h
540, LORD, Hast thou killed, and also taken possession? And thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, In the place where dogs licked the blood of Naboth shall dogs lick thy blood, even thine. 
And Ahab said to Elijah, Hast thou found me, O mine enemy? And he answered, I have found thee: because thou hast sold thyself to work evil in the sight of the LORD. 
Behold, I will bring evil upon thee, and will take away thy posterity, and will cut off from Ahab him that pisseth against the wall, and him that is shut up and left in Is
634,them, and the LORD is with us: fear them not. 
But all the congregation bade stone them with stones. And the glory of the LORD appeared in the tabernacle of the congregation before all the children of Israel. 
And the LORD said unto Moses, How long will this people provoke me? and how long will it be ere they believe me, for all the signs which I have shewed among them? 
I will smite them with the pestilence, and disinherit them, and will make of thee a greater nation and mightier than they. 
And Moses said unto the LORD, Then the Egyptians shall hear it, (for thou broughtest up this people in thy might from among them;) 
And 
613,ail in the midst thereof; and I will destroy the counsel thereof: and they shall seek to the idols, and to the charmers, and to them that have familiar spirits, and to the wizards. 
And the Egyptians will I give over into the hand of a cruel lord; and a fierce king shall rule over them, saith the Lord, the LORD of hosts. 
And the waters shall fail from the sea, and the river shall be wasted and dried up. 
And they shall turn the rivers far away; and the brooks of defence shall be emptied and dried up: the reeds and flags shall wither. 
The paper reeds by the brooks, by the mouth of the brooks, and every th
550,I make thine enemies thy footstool? 
Are they not all ministering spirits, sent forth to minister for them who shall be heirs of salvation? 
Therefore we ought to give the more earnest heed to the things which we have heard, lest at any time we should let them slip. 
For if the word spoken by angels was stedfast, and every transgression and disobedience received a just recompence of reward; 
How shall we escape, if we neglect so great salvation; which at the first began to be spoken by the Lord, and was confirmed unto us by them that heard him;
695,nd the first last: for many be called, but few chosen. 
And Jesus going up to Jerusalem took the twelve disciples apart in the way, and said unto them, 
Behold, we go up to Jerusalem; and the Son of man shall be betrayed unto the chief priests and unto the scribes, and they shall condemn him to death, 
And shall deliver him to the Gentiles to mock, and to scourge, and to crucify him: and the third day he shall rise again. 
Then came to him the mother of Zebedees children with her sons, worshipping him, and desiring a certain thing of him. 
And he said unto her, What wilt thou? She saith unto him, Grant that these my two sons may sit, the one on thy right hand, and the other on the left,
644,not depart. 
For though ye had smitten the whole army of the Chaldeans that fight against you, and there remained but wounded men among them, yet should they rise up every man in his tent, and burn this city with fire. 
And it came to pass, that when the army of the Chaldeans was broken up from Jerusalem for fear of Pharaoh's army, 
Then Jeremiah went forth out of Jerusalem to go into the land of Benjamin, to separate himself thence in the midst of the people. 
And when he was in the gate of Benjamin, a captain of the ward was there, whose name was Irijah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of Hananiah; and he took Jeremiah the prophet, sayi
567,the commandments. 
He saith unto him, Which? Jesus said, Thou shalt do no murder, Thou shalt not commit adultery, Thou shalt not steal, Thou shalt not bear false witness, 
Honour thy father and thy mother: and, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself. 
The young man saith unto him, All these things have I kept from my youth up: what lack I yet? 
Jesus said unto him, If thou wilt be perfect, go and sell that thou hast, and give to the poor, and thou shalt have treasure in heaven: and come and follow me. 
But when the young man heard that saying, he went away so
668, mine oil. 
And a voice of a multitude being at ease was with her: and with the men of the common sort were brought Sabeans from the wilderness, which put bracelets upon their hands, and beautiful crowns upon their heads. 
Then said I unto her that was old in adulteries, Will they now commit whoredoms with her, and she with them? 
Yet they went in unto her, as they go in unto a woman that playeth the harlot: so went they in unto Aholah and unto Aholibah, the lewd women. 
And the righteous men, they shall judge them after the manner of adulteresses, and after the manner of women that shed blood; because they are adulteresses, and blood is in their hands. 
For t
581,e kings of the earth thy glory. 
When the LORD shall build up Zion, he shall appear in his glory. 
He will regard the prayer of the destitute, and not despise their prayer. 
This shall be written for the generation to come: and the people which shall be created shall praise the LORD. 
For he hath looked down from the height of his sanctuary; from heaven did the LORD behold the earth; 
To hear the groaning of the prisoner; to loose those that are appointed to death; 
To declare the name of the LORD in Zion, and his praise in Jerusalem; 
When the people are gathered together, 
706,e ceased, saying, The will of the Lord be done. 
And after those days we took up our carriages, and went up to Jerusalem. 
There went with us also certain of the disciples of Caesarea, and brought with them one Mnason of Cyprus, an old disciple, with whom we should lodge. 
And when we were come to Jerusalem, the brethren received us gladly. 
And the day following Paul went in with us unto James; and all the elders were present. 
And when he had saluted them, he declared particularly what things God had wrought among the Gentiles by his ministry. 
And when they heard it, they glorified the Lord, and said unto him, Thou seest, brother, how many thousands of Jews there are which believe; and they are
586,bernacle of the congregation, they shall wash with water, that they die not; or when they come near to the altar to minister, to burn offering made by fire unto the LORD: 
So they shall wash their hands and their feet, that they die not: and it shall be a statute for ever to them, even to him and to his seed throughout their generations. 
Moreover the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 
Take thou also unto thee principal spices, of pure myrrh five hundred shekels, and of sweet cinnamon half so much, even two hundred and fifty shekels, and of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty shekel
531,ssion, and for violence, to do it. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD concerning Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah; They shall not lament for him, saying, Ah my brother! or, Ah sister! they shall not lament for him, saying, Ah lord! or, Ah his glory! 
He shall be buried with the burial of an ass, drawn and cast forth beyond the gates of Jerusalem. 
Go up to Lebanon, and cry; and lift up thy voice in Bashan, and cry from the passages: for all thy lovers are destroyed. 
I spake unto thee in thy prosperity; but thou saidst, 
665,: and there he died before God. 
And David was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon Uzza: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day. 
And David was afraid of God that day, saying, How shall I bring the ark of God home to me? 
So David brought not the ark home to himself to the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of Obededom the Gittite. 
And the ark of God remained with the family of Obededom in his house three months. And the LORD blessed the house of Obededom, and all that he had. 
Now Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and timber of cedars, with masons and carpenters, to build him an house. 
And David pe
484,? 
I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all likewise perish. 
He spake also this parable; A certain man had a fig tree planted in his vineyard; and he came and sought fruit thereon, and found none. 
Then said he unto the dresser of his vineyard, Behold, these three years I come seeking fruit on this fig tree, and find none: cut it down; why cumbereth it the ground? 
And he answering said unto him, Lord, let it alone this year also, till I shall dig about it, and dung 
628,hem: yet when they returned, and cried unto thee, thou heardest them from heaven; and many times didst thou deliver them according to thy mercies; 
And testifiedst against them, that thou mightest bring them again unto thy law: yet they dealt proudly, and hearkened not unto thy commandments, but sinned against thy judgments, (which if a man do, he shall live in them;) and withdrew the shoulder, and hardened their neck, and would not hear. 
Yet many years didst thou forbear them, and testifiedst against them by thy spirit in thy prophets: yet would they not give ear: therefore gavest thou them into the hand of the people 
634,hat hath the God of Jacob for his help, whose hope is in the LORD his God: 
Which made heaven, and earth, the sea, and all that therein is: which keepeth truth for ever: 
Which executeth judgment for the oppressed: which giveth food to the hungry. The LORD looseth the prisoners: 
The LORD openeth the eyes of the blind: the LORD raiseth them that are bowed down: the LORD loveth the righteous: 
The LORD preserveth the strangers; he relieveth the fatherless and widow: but the way of the wicked he turneth upside down. 
The LORD shall reign for ever, even thy God, O Zion, unto all generations. Praise ye the LORD. 
Praise ye the LOR
519,and taught them, saying, 
Blessed are the poor in spirit: for theirs is the kingdom of heaven. 
Blessed are they that mourn: for they shall be comforted. 
Blessed are the meek: for they shall inherit the earth. 
Blessed are they which do hunger and thirst after righteousness: for they shall be filled. 
Blessed are the merciful: for they shall obtain mercy. 
Blessed are the pure in heart: for they shall see God. 
Blessed are the peacemakers: for they shall be called the children of God. 
Blessed are they which are 
559,when he came, I was afraid, and fell upon my face: but he said unto me, Understand, O son of man: for at the time of the end shall be the vision. 
Now as he was speaking with me, I was in a deep sleep on my face toward the ground: but he touched me, and set me upright. 
And he said, Behold, I will make thee know what shall be in the last end of the indignation: for at the time appointed the end shall be. 
The ram which thou sawest having two horns are the kings of Media and Persia. 
And the rough goat is the king of Grecia: and the great horn that is be
688,t unto the plain of Zaanaim, which is by Kedesh. 
And they shewed Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up to mount Tabor. 
And Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred chariots of iron, and all the people that were with him, from Harosheth of the Gentiles unto the river of Kishon. 
And Deborah said unto Barak, Up; for this is the day in which the LORD hath delivered Sisera into thine hand: is not the LORD gone out before thee? So Barak went down from mount Tabor, and ten thousand men after him. 
And the LORD discomfited Sisera, and all his chariots, and all his host, with the edge of the sword before Barak; so that Sisera lighted down off his chariot,
586,ken for you: this do in remembrance of me. 
After the same manner also he took the cup, when he had supped, saying, this cup is the new testament in my blood: this do ye, as oft as ye drink it, in remembrance of me. 
For as often as ye eat this bread, and drink this cup, ye do shew the Lord's death till he come. 
Wherefore whosoever shall eat this bread, and drink this cup of the Lord, unworthily, shall be guilty of the body and blood of the Lord. 
But let a man examine himself, and so let him eat of that bread, and drink of that cup. 
For he that eateth and drinketh unworthily, 
712,o the LORD; two lambs of the first year without spot day by day, for a continual burnt offering. 
The one lamb shalt thou offer in the morning, and the other lamb shalt thou offer at even; 
And a tenth part of an ephah of flour for a meat offering, mingled with the fourth part of an hin of beaten oil. 
It is a continual burnt offering, which was ordained in mount Sinai for a sweet savour, a sacrifice made by fire unto the LORD. 
And the drink offering thereof shall be the fourth part of an hin for the one lamb: in the holy place shalt thou cause the strong wine to be poured unto the LORD for a drink offering. 
And the other lamb shalt thou offer at even: as the meat offering of the morning, and as the d
635, do thy work, and on the seventh day thou shalt rest: that thine ox and thine ass may rest, and the son of thy handmaid, and the stranger, may be refreshed. 
And in all things that I have said unto you be circumspect: and make no mention of the name of other gods, neither let it be heard out of thy mouth. 
Three times thou shalt keep a feast unto me in the year. 
Thou shalt keep the feast of unleavened bread: (thou shalt eat unleavened bread seven days, as I commanded thee, in the time appointed of the month Abib; for in it thou camest out from Egypt: and none shall appear before me empty:) 
And the feast of harvest, the firstf
583,hot, and he cast the tables out of his hands, and brake them beneath the mount. 
And he took the calf which they had made, and burnt it in the fire, and ground it to powder, and strawed it upon the water, and made the children of Israel drink of it. 
And Moses said unto Aaron, What did this people unto thee, that thou hast brought so great a sin upon them? 
And Aaron said, Let not the anger of my lord wax hot: thou knowest the people, that they are set on mischief. 
For they said unto me, Make us gods, which shall go before us: for as for this Moses, the man that brought us up
492,the land of the living. 
There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all of them slain, fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised into the nether parts of the earth, which caused their terror in the land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go down to the pit. 
They have set her a bed in the midst of the slain with all her multitude: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword: though their terror was 
699,hath set some in the church, first apostles, secondarily prophets, thirdly teachers, after that miracles, then gifts of healings, helps, governments, diversities of tongues. 
Are all apostles? are all prophets? are all teachers? are all workers of miracles? 
Have all the gifts of healing? do all speak with tongues? do all interpret? 
But covet earnestly the best gifts: and yet shew I unto you a more excellent way. 
Though I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, and have not charity, I am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal. 
And though I have the gift of prophecy, and understand all mysteries, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I could remove mountains
605,heir king; and shall fear the LORD and his goodness in the latter days. 
Hear the word of the LORD, ye children of Israel: for the LORD hath a controversy with the inhabitants of the land, because there is no truth, nor mercy, nor knowledge of God in the land. 
By swearing, and lying, and killing, and stealing, and committing adultery, they break out, and blood toucheth blood. 
Therefore shall the land mourn, and every one that dwelleth therein shall languish, with the beasts of the field, and with the fowls of heaven; yea, the fishes of the sea also shall be taken away. 
Yet let no man strive, nor
675,s of the house of their fathers, mighty men of valour, was twenty thousand and two hundred. 
The sons also of Jediael; Bilhan: and the sons of Bilhan; Jeush, and Benjamin, and Ehud, and Chenaanah, and Zethan, and Tharshish, and Ahishahar. 
All these the sons of Jediael, by the heads of their fathers, mighty men of valour, were seventeen thousand and two hundred soldiers, fit to go out for war and battle. 
Shuppim also, and Huppim, the children of Ir, and Hushim, the sons of Aher. 
The sons of Naphtali; Jahziel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shallum, the sons of Bilhah. 
The sons of Manasseh; Ashriel, whom she bare: (but his concubine the Aramitess bare Machir the father o
698,t of those that rise up against thee increaseth continually. 
Unto thee, O God, do we give thanks, unto thee do we give thanks: for that thy name is near thy wondrous works declare. 
When I shall receive the congregation I will judge uprightly. 
The earth and all the inhabitants thereof are dissolved: I bear up the pillars of it. Selah. 
I said unto the fools, Deal not foolishly: and to the wicked, Lift not up the horn: 
Lift not up your horn on high: speak not with a stiff neck. 
For promotion cometh neither from the east, nor from the west, nor from the south. 
But God is the judge: he putteth down one, and setteth up another. 
For in the hand of the LORD there is a cup, and the wine is 
677,king's manner toward all that knew law and judgment: 
And the next unto him was Carshena, Shethar, Admatha, Tarshish, Meres, Marsena, and Memucan, the seven princes of Persia and Media, which saw the king's face, and which sat the first in the kingdom;) 
What shall we do unto the queen Vashti according to law, because she hath not performed the commandment of the king Ahasuerus by the chamberlains? 
And Memucan answered before the king and the princes, Vashti the queen hath not done wrong to the king only, but also to all the princes, and to all the people that are in all the provinces of the king Ahasuerus. 
For this deed of the queen shall come abroad unto all women,
691,God saw that the wickedness of man was great in the earth, and that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was only evil continually. 
And it repented the LORD that he had made man on the earth, and it grieved him at his heart. 
And the LORD said, I will destroy man whom I have created from the face of the earth; both man, and beast, and the creeping thing, and the fowls of the air; for it repenteth me that I have made them. 
But Noah found grace in the eyes of the LORD. 
These are the generations of Noah: Noah was a just man and perfect in his generations, and Noah walked with God. 
And Noah begat three sons, Shem, Ham, and Japheth. 
The earth also was corrupt before God, a
583,ss at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said, Cry aloud: for he is a god; either he is talking, or he is pursuing, or he is in a journey, or peradventure he sleepeth, and must be awaked. 
And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with knives and lancets, till the blood gushed out upon them. 
And it came to pass, when midday was past, and they prophesied until the time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that there was neither voice, nor any to answer, nor any that regarded. 
And Elijah said unto all the people, Come near unto me. And all the people cam
665,vered of a child when she was past age, because she judged him faithful who had promised. 
Therefore sprang there even of one, and him as good as dead, so many as the stars of the sky in multitude, and as the sand which is by the sea shore innumerable. 
These all died in faith, not having received the promises, but having seen them afar off, and were persuaded of them, and embraced them, and confessed that they were strangers and pilgrims on the earth. 
For they that say such things declare plainly that they seek a country. 
And truly, if they had been mindful of that country from whence they came out, they might have had opportunity to have returned. 
But 
657,ven unto his habitation shall ye seek, and thither thou shalt come: 
And thither ye shall bring your burnt offerings, and your sacrifices, and your tithes, and heave offerings of your hand, and your vows, and your freewill offerings, and the firstlings of your herds and of your flocks: 
And there ye shall eat before the LORD your God, and ye shall rejoice in all that ye put your hand unto, ye and your households, wherein the LORD thy God hath blessed thee. 
Ye shall not do after all the things that we do here this day, every man whatsoever is right in his own eyes. 
For ye are not as yet come to the rest and to the inheritance, which the LORD your G
651,light shine upon it. 
Let darkness and the shadow of death stain it; let a cloud dwell upon it; let the blackness of the day terrify it. 
As for that night, let darkness seize upon it; let it not be joined unto the days of the year, let it not come into the number of the months. 
Lo, let that night be solitary, let no joyful voice come therein. 
Let them curse it that curse the day, who are ready to raise up their mourning. 
Let the stars of the twilight thereof be dark; let it look for light, but have none; neither let it see the dawning of the day: 
Because it shut not up the doors of my mother's womb, nor hid sorrow from mine eyes. 
Why die
524, 
And Joseph said unto Pharaoh, The dream of Pharaoh is one: God hath shewed Pharaoh what he is about to do. 
The seven good kine are seven years; and the seven good ears are seven years: the dream is one. 
And the seven thin and ill favoured kine that came up after them are seven years; and the seven empty ears blasted with the east wind shall be seven years of famine. 
This is the thing which I have spoken unto Pharaoh: What God is about to do he sheweth unto Pharaoh. 
Behold, there come seven years of great plenty t
679,on the head of the ram. 
Then shalt thou kill the ram, and take of his blood, and put it upon the tip of the right ear of Aaron, and upon the tip of the right ear of his sons, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the great toe of their right foot, and sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about. 
And thou shalt take of the blood that is upon the altar, and of the anointing oil, and sprinkle it upon Aaron, and upon his garments, and upon his sons, and upon the garments of his sons with him: and he shall be hallowed, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons' garments with him. 
Also thou shalt take of the ram the fat and the rump, and the fat that coveret
531,s he stricken. 
And he made his grave with the wicked, and with the rich in his death; because he had done no violence, neither was any deceit in his mouth. 
Yet it pleased the LORD to bruise him; he hath put him to grief: when thou shalt make his soul an offering for sin, he shall see his seed, he shall prolong his days, and the pleasure of the LORD shall prosper in his hand. 
He shall see of the travail of his soul, and shall be satisfied: by his knowledge shall my righteous servant justify many; for he shall bear their ini
593,hou wilt hear, O Lord my God. 
For I said, Hear me, lest otherwise they should rejoice over me: when my foot slippeth, they magnify themselves against me. 
For I am ready to halt, and my sorrow is continually before me. 
For I will declare mine iniquity; I will be sorry for my sin. 
But mine enemies are lively, and they are strong: and they that hate me wrongfully are multiplied. 
They also that render evil for good are mine adversaries; because I follow the thing that good is. 
Forsake me not, O LORD: O my God, be not far from me. 
Make haste to help me, O Lord my salvation. 
I said, I
568,e, to destroy the land wherein the children of Reuben and Gad dwelt. 
And the children of Reuben and the children of Gad called the altar Ed: for it shall be a witness between us that the LORD is God. 
And it came to pass a long time after that the LORD had given rest unto Israel from all their enemies round about, that Joshua waxed old and stricken in age. 
And Joshua called for all Israel, and for their elders, and for their heads, and for their judges, and for their officers, and said unto them, I am old and stricken in age: 
And ye have seen all that the LOR
584,here is thy zeal and thy strength, the sounding of thy bowels and of thy mercies toward me? are they restrained? 
Doubtless thou art our father, though Abraham be ignorant of us, and Israel acknowledge us not: thou, O LORD, art our father, our redeemer; thy name is from everlasting. 
O LORD, why hast thou made us to err from thy ways, and hardened our heart from thy fear? Return for thy servants' sake, the tribes of thine inheritance. 
The people of thy holiness have possessed it but a little while: our adversaries have trodden down thy sanctuary. 
We are thine: thou never bare
588,or of the tabernacle of the congregation, and wash them with water. 
And thou shalt put upon Aaron the holy garments, and anoint him, and sanctify him; that he may minister unto me in the priest's office. 
And thou shalt bring his sons, and clothe them with coats: 
And thou shalt anoint them, as thou didst anoint their father, that they may minister unto me in the priest's office: for their anointing shall surely be an everlasting priesthood throughout their generations. 
Thus did Moses: according to all that the LORD commanded him, so did he. 
And it came to pass in the first mont
616,avid; and the virgin's name was Mary. 
And the angel came in unto her, and said, Hail, thou that art highly favoured, the Lord is with thee: blessed art thou among women. 
And when she saw him, she was troubled at his saying, and cast in her mind what manner of salutation this should be. 
And the angel said unto her, Fear not, Mary: for thou hast found favour with God. 
And, behold, thou shalt conceive in thy womb, and bring forth a son, and shalt call his name JESUS. 
He shall be great, and shall be called the Son of the Highest: and the Lord God shall give unto him the throne of his father David: 
And he sh
501,rs, and slain thy prophets with the sword; and I, even I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it away. 
And the LORD said unto him, Go, return on thy way to the wilderness of Damascus: and when thou comest, anoint Hazael to be king over Syria: 
And Jehu the son of Nimshi shalt thou anoint to be king over Israel: and Elisha the son of Shaphat of Abelmeholah shalt thou anoint to be prophet in thy room. 
And it shall come to pass, that him that escapeth the sword of Hazael shall Jehu slay: 
681,ngdom there shall be no end. 
Then said Mary unto the angel, How shall this be, seeing I know not a man? 
And the angel answered and said unto her, The Holy Ghost shall come upon thee, and the power of the Highest shall overshadow thee: therefore also that holy thing which shall be born of thee shall be called the Son of God. 
And, behold, thy cousin Elisabeth, she hath also conceived a son in her old age: and this is the sixth month with her, who was called barren. 
For with God nothing shall be impossible. 
And Mary said, Behold the handmaid of the Lord; be it unto me according to thy word. And the angel departed from her. 
And Mary arose in those days, and went into the
574,f any would not work, neither should he eat. 
For we hear that there are some which walk among you disorderly, working not at all, but are busybodies. 
Now them that are such we command and exhort by our Lord Jesus Christ, that with quietness they work, and eat their own bread. 
But ye, brethren, be not weary in well doing. 
And if any man obey not our word by this epistle, note that man, and have no company with him, that he may be ashamed. 
Yet count him not as an enemy, but admonish him as a brother. 
Now the Lord of peace himself give you peace always by all means
562, hath in due times manifested his word through preaching, which is committed unto me according to the commandment of God our Saviour; 
To Titus, mine own son after the common faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God the Father and the Lord Jesus Christ our Saviour. 
For this cause left I thee in Crete, that thou shouldest set in order the things that are wanting, and ordain elders in every city, as I had appointed thee: 
If any be blameless, the husband of one wife, having faithful children not accused of riot or unruly. 
For a bishop must be blameless, as
519, them, Thus saith the Lord GOD. 
And they, whether they will hear, or whether they will forbear, (for they are a rebellious house,) yet shall know that there hath been a prophet among them. 
And thou, son of man, be not afraid of them, neither be afraid of their words, though briers and thorns be with thee, and thou dost dwell among scorpions: be not afraid of their words, nor be dismayed at their looks, though they be a rebellious house. 
And thou shalt speak my words unto them, whether they will hear, or whether
676,ORD came unto Jonah the son of Amittai, saying, 
Arise, go to Nineveh, that great city, and cry against it; for their wickedness is come up before me. 
But Jonah rose up to flee unto Tarshish from the presence of the LORD, and went down to Joppa; and he found a ship going to Tarshish: so he paid the fare thereof, and went down into it, to go with them unto Tarshish from the presence of the LORD. 
But the LORD sent out a great wind into the sea, and there was a mighty tempest in the sea, so that the ship was like to be broken. 
Then the mariners were afraid, and cried every man unto his god, and cast forth the wares that were in the ship into the sea, to lighten it of 
515,devise a device against you: return ye now every one from his evil way, and make your ways and your doings good. 
And they said, There is no hope: but we will walk after our own devices, and we will every one do the imagination of his evil heart. 
Therefore thus saith the LORD; Ask ye now among the heathen, who hath heard such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible thing. 
Will a man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock of the field? or shall the cold flowing waters that come fr
714,kers of their spiritual things, their duty is also to minister unto them in carnal things. 
When therefore I have performed this, and have sealed to them this fruit, I will come by you into Spain. 
And I am sure that, when I come unto you, I shall come in the fulness of the blessing of the gospel of Christ. 
Now I beseech you, brethren, for the Lord Jesus Christ's sake, and for the love of the Spirit, that ye strive together with me in your prayers to God for me; 
That I may be delivered from them that do not believe in Judaea; and that my service which I have for Jerusalem may be accepted of the saints; 
That I may come unto you with joy by the will of God, and may with you be refreshed. 
Now the God of 
501,because he hath transgressed the covenant of the LORD, and because he hath wrought folly in Israel. 
So Joshua rose up early in the morning, and brought Israel by their tribes; and the tribe of Judah was taken: 
And he brought the family of Judah; and he took the family of the Zarhites: and he brought the family of the Zarhites man by man; and Zabdi was taken: 
And he brought his household man by man; and Achan, the son of Carmi, the son of Zabdi, the son of Zerah, of the tribe of Judah, was take
708,l, one; 
The king of Tappuah, one; the king of Hepher, one; 
The king of Aphek, one; the king of Lasharon, one; 
The king of Madon, one; the king of Hazor, one; 
The king of Shimronmeron, one; the king of Achshaph, one; 
The king of Taanach, one; the king of Megiddo, one; 
The king of Kedesh, one; the king of Jokneam of Carmel, one; 
The king of Dor in the coast of Dor, one; the king of the nations of Gilgal, one; 
The king of Tirzah, one: all the kings thirty and one. 
Now Joshua was old and stricken in years; and the LORD said unto him, Thou art old and stricken in years, and there remaineth yet very much land to be possessed. 
This is the land that yet remaineth: all the borders of the Philistine
658, them that were possessed with devils. 
And all the city was gathered together at the door. 
And he healed many that were sick of divers diseases, and cast out many devils; and suffered not the devils to speak, because they knew him. 
And in the morning, rising up a great while before day, he went out, and departed into a solitary place, and there prayed. 
And Simon and they that were with him followed after him. 
And when they had found him, they said unto him, All men seek for thee. 
And he said unto them, Let us go into the next towns, that I may preach there also: for therefore came I forth. 
And he preached in their synagogues throughout all Gal
692,ank have ye? for sinners also do even the same. 
And if ye lend to them of whom ye hope to receive, what thank have ye? for sinners also lend to sinners, to receive as much again. 
But love ye your enemies, and do good, and lend, hoping for nothing again; and your reward shall be great, and ye shall be the children of the Highest: for he is kind unto the unthankful and to the evil. 
Be ye therefore merciful, as your Father also is merciful. 
Judge not, and ye shall not be judged: condemn not, and ye shall not be condemned: forgive, and ye shall be forgiven: 
Give, and it shall be given unto you; good measure, pressed down, and shaken together, and running over, shall men give into yo
691,ng unto all the commandments which I have commanded you. 
Be strong and of a good courage, fear not, nor be afraid of them: for the LORD thy God, he it is that doth go with thee; he will not fail thee, nor forsake thee. 
And Moses called unto Joshua, and said unto him in the sight of all Israel, Be strong and of a good courage: for thou must go with this people unto the land which the LORD hath sworn unto their fathers to give them; and thou shalt cause them to inherit it. 
And the LORD, he it is that doth go before thee; he will be with thee, he will not fail thee, neither forsake thee: fear not, neither be dismayed. 
And Moses wrote this law, and delivered it unto the priests the 
684,ording to thy word. 
With my whole heart have I sought thee: O let me not wander from thy commandments. 
Thy word have I hid in mine heart, that I might not sin against thee. 
Blessed art thou, O LORD: teach me thy statutes. 
With my lips have I declared all the judgments of thy mouth. 
I have rejoiced in the way of thy testimonies, as much as in all riches. 
I will meditate in thy precepts, and have respect unto thy ways. 
I will delight myself in thy statutes: I will not forget thy word. 
Deal bountifully with thy servant, that I may live, and keep thy word. 
Open thou mine eyes, that I may behold wondrous things out of thy law. 
I am a stranger in the earth: hide not thy c
528,n of his substance for the burnt offerings, to wit, for the morning and evening burnt offerings, and the burnt offerings for the sabbaths, and for the new moons, and for the set feasts, as it is written in the law of the LORD. 
Moreover he commanded the people that dwelt in Jerusalem to give the portion of the priests and the Levites, that they might be encouraged in the law of the LORD. 
And as soon as the commandment came abroad, the children of Israel brought in abundance the firstfruits of corn, wine, and oil, and hone
620,his days the Edomites revolted from under the dominion of Judah, and made themselves a king. 
Then Jehoram went forth with his princes, and all his chariots with him: and he rose up by night, and smote the Edomites which compassed him in, and the captains of the chariots. 
So the Edomites revolted from under the hand of Judah unto this day. The same time also did Libnah revolt from under his hand; because he had forsaken the LORD God of his fathers. 
Moreover he made high places in the mountains of Judah and caused the inhabitants of Jerusalem to commit fornication, and compelled Judah thereto. 
And there came a 
565, by your faith: 
For now we live, if ye stand fast in the Lord. 
For what thanks can we render to God again for you, for all the joy wherewith we joy for your sakes before our God; 
Night and day praying exceedingly that we might see your face, and might perfect that which is lacking in your faith? 
Now God himself and our Father, and our Lord Jesus Christ, direct our way unto you. 
And the Lord make you to increase and abound in love one toward another, and toward all men, even as we do toward you: 
To the end he may stablish your hearts unblameable in holin
640,eh, spake Joshua, saying, 
Remember the word which Moses the servant of the LORD commanded you, saying, The LORD your God hath given you rest, and hath given you this land. 
Your wives, your little ones, and your cattle, shall remain in the land which Moses gave you on this side Jordan; but ye shall pass before your brethren armed, all the mighty men of valour, and help them; 
Until the LORD have given your brethren rest, as he hath given you, and they also have possessed the land which the LORD your God giveth them: then ye shall return unto the land of your possession, and enjoy it, which Moses the LORD's servant gave you on this 
495,nto me, saying, 
Son of man, behold, I take away from thee the desire of thine eyes with a stroke: yet neither shalt thou mourn nor weep, neither shall thy tears run down. 
Forbear to cry, make no mourning for the dead, bind the tire of thine head upon thee, and put on thy shoes upon thy feet, and cover not thy lips, and eat not the bread of men. 
So I spake unto the people in the morning: and at even my wife died; and I did in the morning as I was commanded. 
And the people said unto me, W
601, have heat: but how can one be warm alone? 
And if one prevail against him, two shall withstand him; and a threefold cord is not quickly broken. 
Better is a poor and a wise child than an old and foolish king, who will no more be admonished. 
For out of prison he cometh to reign; whereas also he that is born in his kingdom becometh poor. 
I considered all the living which walk under the sun, with the second child that shall stand up in his stead. 
There is no end of all the people, even of all that have been before them: they also that come after shall not rejoice in him. Surely this also is va
493,n said I to the angel that talked with me, Whither do these bear the ephah? 
And he said unto me, To build it an house in the land of Shinar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her own base. 
And I turned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came four chariots out from between two mountains; and the mountains were mountains of brass. 
In the first chariot were red horses; and in the second chariot black horses; 
And in the third chariot white horses; and i
496,hat I sojourn in Mesech, that I dwell in the tents of Kedar! 
My soul hath long dwelt with him that hateth peace. 
I am for peace: but when I speak, they are for war. 
I will lift up mine eyes unto the hills, from whence cometh my help. 
My help cometh from the LORD, which made heaven and earth. 
He will not suffer thy foot to be moved: he that keepeth thee will not slumber. 
Behold, he that keepeth Israel shall neither slumber nor sleep. 
The LORD is thy keeper: the LORD is thy shade upon t
541,o the poor. 
When Jesus understood it, he said unto them, Why trouble ye the woman? for she hath wrought a good work upon me. 
For ye have the poor always with you; but me ye have not always. 
For in that she hath poured this ointment on my body, she did it for my burial. 
Verily I say unto you, Wheresoever this gospel shall be preached in the whole world, there shall also this, that this woman hath done, be told for a memorial of her. 
Then one of the twelve, called Judas Iscariot, went unto the chief priests, 
And said unto them, Wha
481,vision of the evening and the morning which was told is true: wherefore shut thou up the vision; for it shall be for many days. 
And I Daniel fainted, and was sick certain days; afterward I rose up, and did the king's business; and I was astonished at the vision, but none understood it. 
In the first year of Darius the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of the Medes, which was made king over the realm of the Chaldeans; 
In the first year of his reign I Daniel understood by books th
